Cry, Even Better if you Beg



Chapter 1

The child arrived in a mail wagon.

It was a late afternoon in the early spring. Bill Remmer was busy planting rose seedlings all day long.

“Are you Mr. Bill Remmer?”

Standing with a dazed look on her face, the child asked a cautious question. Her smooth pronunciation gave off a strange feeling.

“Yes. I am indeed Bill Remmer.”

Bill took off his straw hat with the same hands that had dusted off the dirt from his clothes.

When the tanned face, which had been hidden by the shadow of his straw hat, was revealed, the startled child swallowed her saliva. The child’s reaction was nothing out of the ordinary for Bill. Anyone who first saw Bill Remmer generally reacted like the child because of his rough-looking appearance.

“Who are you?”

Bill’s face grew more terrifying as he frowned upon the child.

“Hello. Uncle Bill. I am Leyla Lewellin. I came from Lovita.”

The child enunciated clearly and slowly. Lovita huh.. Bill realized why her pronunciation sounded rather strange.

“You’re saying, you crossed the border into the Berg Empire all by yourself?”

“Yes. I rode the train.”

The child smiled awkwardly and unnaturally straightened her posture. The mailman who had brought the child approached the two from behind.

“Ah. This child finally met you Mr. Remmer.”

“Good timing. What made you bring this child?”

“This child was walking alone in front of the station so I asked her where she was going and she said she was on her way to find Bill Remmer, the gardener of the Herhardt family. I brought her here because I was on my way to deliver some letters.”


The mailman replied with a smile and handed an envelope to Bill Remmer. It was a letter from a distant relative living in the neighboring country of Lovita.

Bill urgently tore open the envelope on the spot. The letter contained the story of a child who was an orphan and was taken in by relatives who were now no longer able to foster her due to their supposed ‘poor’ circumstances. The child’s name was Leyla Lewellin. The little girl standing in front of Bill was the orphan.

“Damned people. They sure are telling me this news fast.”

Bill lost his breath in amazement.

No one in Lovita could take care of this mere orphan. Bill Remmer was the last among those who had a faint connection with the child. The letter stated that if Bill’s situation was not favorable, he should leave the child in the orphanage.

Bill muttered a curse and threw the crumpled paper to the floor.

“These people should go to hell. How can they send this little thing here alone.”

Now that Bill understood the whole situation, his face gradually turned red with anger. The child was treated like a bomb that was passed back and forth from one relative to another and meant to be thrown away when no one else wanted her. She was ultimately sent away to a different country with an address of a distant relative she did not even know of.

“Excuse me, Uncle Bill. I am not that young.”

The child who had been silently watching Bill suddenly opened her mouth.

“I’ll be twelve in a couple of weeks.”

She whispered in a rather grown-up tone. Bill chuckled in amazement. He was relieved that she was older than he thought. The child looked smaller than her age.

When the mailman who delivered the troublesome girl left, the two were left in the garden. Bill wrapped his head around with his hands and pleaded God for help.

Even though they were distant relatives, the two seemed more like father and daughter from afar. Bill had never met his distant relatives for more than 20 years and yet, there he was, stuck with a child who he never knew existed until today.

Even though the weather was chilly, the child wore a thin layer of clothes. She was emaciated- like an iron skewer. All Bill could see of her was her vivid green eyes and gold-threaded hair.

It was impossible for him to take care of her. Bill concluded.


But the only solution left was to put her in an orphanage, which drove him crazy. Bill once again murmured a curse towards the relatives that put him into this mess. The child flinched and started biting her red lips.

“Follow me.”

Bill shook his head in frustration and led the way.

“Let’s fill our stomachs before I make my decision.”

His blunt words were carried away by the evening breeze. As the two walked further towards Bill’s cabin, the child’s timid steps gradually became light and cheerful.



“Is that all you’re eating?”

Bill frowned upon the small plate the child was holding.

“Yes. I eat a little.” The child smiled.

“Child, I hate children who don’t eat a lot.”

The child’s eyes widened at Bill’s words. The light of the table lamp lit over the child’s skinny wrist that was revealed under the carelessly raised sleeve.

“You should eat everything like a cow.”

Bill’s expression became more stern. The troubled Leyla, slowly blinking her eyes, moved more loaf of meat and bread onto her plate. She then hurriedly began to gobble up her food.

“I can’t eat like a cow but I do eat quite well uncle.”

The girl brightly smiled with bread crumbs near her dainty lips.

“Yes. I can definitely see that.”

Bill laughed and started filling his tall glass with alcohol.

“Aren’t you afraid of me?”

Bill scrunched his face to deliberately scare the child. The child simply stared at the man, not daring to avoid his eyes.

“No. You don’t yell at me. You give me lots of good food. So I think you’re a good person.”

What kind of life has this child been living? Bill thought as he filled his glass of beer again.


The letter said the child’s mother abandoned her husband and child to elope with another man. The father of the child, who was heartbroken by the betrayal, became an alcohol addict and had died of alcohol poisoning. After that, the child grew up in the homes of her relatives, only left to be deserted by them.

Even though the child had a pitiful past, Bill believed it was still absurd to raise her.

Bill Remmer chugged down the glass of beer and decided that he will make his decision by next week.



“Did everyone hear? The gardener Bill Remmer has started to raise a young girl.”

A young maid hurriedly rushed into the lounge servants used during their free time. The servants who were taking their rest all turned their eyes toward the young maid.

“A girl? Mr. Remmer? It would be more plausible to say that he decided to raise a lion or an elephant instead.”

One of the servants snorted.

The Herhardt household’s gardener, Bill Remmer, was a man who had a natural talent for growing flowers. Thanks to his talent, he has been able to maintain this position as a gardener for 20 years even with his brusque temper. He was deeply trusted by the Herhardt family. Especially Norma. Due to Norma’s unique love of flowers, she gave infinite understanding and tolerance to Bill’s gardening and temper. It was also her decision to give the gardener a cabin in the woods located behind the Herhardt’s mansion.

Bill Remmer’s life was simple.

He worked in the garden and took a rest in the cabin. Despite his time drinking with his fellow workers, he spent most of his time surrounded by flowers and trees. Even after decades have passed ever since his wife died of an illness, he did not get close to any woman.

The Bill Remmer raising a little girl? The servants who were resting in the lounge reached a consensus deeming that the rumor was nonsense until one of the maids sitting by the window burst into an exclamation.

“Oh my. It must be true! Look over there.”

The maid pointed over the glass window with her eyes wide open. The servants all at once rushed over to the window and soon became shocked with wonder. On the other side of the garden, Bill Remmer was gardening with his body crouched down and the rumored petite girl was following his footsteps.

The girl’s golden hair, braided in one strand, shook back and forth like a pendulum as she trotted along.

‘”I still haven’t made my decision.”

When there were questions asked about the child, Bill repeatedly answered the same response.

“I can’t leave her here so I need to think well.”

While Bill’s thoughts continued through spring, then to summer, Leyla Lewellin was slowly settling down on the Herhardt estate. The child’s diligent stroll through the gardens and forests had already become a familiar scene for the Herhardt servants.

“I think she’s grown a bit.”

Mrs. Mona, the Herhardt’s chef, smiled while looking out the window. Leyla was examining the grass and flowers that were beginning to bud behind the forest cabin.

“She’s got a long way to go. She’s still smaller than average girls.”

“Look, Bill Remmer. Kids are different than your plants. They can’t grow overnight.”

Mrs. Mona shook her head as she lowered her basket down on the table.

“What’s this?”

“Cookies and cake. There was a tea party yesterday at the mansion.”

“I hate sweets.”

“Really? This is Leyla’s”

Bill Remmer’s dark eyebrows wrinkled at Mrs. Mona’s nonchalant response.

This child was not meant to be here and yet, the Duke’s servants began to look after Leyla every day. They greeted her, brought her food, and sometimes visited her. It was becoming troublesome for Bill Remmer.

“You should buy her some clothes. The young lady’s skirt seems like it will go up to her knees.”

Mrs. Mona tsked as she stared at Leyla running after a bird. Bill failed to refute. Even in his eyes, it seemed obvious that Leyla was wearing clothes that didn’t fit her.

“Oh my! Oh my! Look at her!”

Just when Mrs. Mona was about to leave, she suddenly pointed towards Leyla and shouted in dismay. Bill glanced at where Mrs. Mona was looking towards with a queer look. When the bird Leyla was chasing after landed on a tree branch, she started to swiftly climb up the tree. Her movements were athletic and light like a squirrel.

“She sure has a talent for climbing trees.”

Mrs. Mona scowled at Bill’s unconcerned reply.


“Bill Remmer! You knew about her climbing trees and you let that go? How the hell are you raising your child?”

“She’s growing strong and well as you can see.”

“You’re raising that girl like a wild beast! My God.”

Mrs. Mona raised her voice and made a fuss as Bill snooped around the window deafeningly. Leyla perched on the thin branch and watched the mini birds playing on the thicket.

After watching over the girl for a couple of months, Leyla Lewellin was proven to be a curious child who wanted to know more about the world. Flowers and grass, birds and insects. Anything that caught her eyes amazed and piqued her interest. One day at night, when Leyla wasn’t returning for dinner, Bill had gone deep into the forest to find Leyla sitting by the river looking at a flock of water birds. She was so focused that she couldn’t even hear Bill calling her name again and again.

After spitting out a couple of more harsh lectures, Mrs. Mona had returned home. Bill had slowly walked out to the back of his cabin.

“Uncle!”

Leyla delightedly waved towards him.

The child, who came down from the tree as quickly as she went up, hurriedly dashed towards Bill. The dull gray one-piece dress Leyla was wearing had short sleeves and was ragged. Her hand-me-down like clothes seemed inappropriate when meeting the duke so Bill had made his decision to buy her new clothes.

“Get ready and come out.”

Bill said impulsively when the two arrived in front of the back door cabin.

“Ah. Uncle?”

“We’re going downtown to buy some clothes so you don’t have to look so puzzled.”

Bill awkwardly gave off a dry cough and scratched his back neck.

“Duke Herhardt will be here soon, so it’ll be a bit weird to greet him with your state right now.”

“By the duke, you mean the owner of this land right?”

“Yes. Since it’s break, he’ll be back.”

“Break? Does the duke attend school?”

Leyla frowned as she tilted her head. Bill grinned and stroked the child’s disheveled hair.

“The duke is only 18 years old so he has no choice but to attend school.”

“Whaat? Eighteen years old? The duke?”

Bill’s laughter grew louder at the child’s stunned expression. The child’s fluffy hair that Bill had touched with his rough fingertips was as soft as cotton.



A train from the capital had entered the platform at the Carlsbar station.

The waiting servants approached the private section of the station. By the time they lined up in a straight posture, a tall, slim boy descended onto the platform.

“Hello, master.”

Starting with the polite greeting of the butler Hessen, all the other servants soon bowed their heads towards the boy. With a straight and graceful manner, Matthias responded to their greetings with a light but silent salute. His rosy lips were curled up in a smile that was neither excessive nor insufficient.

It wasn’t until Matthias took a few steps when the Herhardt’s servants began to move. The onlookers quickly backed away and opened the path for the young master to pass. Matthias walked past the platform without showing any chance of slowing down.

“A carriage.”

Matthias smirked as he found a carriage waiting for him in front of the station.

“Ah….. Yes, master. Madam Norma doesn’t believe cars are trustworthy.”

“I know. For grandmother, cars are simply a lump of iron that is unbearably vulgar and dangerous.”

“My apologies. Next time…”

“No. ‘Classic’ is not bad. Once in awhile.”

Matthias calmly got on the carriage. His long arms and legs gave off movements were slow but steady. The carriage gradually picked up speed as it passed through the square and the bustling shopping streets. The separate wagon that was loaded with Matthias’s baggage followed the carriage that was engraved with a golden crest off into the distance.


Chapter 2

Visits by relatives who are planning to spend the summer in Arvis. Social gatherings. Insurance issues for the trade ship to sail next month.

Matthias, sitting at the backside of the carriage, stared outside the window as his butler Hessen reported the family’s pending issues. Matthias replied to Hessen’s words with a brief answer or a nod. The directors were in charge of the company, and Mattias’s mother and grandmother were in charge of the family affairs, but the power to make the ultimate decision was up to Duke Herhardt. And Matthias has been in that position ever since he was twelve years old.

By the time Matthias entered the Platanus road to the Herhardt territory, Hessen’s report was over.

Matthias gazed at the familiar scenery with his head tilted at an angle. The tall trees that lined both sides of the driveway were arched as if they were holding hands. The fragmented sunlight gliding through the swaying leaves embroidered the path like a beautiful pattern.

Passing the road and into the territory, a white mansion with a deep blue roof had revealed itself. At the front door, the mother and grandmother were out to greet the family’s head. While Matthias was straightening the position of his already linear tie, the door to the wagon opened.

“Welcome, Matthias.”

The Dowager Duchess of Arvis, Norma Catarina von Herhardt, greeted her grandson with a bright smile. Matthias bowed his head and accepted his grandmother’s kiss. Elysee von Herhardt, who was standing behind them, approached Matthias with a slightly more straightforward attitude.

“You’ve grown taller.”

She gave him a warm hug and smiled. Her dark black hair, just like her son’s, shined in the early summer sun.

Matthias replied with a corresponding smile. The greetings that were shared with the other servants who were waiting in line were not much different. Matthias’s refined manner and proper courtesy were distinctly shown towards the servants. He was the perfect owner of this family, Duke Herhardt.

Standing between his grandmother and mother, Matthias took the lead and crossed the lobby hall. Before he climbed up the stairs, he suddenly raised his head and looked up the huge chandelier that was lit up in the middle of the day. Beyond the chandelier was the crest of Herhardt family imprinted on the ceiling.

He was a Herhardt.

It was another name for intelligence, elegance, and unrelenting character.


In his own life, Matthias never had any complaints or doubts. He was well aware of the type of life he had to live in and was willing to accept it. He handled his life as if he were breathing and it was easy as that.

With his gaze focused down, Matthias climbed up the stairs with large strides.

When the owner of the household safely entered the mansion, the servants were now able to properly breathe.

The people of Arvis prepared for days in advance to thoroughly greet Duke Herhardt. Everything and everyone had to be perfect on his arrival, including those who were residing on his land. The servants had to be on their best appearances. The Arvis’ uninvited guest, Leyla Lewellin, was no exception.



“Did the duke go in? Already?”

Leyla, standing at the edge of the group of servants, whispered in a rather disappointed voice. The ivory dress that Bill had bought fluttered along with the girl’s movement.

“You’ll see Duke Herhardt in the woods. I’ll have to ask for permission then.”

Bill Remmer gave out a blunt answer and started walking towards the woods. Leyla ran after him.

“Does the duke like the forest as well?”

“Well, yeah sure. He likes hunting.”

“Hunting? In the woods?”

Leyla’s eyes grew wide open. Bill snorted as he glimpsed down the child.

“Isn’t it natural the forest is the hunting ground for this family?”

“Then… does he hunt birds too?”

“The duke enjoys hunting birds the most.”

Leyla stopped walking in contemplation at Bill’s insignificant remark. After realizing what he had said, Bill awkwardly gave out a dry cough.

He thought of appeasing her with a proper lie but Duke Herhardt was scheduled to be on the hunting ground in a couple of days. He was worried that he might give the child a greater shock if he tried to relieve her with his white lies.

“You’ll be surprised when you see the duke’s shooting skills. He’s young but he’s a great marksman.”


Bill babbled because he thought he had to say at least something to reassure the young girl. But Leyla was already on the verge of tears.

“Why does he like catching birds? There’s lots of food in a mansion like that.”

“To the noblemen, hunting is just a form of leisure. Birds are the most interesting targets to shoot at, and….”

Bill once again realized what he had said and turned towards Leyla. His eyes were met with Leyla’s upset face.

Why did you have to like birds so much!

Bill almost yelled out. He didn’t know why he was bothering to explain all these things to her while having to be careful of the child’s feelings. Bill ended up keeping his silence because if he said one more word, she looked like she was about to cry.

A crying Leyla.

He hated the sight of crying children.

After hesitating, Bill started to walk again. The child followed his footsteps with her shoulders limp. The exact child who was excited to wear her new ivory-colored dress was now nowhere to be found. It had been quite a sight to see her getting so jumpy about a dress she just got.

“I hope the duke starts to hate hunting.”+

The child, who had been silent for a long time, said cautiously.

“Maybe he’ll grow bored of hunting?”

Leyla looked up at Bill with eyes full of hope. Bill could only reply by sheepishly scratching the back of his neck.

Leyla believed her prayers could have been fulfilled.

A week after his return, the duke was nowhere to be seen near the hunting ground. It was understandable because he was busy taking care of the guests who had flocked to the mansion to see him.

Every day, there were clamorous gatherings held at the mansion but the forest was silent. Summer was near its end. Baby birds hatched from the eggs and the wild roses, which used to be in their early buds, were now in full bloom. Leyla happily observed the minor changes that were happening in the forest.

“Don’t go too far Leyla!”

Bill raised his voice when Leyla excitedly left the cabin.

“Okay! I’m just taking a walk by the river! See you later, uncle!”

Leyla turned around and frantically waved both her arms over her head. The old leather bag the girl was holding over her shoulder shook along with the jumpy child.

Leyla was the first to see the recently hatched birds over the tree branch. The hairless baby birdlings were waiting for their mother to bring their food. Leyla scurried down from the tree and recorded the baby birds she saw today on a small note taken out from her leather bag. Although the sketches were a bit messy, she tried her best to capture the tiny birds through her drawings.

Leyla drew and wrote everything she saw in the woods in her little notebook. The land was more beautiful than any other place she had ever lived in. Leyla wanted to write down everything so when the time for her to leave the place came, she could recall the memories she had in the forest through her notebook. The thought of leaving the place one day saddened her.

As Leyla walked along the path leading to the riverside, she steadily recorded the forest. She stuck in pastel-colored flower petals between her notebook pages and picked some strawberries she found on the way. The sun was beginning to set when she reached the glistening riverside.

Leyla climbed on top of a massive tree that stood at the border of the forest and the river. The thick lengthy branch of the tree was her favorite spot because it was as comfortable as a chair. Just when Leyla was about to open her notebook, faint clatter of horseshoes was heard from afar.

Leyla hastily shoved her notebook into her bag. In the meanwhile, the galloping sound of the horse came closer. Frightened by the incoming intruder, Leyla held her breath while hugging the tree branch she was laying down on.

Soon after, a horse with a smooth dark hazel fur appeared. A man was on its back. Of all places, the man chose to rest his horse right underneath the tree where Leyla was on. The man’s movements from when he descended from the horse were light and flexible.

Leyla believed she should come down but the strange man was already leaning his back under the tree. Not knowing what other excuses to say, Leyla simply stared at the man raising his hand to take off his hat. It was at that exact moment when Leyla’s leather bag slid off her shoulders and hit the branch.

The memory of the next moment was vague.

The man reflectively turned his head towards the tree branch and met eyes with Leyla. Leyla gazed upon his eyes. His blue eyes, seen through the thick black hair flowing over his forehead, were like transparent glass beads. By the time Leyla pulled herself together, the man was pointing his gun towards her face. Leyla’s face grew pale at the thought of getting shot by the long, threatening gun.

Leyla, frozen in place, simply hugged the tree for dear life. Her whole body was trembling in sweat. The man slowly gave off a silent sigh and lowered his gun.

“What are you.”

A low voice streamed through his crooked lips.

“…..Leyla.”

Leyla managed to squeeze her voice out but was on the verge of tears. Her gold hair fluttered in the wind.

“What?”

His eyes narrowed further. Leyla hugged the tree so hard that her fingertips began to hurt.

“Leyla. Leyla Lewellin.”



“Uncle! Uncle Bill! Uncle!”

Leyla’s voice rang out in the woods.

Bill was sitting in front of the cabin warehouse. He turned his head in bewilderment at Leyla’s frantic call. Leyla rushed towards him with a crimson red face.

“What’s the matter?”

“The- There’s a man in the woods! He was tall!”

Despite her shortness of breath, Leyla was about to explain her encounter with the strange man.

“You must’ve met the duke who came out hunting.”

Bill retorted as he picked up his tools from the warehouse.

“His hair was black and his eyes were really blue. His voice was light as a feather.”

“It’s Duke Herhardt without a mistake.”

Bill snarled with laughter. Leyla stood in front of Bill for a long time, trying to catch her breath.

The beautiful but scary man stared at Leyla for some time and had turned away without saying a word. When he got back on his horse, two other men appeared from the deep forest. The man turned his horse to join the other two men as they drifted further into the woods. When they were no longer visible, Leyla climbed down from the trees and fled to the cabin.

“Then the duke…..”

When Leyla was able to say something, a cold shot rang out, shaking the calmness of the forest.


Leyla was startled and she turned her head towards the direction of the sound. Surprised birds arose from the far side of the forest. One of the surprised birds fell into the trees, with its wings drooped helplessly.

The shots went on a few more rounds. Bill gave Leyla a pat on her shoulder in an effort to calm the scared girl.

“Leyla.”

Leyla slowly raised her head. When their eyes met, Bill unconsciously held his breath.

The child was crying.



The beautiful bird slaughterer.

That was the title Leyla Lewellin decided to give him.

All the people of this estate, even Bill Remmer, praised him for being a perfect aristocrat. People seemed to care and love Matthias von Herhardt, who had outstanding qualities as the owner of this land.

But Leyla did not agree.

Ever since the day the duke went out hunting, the mother bird disappeared. The baby birds that had recently hatched no longer than their mother to feed them. In addition, countless birds were no longer to be seen.

Why did the duke hunt only small, beautiful birds instead of large birds that are meant to be eaten?1

Leyla, who had been observing and agonizing for over the past month, now seemed to know why.

To him, the birds were moving a target.

The smaller they were, the more difficult and interesting they were to aim. The duke did not bother to look at the prey he hit. He simply turned away after hitting his target. On the days he went out hunting, Leyla buried the dead birds that were covered in blood.2

Bang-

The gunfire rang once again in the distance.


Chapter 3

The sun was scorching hot but the tree shade was cool. Leyla sat on a blanket with her arms wrapped around her knees. Bill and the other garden workers were engrossed in digging up the rose tree that had started to wilt.

The garden behind the mansion seemed to have roses of all different sorts. The rose was said to be the national flower of the Berg Empire and the flower that the duke’s mother and grandmother adored.

Due to another day of gunshots coming from the forest, Leyla wandered nervously around the cabin. Uncle Bill had seen her nervous state and decided to bring her out into the garden. Her mind was put to rest when the sound of gunshots faded away.

Is it really okay for me to rest when Uncle Bill is working under the burning sun?

Leyla uncomfortably looked at Bill. She slowly closed her eyes and let out a small sigh. Uncle Bill threatened to get angry if she helped him. He told her he hated children who don’t listen. Even though Leyla’s heart wasn’t at ease, she decided to wait for him until he finished his job.

When Leyla opened her eyes again with resignation, she was startled by an unfamiliar boy standing in front of her. The neatly dressed boy looked like he was around Leyla’s age.

“Hey.”

When their eyes met, the boy greeted her with a lovely smile. He was a boy with charming platinum hair.

“You live here?”

The boy looked around and asked solemnly.

“Yeah. With Uncle Bill.”

Leyla answered as she squinted her eyes.

“Mr. Bill? You mean that scary gardener guy?”

“He’s not scary.”

“Really? Seems scary to me.”

The boy tilted his head and casually took a seat next to Leyla.

“Do you live here too?”

Leyla asked with caution. The boy smiled and shook his head.


“Nah. I followed my father. He’s the family doctor at the Herhardt household. He’s here to give Madam Norma a medical examination. I come here with my father sometimes. Madam Norma said it was okay.”1

“I see.”

“How old are you?”

“Twelve.”

“Same. But you’re kinda small.”

The boy staring at Leyla began to laugh. Leyla’s cheeks started to flush bright red in fury.

“You’re small too.”

“I’m the tallest in my class though.”

The boy stretched out his back to prove his tall height. He certainly looked a little taller than his age.

“Anyways… You’re still shorter than Uncle Bill.”

Leyla whispered softly. The boy giggled again at Leyla’s words. He seemed like a happy-go-lucky child.

“Hey, it’s impossible to find a kid or even an adult taller than Mr. Bill.”

“I’m not so sure about that.”

Leyla picked at the grass growing near the blanket for no reason. Her delicate fingers slowly tainted green. She wished the boy would quickly go away but he showed no signs of getting up.

“Do you want some?”

Leyla, who then focused her attention on the peach sitting at the edge of the blanket, asked impulsively.

The boy gladly nodded.

Leyla took out a pocket knife from her leather bag. The boy snickered at the sight of Leyla gently cutting the peach.

“You’re funny. Why is a knife coming out of a girl’s bag?”

“Don’t make fun of me. Uncle Bill gave it to me.”

Leyla slightly wrinkled her nose in annoyance as she gave the half-cut peach to the boy. The sweet scent of the peach pulp tingled two children’s noses.

“Why do you look so down? Did something happen?”

The boy carefully asked after he gulped down his peach.

“The duke and his friends keep hunting down birds.”

Leyla somberly answered. The boy titled his head, wondering what the issue was.

“What about it?”

“They’re murdering birds for their own enjoyment.”

“Isn’t that how hunting works?”

“Do you think so too?”

Leyla stared at the boy with her stern green eyes. To Leyla, the boy seemed like he would have a hard time holding the big, long hunting gun.

“Uh….. No.”

The boy shook his head violently.

“I don’t. It’s cruel.”

The boy replied. A smile gradually began to spread on Leyla’s face.

“Do you want another peach?”

Leyla asked in a brighter voice. The boy nodded. Leyla cut another peach in half and handed the larger piece to the boy. The boy’s cheeks started to flush as he tried to fix his uncomfortable collar.

“Kyle! Kyle!”

A faint voice was heard. The boy, who was fiddling with the dead peach seed, sprang to his feet.

“I have to go now.”

“Okay. Bye.”

“Kyle Etman.”

The boy held out his hand.

“My name. What about you?”

“I’m Leyla. Leyla Lewellin.”

Leyla awkwardly shook his hand. With their small hands covered in sticky peach nectar, the two shook hands as if they were making a truce.

“Bye, Leyla. See ya. I’ll bring you something more delicious next time.”

The boy shouted as he dashed away in the distance.


Leyla simply gave out a small wave because she was unsure if she could see him again if she ever stayed in this estate.

When Kyle left, Leyla’s world was at peace again.

While taking a whiff of the rose-scented breeze, Leyla patiently waited for Uncle Bill to finish his work.

But at some point, she had fallen asleep and opened her eyes to Uncle Bill calling her name at sunset.

Leyla rose up from her seat, carried her bag, and picked up the blanket.

“Uncle Bill. I saw a kid….”

When Leyla was about to tell her encounter with the boy who she shared her peaches with, she was interrupted by silhouettes of people walking out from the other side of the forest. It was Duke Herhardt and his friends.

Matthias paused in the center of the rose garden. The blunt gardener, Bill Remmer, was there bowing his head towards the duke. It was not long before Matthias realized that there was a tiny child hiding behind the gardener.

“Long time no see, Mr. Remmer.”

Matthias lightly nodded. His acquaintances that were with him during his hunting session stopped behind the duke at a moderate distance.

“She’s going to be staying here at Arvis for the time being.”

Bill Remmer informed the duke with a slightly uncomfortable look.

When Bill tapped the girl’s back to come forward, the girl hesitatingly took a step towards the duke. Thanks to her sparkling blond hair, Matthias was able to recall who the child was. The girl who he almost shot. The absurd little girl who almost got shot for being thought of as a bird.

“I’ve already received approval from Madam Norma and Madam Elysse but I believe I should ask for your approval as well.”

Bill Remmer bowed his head once again. The child standing beside him bowed along.

Matthias slowly glanced at the child. When they exchanged looks, the child frowned at him. Thin scowled eyes and clamped lips. Her expression was the exact same when they first met in the woods.

“You’re that girl. The girl who lives in the forest.”

Matthias’s cousin, Riette, snickered from behind. The red-faced child hid behind the gardener’s back in embarrassment. The girl he occasionally met in the forest was like that as well. As soon as she stared into the duke’s eyes in wonder, she hid behind the tree. And after Matthias had finished hunting, she always came out from behind and buried the dead birds.1

“Sure. If that’s what you want Mr. Remmer.”

Matthias gave a brief answer with a grin. Whatever the gardener raised in the forest was none of his business.

“Thank you My Lord.”

Bill gave him his thanks. After Matthias’s chin ever so slightly nodded at Bill, he began to move.

After the duke passed the gardener and the girl by, Leyla flinched at the sight of Matthias’s servants following him with their hands full of hunted animals. The deep, unpleasant scent of blood ran through the girl’s nose. Leyla’s shoulders hunched and she closed her eyes.

Uncle Bill’s large, warm hands patted Leyla’s frail shoulders.



Claudine let out an exaggerated sigh with her chin rested on the palm of her hand. Her curled brown hair bounced along to the beat of her constant sighs. Countess Brandt glanced at her daughter with her thin eyebrows.

“Claudine, behave like a lady please.”

The countess’s inarticulate voice grew in impatience. Although Claudine was rather too young to be called a lady, she was soon to be the Duchess of Arvis. Claudine’s mother let out a long sigh at her daughter’s immature attitude.

“But I’m so lonely and bored.”

Claudine grumbled. The other noblewomen who were drinking tea at the tea table turned their eyes at the upset brunette girl.

“Then go play with your cousins.”

Countess Brandt huffed as her face turned crimson red. But Claudine did not bother to notice her frustrated mother.

“They treat me as if I’m not here. They say things I don’t understand.”

The ladies let out a soft smile at Claudine’s annoyed expression.

“Well, it can be boring. Claudine doesn’t have any friends her age.”

Elysse von Herhardt nodded as she stroked the white dog sitting on her lap.

“See? Madam Herhardt understands.”

A lively smile bloomed on Claudine’s lip when she found someone who could understand her pain.

“Who’s that child?”

Claudine suddenly directed her finger towards a garden after glancing at a young girl for some time. All the ladies turned their heads toward the direction Claudine was pointing at. The young girl Claudine was talking about was talking a stroll with a gardener.

“Can I play with her? I think she’s about the same age as me.”

“Well… Isn’t she an orphan from abroad? That kind of girl isn’t suitable to be your friend.”

“I’m fine. I think it’ll be more amusing than playing with a dog.”

Claudine’s tone was calm and imposing. She didn’t pay any attention to her mother’s red ears that were about to burst in embarassment. Elysse von Herhardt laughed and happily rang the bell.

“Bring me that child.”

A maid arrived at the call of her master’s bell.

“The child the gardener is currently raising.”



The maid brought Leyla to an unknown world. It was a place where fancy people, dressed in candy-sweet colored clothes, sat under the white mansion shade.

“She’s very cute.”

One of the ladies complimented.

“What do you say? Do you like it, Claudine?”1

After examining Leyla, the black haired woman turned over to the chestnut-haired girl sitting besides her. The girl, named Claudine, smiled happily and nodded.

“Thank you, Madam Herhardt.”

Leyla blankly stared at the people in front of her. She wasn’t sure what the ladies were conversing about. She just wanted to get back to Uncle Bill’s cabin but no one seemed to notice her desperate desire.

When one of the ladies murmured an order, the maid held Leyla’s hand and dragged her into a room.

Leyla had washed herself in a fancy bathroom for the first time and wore clothes that were surprisingly soft and white. The maid roughly combed her messy hair but Leyla endured the pain. She believed if she said something wrong, she would risk Uncle Bill’s job.


“Lady Claudine is the daughter of Count Brandt. You shouldn’t act recklessly in front of her. Do you understand?”

The maid who dragged Leyla into the second floor of the mansion sternly warned Leyla.

Leyla dazedly nodded. The maid cautiously opened the door of the drawing room. Claudin had greeted them with a posh attitude.

“Hello. What’s your name? Age?”

Claudine lowered her head and attempted to make an eye contact with Leyla.

“Leyla Lewellin. I’m twelve years old.”

“Really? I thought you were younger since you’re so small.”

Although Leyla hated being called ‘small’, she decided to hold in her frustration. For Uncle Bill. She calmed herself as she repeated those words like an incantation.

Piano. Music. Floral Arranging.

Claudine recommended this and that, but there was nothing Leyla could do.

Dice game. Word game. Chess.

The other alternatives proposed by Claudin were the same.

A vague smile came upon Claudine’s mouth as she alternately looked at the table full of toys and at Leyla.

“Poor you.”

With a disappointed sigh, Claudine slowly rose from her chair. Leyla stared helplessly at the toys assorted on the table.

“You don’t know a thing.”

Claudin walked towards Leyla’s chair and sighed in resignation. Her soft voice, trying not to give any hints of disappointment or annoyance, gave Leyla a greater humiliation.

Leyla thought she should at least answer something but her mouth was closed shut. In a situation like this, It was hard to say anything polite. Fortunately, Claudine turned away without waiting for what Leyla had to utter.

Before closing the door, Claudine muttered a sigh to herself.

“What the heck. No better than a dog.”

When Claudine left, Leyla was left all alone in the gleaming drawing room.


Leyla wanted to leave right away but she decided to wait. Maybe she’ll come back. Leyla thought. But when the afternoon sun gradually ripened to a golden color, Claudine did not return.1

The maid who brought Leyla in did not show up until evening.

“You may go back.”

The maid’s voice was softer than before.

“The lady said you can keep the clothes. And this as well.”

The maid extended a glittering gold coin towards Leyla. When Leyla froze in place, the maid shoved the coin into her hands.

“Take it. It’s polite to be thankful for what your superiors give you. Do you understand?”


Chapter 4

Leyla left the mansion when the sky started to paint itself into a rosy color. As she left the entrance leading to the rose garden, a refreshing breeze greeted Leyla.

With a gold coin grasped in her right hand, Leyla walked proudly. But her gallant steps did not last long.

Claudine was sitting under the pergola that was located near the vine roses-which were in full bloom.

Claudine, who was having a pleasant chat with her cousins, vaguely smiled when her eyes met Leyla’s.

“Goodbye, Leyla.”

Claudine greeted first. The eyes of the young men sitting next to Claudine turned to Leyla. Fortunately, Duke Herhardt was nowhere to be seen.

Leyla replied with a bow. Claudine did not say much in response.

Leyla began to run after she was out of their sight. She was eager to escape the strange and unfamiliar world and return to Uncle Bill’s cabin. But the greatest misfortune came at the last moment.

At the border between the garden and the forest path, Leyla fell down. The gold coin mockingly rolled down the paving stone and hit the edge of a man’s shoe. Leyla frowned at the spinning gold coin. The man lightly stepped on the coin with the tip of his shoe to quell the clamorous sound.

Leyla slowly gazed at the well-polished shoes, long legs, and then the man’s face looming down upon her. It was Duke Herhardt.

Surprised, Leyla reflexively rose herself up. Her white dress was stained with blood and dust from her scratched knee. The duke simply stared at Leyla with a calm look. His red lips seemed as if they were slightly tilted to one side.

Leyla clenched her lips and swept the dust off her clothes. In the meanwhile, Duke Herhardt leisurely took a step back. The coin that was underneath his foot shined, reflecting the sunlight.

Although Leyla wanted to leave it, she crouched her body in front of the duke. Just when she was about to extend her arms out, she was reminded of the words Lady Brandt left her. No better than a dog. Those words had scarred a deep wound in Leyla’s heart.

Leyla grabbed the coin and politely bowed towards Duke Herhardt. She did not dare to raise her head. All she could do was to bow her head down as low as possible and hold her breath. Surprisingly, although she felt pain when she fell, she could no longer feel any pain when she bowed.

Leaving the duke behind, Leyla started running again. She wasn’t able to run as fast as before because of her injured knee but she continued to move her bloody legs. She felt something rising from the bottom of her heart up to the end of her throat.


After passing through the forest path and facing the light that came from the cabin, Leyla realized what it was.

It was sadness.



“I’ll give this to you, uncle.”

Leyla held out the gold coin in a rather solemn manner. Bill’s hairy eyebrows slowly wrinkled.

“What’s this?”

“A gold coin.”

“You think I don’t know that?”

“Lady Claudine gave it to me.”

“Claudine? Ah, that little noble lady.”

Bill nodded as if he knew the lady.

Ever since Leyla was called upon the mansion, she had been looking down for the next two days. She didn’t talk or take a walk around the woods as well as the garden. Bill realized that he missed the child’s past, bright lifestyle.

The world was quiet because the child was quiet. And Bill did not like that quiet world very much.

“Why do you want to give me that money?”

Bill leaned a little towards the table. Leyla sat in a straight posture, facing the man.

“Because I think it’s worth a lot.”

“It is worth a lot.”

“…Even though I initially felt miserable receiving this coin, I couldn’t possibly throw it away because it’s worth a lot. So I realized that if I gave this coin to you instead, I can at least start paying you back after being so indebted to you.”

“Damn it.”

Bill impulsively muttered. Leyla slightly flinched but didn’t pay any mind to his curse.

Ever since the child arrived in Arvis, Bill worried about the aristocrats hurting her fragile heart. He expected them to harass the child because of her low status. All the aristocrats were the same to Bill.

Arrogant. Rude. And Condescending.


Although Bill was afraid he might make the child cry if he asked what had happened at the mansion, he could guess how bad the child was treated there.

“Leyla.”

Leyla, who had been pretending to act mature for her age, gave a childish grin when he called her name.

“Since you earned the money, take it.”

“The money I earned?”

“Yep. It’s the money you earned from your work. Dealing with a bored aristocrat is a pain in the ass but you did it. So you can confidently claim your reward.”

Leyla scrunched her eyebrows in confusion. While looking at the pondering child, Bill gulped down the thick glass of beer in front of him.

“Really?”

Leyla tilted her head as she tapped on the gold coin.

“That’s right.”

Bill swiped the alcohol that had drizzled on his beard with his sleeve.

The money I earned.

Leyla’s face suddenly started to brighten.

“Welcome to the adult world, Leyla.”

Bill sliced a huge chunk of meat and placed it on the child’s plate.

“Adult? Me?”

“If you can make money on your own, you’re considered an adult. And that’s exactly what you did.”

“I just made one gold coin?”

“There are plenty of old people who still can’t manage to earn a coin in this world. So you’re off to a pretty successful start. Because you’re off to a nice start, you’re bound to be a pretty good adult.”1

Bill soon started piling Leyla’s plate up with bread and baked vegetables.

“Uncle, it’s too much.”

Leyla’s eyes widened at the large amount of food.

“You’ve been nibbling at your food like a bird for days, so eat a lot.”

“But….”

“You know right? I like kids who eat like a cow.”

Leyla burst out laughing.

“Uncle, if I eat well, I’ll grow a lot right?”

“I suppose so. Why? Did someone bully you for being too short?”

“Not really, but I do think I look too young. It’s upsetting.”

That’s because you are still a child. Bill stopped himself from stating the obvious.

Leyla began to proficiently chop up her meat.

For Bill, it seemed like Leyla did indeed grow quite fast in the last few months. The child no longer had a body like an iron skewer. She was quite pretty. Her natural frame was small and slender like a bird so she didn’t seem like she would grow to have a big physique. There was no doubt that she would become a beauty.

Bill was surprised when his found himself praising Leyla’s beauty and shook his head to pull himself together.

For women living in poverty, beauty was poison. They were bound to be subjected to trouble. That was why Bill was determined to send the girl to a place where he can trust. The orphanage wasn’t a place he could totally trust because he believed it was the perfect place to ruin a child’s life.

Damned world. Damned humans.

Bill emptied the rest of his beer while cursing at the names of those who left the child in his care. It was hard to know why such worries were embedded in Bill Remmer’s life. He wished for days, where his life had used to be just full of flowers and trees, to come back.

“Uncle. If I earn money, it’s not a shame to spend it right?”

Leyla asked while thoroughly chewing on her food.

“Of course. Do you have something you want?”

“I used up my notebook. I want to buy a new one.”

“By all means, go ahead.”

“Do you think I can buy colored pencils as well?”

“Of course.”

“Is there anything you need?”

“Why? Are you planning to buy something for me as well?”

“Yes.”

“What if I asked you to buy me something ridiculously expensive?”

Leyla’s expression became solemn. Whenever the girl got serious, her pupils grew darker and wider, which made her seem a bit more lovely.

Bill loudly laughed as he filled up a glass of apple juice for the child.

Leyla lifted the glass and motioned Bill to clink his glass towards hers. Bill gladly bumped his glass onto the glass the child reached out. Leyla then emptied her juice all at once.

Bill started to worry if the child began to pick up his drinking habits.

He shook his head at the thought of Leyla becoming a drunkard.

I’m only allowing this just for today.

Bill persuaded himself.

The long days had continued to pass, and during those long days, Bill thought about the reasons why he couldn’t raise Leyla and wondered where to send the young girl.

Leyla. The lovely troublesome child who suddenly appeared in his life.

During those days of Bill’s endless wondering, Leyla grew.

The new clothes Bill had bought for Leyla got so short that her milky white calves started to show. The warehouse-like room meant for Leyla to temporarily reside in at one point transformed into a lady’s room. The troublesome child who used to hop around the forest trail, soon finely matured into a grown lady who now crossed the exact trail with soft steps as if gliding on water.

Bill, sitting on a chair underneath the porch, looked at Leyla with a puzzled look on his face. A young lady with a willow basket full of raspberries was waving at him.

“Uncle! You’re back early today.”

Leyla lightly ran as if she was dancing. Her attractive blonde hair, tied into a single braid, shook under the wide brim of the straw hat. The color of the lady’s two red cheeks looked as fresh as the breed of roses Bill had recently cultivated.

“You must have gone to the woods again.”

“Yes. It’s a great harvest, isn’t it?”

Leyla lifted the basket with pride.

“I’m going to pick some more tomorrow. I’m planning to make a lot of raspberry jam.”

“Are you planning to open a business or something?”

“That’s not a bad idea.”

Leyla, smiling brightly, sat on a chair placed beside Bill. Bill suddenly noticed that there were two chairs on the porch. And it wasn’t just the two chairs. Before he knew it, all the furniture in the cabin was arranged for the two of them-even though Bill still hadn’t made his decision on what to do with Leyla yet.5

Leyla placed the basket on the floor and rummaged through it to find a wild peach. She held the peach out to Bill. Bill naturally took the peach, split it in half, and gave Leyla the nicely half-sliced peach.

The two sat side by side and observed the forest while eating their peaches. The sound of leaves blowing across the clear sky tickled their ears and the birds chirping from afar were as clear as Leyla’s voice.

“It’s summer again.”

Bill muttered unconsciously. Leyla, with a silent smile on her face, took off her hat and languidly stretched her arms. When Bill found the old leather bag that ran below Leyla’s knee, he burst into a loud laughter. It was the first thing he gave her on the year she arrived.

“Are you planning to carry that old thing around until it’s worn out?”

“I like it because it’s comfortable. It’s still useful.”

Leyla held up her bag and gave it a good shake. Bill could easily figure out the identity of the rattling sound. Tin pencil case. Pocket knife. Old notes. Some beautiful feathers and flower petals. In certain aspects, she didn’t change much.

It was a normal evening.

Bill chopped up some firewood while Leyla took out and organized the dry laundry. While she skillfully prepared their dinner, she didn’t forget to feed the chicken and the goat. By the time the two faced each other from the opposite sides of the table, the sun was already down.

“Kyle’s coming over tomorrow. We’re going to study together and have dinner. That’s okay right?”1

Leyla asked while setting down her delicious smelling plate.

“Why does that rascal keep coming to my house to eat when he already has a rich father already feeding him well?”

“Even though you talk of him that way, I know you like the guy.”

“Unfortunately.”

Bill snorted. Leyla causally laughed as she placed the half-filled beer glass in front of him.

“What’s this? It’s not filled to the brim?”

“You need to cut back on drinking for your health.”

“Did that glutton Etmon tell you that?”

“Uncle!”

“That good-for-nothing fellow.”

Bill grumbled. But he did not go against Leyla’s words.



The night deepened at the end of a cozy dinner. Leyla took a leisurely bath after cleaning up and returned to her room. She was sleepy, but she decided to turn on the lamp and sat on her desk. An exam was just around the corner. Her summer break happiness depended on that exam result.

The sound of birds crying at night was carried away by the night breeze. The noise of her pencil making marks on the paper was mixed along with the sounds.

Leyla, who had been concentrating on her studies for a long time, let go of her pencil- unable to overcome the eye strain and faint headache that came over. Her eyesight, which wasn’t originally that good, now seemed to have gotten worse. Ever since she was young, she had to squint her eyes to clearly see.

Leyla turned off the lamp and lay down on her bed. She was almost on her goal to get a pair of glasses fitted for her.

Twenty bottles of raspberry jam. No, should it be thirty bottles?

Anyways, it wasn’t that far away.

Even though her problem could have gotten resolved by telling Uncle Bill, she was afraid of burdening him. He was already providing her so many things and she wasn’t able to repay him back.

When he announced that he would send Leyla to school, a fine majority of people laughed at him. They told him there was no point in educating an orphan girl. They told him she was bound to become the maid of the Herhardt family when she grew. But Bill was firm with his words. He spoke to her every day. Leyla, you’re going to be a pretty good adult.

The headache somewhat calmed down when Leyla closed her eyes. Leyla attempted to sleep, but the harder she tried, the more her mind turned clear. At a night like this, as usual, odd thoughts began to fill her blank mind.


The birds’ return. Plans for this summer. The culprit behind the series of an interesting mystery novel written in the daily newspaper. And Duke Herhardt.

When the name came to mind, Leyla gently opened her eyes. Beyond the familiar darkness, she could see the scenery out of the window.

Slightly wobbling branches, the night sky shining beyond those branches, and the moon and stars.

Staring at the blurry white light from afar, Leyla unconsciously held her breath.

The duke, who graduated from college, was commissioned as an army officer after passing the Royal Military School in accordance with the family tradition. He hadn’t visited the estate for the past several years because he was assigned to the frontier overseas . It had been a peaceful time for both Leyla and the birds in the forest.

But this summer, he was to return.

Master of Arvis, Duke Herhardt.


Chapter 5

Standing in front of the main gate of Gillis Women’s Academy, Kyle Etman’s existence was as natural as the school’s streetlights. He’s here again. The female students thought as they impressively glanced over the young man waiting.

Kyle looked over the gate and slyly grinned. He could see a young lady dragging her bicycle from afar.

Kyle could recognize who the lady was through her graceful and gallant walk.

But it wasn’t just her way of walking that he could recognize the girl.

Her face was always full of rich expressions and her body gestures were soft and subtle.

Her entire existence was everything to him. There was no other girl like Leyla and he had realized that ever since they met that summer-underneath the shade of the willow tree.4

“Leyla!

Leyla stopped when she heard someone vigorously call her name. She squinted her eyes towards the direction of the man who was approaching her.

Kyle liked those moments.

The moment the girl’s steps grew faster after she recognized who he was. The moment the girl came up to him and smiled at him gently.

“Why are you here again? It would’ve been more convenient for you to meet at the cabin.”

“Nah. I had plenty of time anyway.”

That was a lie. In order to return home from school with Leyla, he had ditched his tennis club members. Even though his seniors might have been waiting for him with a racket on their hands the next day, Kyle was not worried at this moment.

Tomorrow’s problems should be taken care of tomorrow. It’ll all resolve.1



The two students walked side by side on a busy street. They bought some ice cream as they passed by the shopping district. They then stopped by a bookstore that smelled like dust.

Leyla laughed often. Besides Uncle Bill, Kyle Etman believed he was the only one in this world who knew how often Leyla laughed in front of him and how beautiful her smile was.

As they entered the path leading to the Arvis territory, the wind got cooler. Leyla’s eyes deepened when their conversation led to the school exam. There was a bit of despair in her eyes when geometry was mentioned. Kyle carefully observed the minor changes in her facial expressions.

Not yet.

Kyle suppressed the heart fluttering words that almost came out of his mouth. He didn’t want their relationship to get uncomfortable through his hasty confession. He then wondered if it was necessary to ask her to go out with him when he was already thinking of marrying her instead.

Leyla Etman. That sounds nice. That’s good.3

“Why are you laughing?”

Leyla asked him while she frowned. She was complaining about her grade struggle in geometry until she found herself looking at Kyle dazedly chuckling.

“Huh…… Well, ah! I heard Duke Herhardt is coming back?”

Kyle suddenly changed the subject.

“It’s been a long time. When is he coming?”

“I don’t know.”

“Everyone’s been babbling on and on about Duke Herhardt returning but you don’t seem to really care.”

Leyla’s hands that were on the bicycle handle tensed up.

During the past years, there wasn’t much contact between Leyla and Duke Herhardt. They only greeted each other when they met in the woods or whenever Claudine summoned her to the mansion. Even passing by the duke was uncomfortable that she tried to avoid him at all costs.

She didn’t want to see him.

And she had never wanted to see him again ever since the day Duke Herhardt stopped her spinning gold coin with his foot that summer evening.

Claudine was the one who invited her and left her but the duke was the one who made her realize how much of an insignificant being Leyla Lewellin was in that strange, colorful world.

That encounter left a scar different from the mistreatment she experienced at Lovita. It was a memory she wanted to forget but whenever she faced the duke, he made her recall that terrible day. Leyla hated him. The duke’s appearance kept reminding her how irrelevant she was in that beautiful estate.

A black car passed by as Leyla struggled to calm her uneven breathing. Madam Norma never rode a car, so Leyla figured it was Madam Elysse, who must’ve come back from a social gathering.

“With the duke back, Arvis must be hectic for a while.”

“Yeah.”

“Oh yeah. Leyla. Should I try becoming an officer too?”

Kyle now began to walk backwards while facing Leyla.

“I want to receive a medal just like Duke Herhardt. Captain Etman, a brilliant marksman who can shoot down every enemy with just single shots.”

Kyle pretended to shoot an imaginary gun and then smiled like a naughty boy.

“Look here, Mr. Etman. You can’t even kill a chicken.”

Leyla smirked. Although his pride was hurt, Kyle failed to refute.

It was at that time last year when Kyle proudly insisted that he would pay for his meals in the cabin by helping out. Uncle Bill had ordered him to catch a chicken for dinner but when he stepped into the chicken hen, he was unable to even pull out a single feather out. That was when Etman got his embarrassing nickname: ‘the gluttonous herbivore’.

“My sweet friend Kyle Etman. That is why I like you.”

Leyla smiled at Kyle’s upset face.

“I hope you use your hands to save people’s lives instead of killing them.”

“Uh…… Of course. I am planning to become a doctor.”

Kyle awkwardly touched his cheek.

“Then should I be a military doctor? Do they give medals to military doctors?”

“If you save a lot of people, wouldn’t they give you one? It’s a better achievement than killing.”

“Really?”

The two arrived at the crossroad amidst their conversation. Etman’s house was at the end of the road leading to the left.

“Ah! I left the geometry note I promised to lend you at home.”

Kyle wrinkled his eyes in sudden realization.

“Then come in time for dinner later. Make sure to bring the notes.”

“Hey. Are you planning to wait for me or the notes?”

“The notes.”

Leyla brazenly replied as she soon burst into a mischievous laughter. Kyle started to rush home.

“You don’t have to hurry! Dinner takes time anyway!”

Leyla loudly shouted toward Kyle’s back.

“Don’t bother! I’m going straight to your house after picking up my notes!”

Kyle’s retort was even louder.+

Leyla shook her head at Kyle’s stubbornness and started to ride her bike towards the platanus road leading to the Arvis mansion.

Matthias pulled the car over in the front of the mansion driveway. The driver and the butler panicked at their master’s abrupt request.

Duke Herhardt’s return was sudden. The Arvis servants and residents were busy frantically moving around to prepare for the duke’s early arrival. As a result, his arranged social gatherings with the nobles were all moved up.

Butler Hessen swallowed his dry saliva out of nervousness.

“Master, we still haven’t…..”

“I want to take a walk.”

Matthias cut off the butler’s words with his calm tone. The driver hesitantly got off his seat and opened the back seat door.

“No.”

Matthias briefly shook his head towards Hessen, who was about to follow him out.

“See you at the mansion.”

Matthias smiled as he turned his back. Hessen obediently got back in the car at his order while the driver swiftly returned to his seat. As they drove away, the road became quiet again.

Holding his officer hat in one hand, Matthias began to leisurely walk underneath the tree shade. The sound of his boots and the sound of the leaves swaying in the wind created a strange, but pleasing harmony.

Matthias von Herhardt was a perfect child, a perfect student, and a perfect officer. And now, he was about to marry a perfect woman and become a perfect father. All of these things were so obvious in his life that he started to get somewhat bored.

Matthias gradually slowed his pace. The bright stream of light flowing through the cracks in the tree leaves made the edge of his slightly slanted eyes stand out. The light then gently flowed down upon his golden belt buckle and the shining insignia that adorned his blue-gray uniform.

‘You should get engaged this summer.’

Matthias had gladly agreed to his mother’s words; simply because it was his rightful duty to marry at the right time and give birth to a successor.

‘I think Claudine is the best lady for the next Duchess of Arvis.’

Matthias had also accepted his grandmother’s notice with good grace; simply because Claudine von Brandt was a highly qualified bride and had a brilliant lineage.

Matthias had never desired anything.

Because everything was already in his hands before he knew it. Desire was a distant emotion that seemed fictitious to him. So was marriage.

Matthias hoped for a perfect marriage.

To him, marriage was simply a stepping stone that allowed him to strengthen his world. He believed there was no need to exhaust any unnecessary emotions in a marriage. Claudine von Brandt was his most reasonable partner, and for him, she was enough. He wasn’t interested in anything else. He didn’t feel like the need to.

Matthias paused in the middle of the road. He had suddenly sensed an unexpected presence of a woman. When he raised his head, the shredded sunlight pierced his eyes.

Matthias turned his eyes at a woman riding a bicycle headed towards his way. When he slowly backed away, the woman brushed past his left. Her clear golden locks fluttered in the air like waves.

Leyla Lewellin?

The moment Matthias remembered her name, the woman flicked her head towards his direction. The woman’s green eyes widened when she met eyes with the man.

While they stared at each other, Leyla had lost her balance and fell from her bicycle. Her screams were heard as the bicycle made an impact against the ground.

Even after her collapse, the wheels of the bicycle still continued to wildly turn.

Matthias steadily approached the woman who fell on the street. The woman raised her head underneath his shadow. Without a doubt, it was Leyla Lewellin.

The little girl who was a crazy bird lover.

“…… I’m sorry, my lord.”

Leyla frantically bowed her head to apologize. She waited for him to pass her by.


Matthias was about to make his leave until he was distracted by Leyla’s clothes. Her school uniform was dirtied with dust and blood was seeping through her torn stockings.1

When the spinning bicycle wheel stopped, silence came upon the two.

Leyla raised her thinly frowned eyes and glanced at Matthias. Although the look on her face was insolent, it strangely made a soft impression.

This girl grows as well.

Although it was natural for the child to grow as time went by, her change in appearance had somehow scratched his nerves.

To Matthias, Leyla Lewellin was just a little girl. The girl who always tried to desperately avoid him. The girl who he thought was insignificant. But he could no longer see the insignificant girl he knew of in his memory with the Leyla Lewellin who stood in front of him now.

The slender lines of her body showing underneath the thin, summer school uniform were no longer those of a skinny child as well as her fresh cheeks, lips, and her soft body scent carried by the wind.

Leyla struggled to get up as Matthias felt a strange displeasure. Taking a step back, she fixed her shoes and dusted off her school uniform. Although Leyla was now a grown woman, her height had still failed to reach the tip of the duke’s chin.

“Leyla Lewellin.”

Matthias impulsively called. Leyla’s shoulders flinched at his voice.

“I’m sorry, my lord.”

Repeating the same words over again, Leyla crouched under his feet and began picking up her scattered items.

Bag. Books. Notebook.

Matthias’s eyes moved along the small, pale hands that were soiled with dust and blood. His gaze fixated on a pen Leyla gently nudged while gathering her stuff.

Matthias slowly took a step forward and purposely stepped on the pen. Leyla only then glanced up and saw his eyes filled with irritation.

“Leyla Lewellin.”

He called her again.

“I’m talking to you.”

“Yes, my lord.”


Leyla answered as she tightly closed her eyes. She struggled to pull the pen out of his feet but Matthias didn’t bother to budge.

“I’m listening.”

Leyla said quite confidently even though her body trembled. Her green eyes that had resembled the vivid summer forest sparkled in anger mixed with humiliation. She was suddenly reminded of the time when the duke stepped on her gold coin. On that day and today as well, the duke was looking down at Leyla with the same expression and the same gaze.

After letting out a silent laugh, Matthias lifted his foot and nonchalantly passed by Leyla. He put on his officer hat and started walking leisurely along the road as if nothing had happened.

Leyla blankly stared at the back of the distant Duke Herhardt.

Why would he do such a thing if he’s not going to say anything?1

Leyla’s pen twitched in her hands.

Would the people of Arvis believe that Duke Herhardt, who’s praised as the perfect aristocrat, act like this?

She bet her whole savings that no one would ever believe her. Everyone would’ve called her crazy.

Leyla tightly closed her lips and pulled up her bicycle. She made sure to thoroughly wipe the pen and placed it in her bag.

She then started to follow the duke who was walking at a slow pace. Her skin that had peeled-off was terribly sore. Even though she was sure the duke wouldn’t look back, she tried to walk properly. To prevent herself from limping, she constantly flexed her leg muscles.

It would’ve been great if he used those long legs to walk faster.

When Leyla was about to sigh out of frustration, Duke Herhardt had abruptly turned around. The soft wind shook the tree leaves and the pattern of the sunlight oozing through the leaves bounced over the path in a slow rhythm.

The surprised Leyla stood still. Matthias focused his eyes on her face. His gaze slowly shifted downwards along her loose, wavy hair and then onto her body.

The upright chest irregularly panting up and down. The pale hand holding the bicycle handle. The unbelievably narrow ankle and petite feet.

And then the eyes.

Matthias examined Leyla’s emerald-colored eyes for a long time in deafening silence.


Leyla was still just an orphan living in the dugout located on his estate, but one crucial fact had seemed to change everything.

Time passed and the child grew.

And when he accepted that fact, he noticed Leyla.

She was no longer a child. That woman, Leyla Lewellin.


Chapter 6

There was always a nominal meeting scheduled at the Herhardt’s mansion every summer. But this year, everyone knew that Claudine von Brandt did not visit Arvis just for that simple reason.

The meeting was created for the two families to pre-negotiate and promote friendship between the different parties before announcing the engagement to the public. The two families’ purpose of the meeting was clear and neither side had tried to hide it. Especially Claudine.

“Hello, Duke Herhardt.”

Claudine greeted Matthias with perfect courtesy. The cousin that stood in front of Matthias had grown into a refined lady. He could barely see any traces of the short, whiny girl.

“Welcome, Lady Brandt.”

Matthias also formally greeted Claudine back.

The two gracefully smiled at each other.

There was nothing new going on between the two. Although they weren’t very close or intimate, they have seen each other for a long time, so they both knew: how thoroughly aristocratic Matthias von Herhardt and Claudine von Brandt were to the bones. And that was the most biggest and obvious reason why they chose each other.

Matthias skillfully escorted Claudine. Elysse von Herhardt had ordered her servants to prepare their afternoon tea in the glass greenhouse connected to the back of the mansion. It was one way of showing Elysse’s consideration for Claudine because she loved the greenhouse.

“This greenhouse is always beautiful every time I visit. It’s as if Duchess Elysse has moved heaven in here.”

Claudine, who drank the tea without a sound, gladly complimented. She spoke in a cheerful, yet calm manner like a courteous lady.

“I’ve spent so much time decorating this place. I’m looking forward to passing it on to a hostess who knows its value.”

Elysse von Herhardt replied in a soft voice. Countess Brandt glanced at her daughter with a proud and emotional look. Claudine gave a moderate, shy smile.

“Matthias, show Claudine around Arvis’s heaven.”

Elysse von Herhardt whispered at the end of their tea time. Full-scale negotiations seemed to have started taking place.


As Matthias extended his hand, Claudine smoothly placed her translucent lace gloved hands over Matthias’s. The sudden image of the pale white hand, stained with dust and blood, was briefly revived over Matthias’s head and then disappeared.

The two walked along the trail as they conversed on a moderate topic. A slow stream of water flowed down from the marble fountain that adorned the center of the greenhouse. The clear cries of birds diluted the afternoon’s languid atmosphere.

Claudine stealthily glanced at Matthias. Even though he always had a peaceful smile, it was hard to read his true emotions. As well as his attitude towards the world.

He was a man of impeccable politeness but he was also a man of arrogance who had never bowed down to anyone in his life. He was quite an interesting subject to observe, according to Claudine of course.

“The birds in this greenhouse are really pretty.”

Claudine marveled at the colorful birds perching on the branches. Matthias had only now recognized the existence of these birds in the glass greenhouse.

Arvis’ current hostess, Elysse von Herhardt, loved birds as much as she loved roses. Just as how the gardeners were in charge of growing the roses, the zookeepers were in charge of caring for the birds in the greenhouse. Elysse’s role was to just enjoy the view.

That was how Elysse von Herhardt viewed her beautiful world.

Enjoy the work others had completed for her.

“I can’t believe it. This one’s so obedient. What’s your secret?”

Claudine asked as she smiled at the small bird that had landed on her hand.

Matthias leisurely looked around his surrounding. The birds in this greenhouse were surprisingly docile. Even though the window was wide open, the birds didn’t dare to fly away. They continued to sing beautifully in the tranquil environment.

Matthias observed the parrot waddling over its perch and the Bengalese finch singing on Claudine’s hand. He then focused his attention to the gray-haired zookeeper. The zookeeper slowly walked in front of Claudine and answered.

“I cut their wings, Miss. Then, they can neither fly away nor escape so they become submissive. If I let them be with their wings uncut, they become impossible for me to tame.”

“Wings? Wouldn’t that hurt them?”

“I only cut their feathers so they won’t feel pain. It’s actually a good thing for the birds because it’ll prevent them from accidentally flying to dangerous places and get injured. Would you like for me to demonstrate?”

“Would that be okay, Lord Herhardt?”

Claudine asked with her eyes twinkling.

“As you wish, my lady.”

When Matthias willingly gave his permission, the zookeeper escorted them to a large cage located at the end of the greenhouse. There were birds whose wings weren’t clipped yet.

The zookeeper pulled out a gorgeous, yellowish colored bird among the flock of birds and approached the workbench.

“What type of bird is it?”

Matthias asked as he watched the bird.

“It’s a canary, master. A lovely singing bird.”

The zookeeper briefly answered as he covered the bird’s eyes with a small handkerchief and then spread its wings with his left hand. The zookeeper swiftly grabbed a pair of sharp scissors with his remaining hand.

The zookeeper moved the scissors’s blade without hesitation. The feathers of the cut wings scattered over the workbench. He finished up his work by snipping off the other side of the wings and let the bird free.1

The bird fluttered its wings desperately, but it did not fly far and slowly sank. As if the bird couldn’t deny the fact that it could no longer fly, it tried to fly away several more times, but the result was the same.

While watching, Matthias leaned his waist forward and picked up the panting yellow bird resting at the end of the flower bed. The little bird trapped in his grasp began to struggle and chirp, but its chirp sounded more like a scream than a song.

“It doesn’t get tamed easily, master. It takes time for the bird to get used to the clipping.”

Matthias handed the bird over to the zookeeper.

“Would you like to try taming one, Miss?”

The zookeeper gently caressed the bird to calm it.

“I’m interested in watching animals, not taming them. Thank you for resolving my curiosity.”

Claudine politely refused and turned.

“Let’s return to the tea table now.”


This time, Claudine reached out her hand first. The memory of the beautiful, sculpture-like hand that was soiled with dust and blood briefly came into Matthias’s mind once again and then faded away.

Before he left the area with Claudine, Matthias left an impulsive order.

“Take it to the bedroom.”

“….. Pardon?”

The zookeeper’s eyes widened at the unexpected remark.

“That bird.”1

Matthias pointed to the bird with this thinly opened eyes.

“My canary.”

Leyla neatly tied her combed blonde hair into a single ponytail. After that, she wore an apron and didn’t forget to pick up her massive basket.

“I’m going to put an end to this.”

Leyla’s face, as she muttered to herself, was quite serious.

In addition to Duke Herhardt’s arrival, Lady Brandt had visited Arvis several days ago. As a result, Leyla was in a rush. She had to gather up all the raspberries in the forest before she came across the duke or before she got summoned by Lady Brandt. Thankfully, the two were busy. It seemed like they were getting ready for their engagement to go public.

Wearing a wide-brimmed straw hat, Leyla made a quick step towards the forest. There, she found a bush of overgrown raspberries. No matter how hard the people of Arvis and the forest animals worked and ate, there were still plenty of fruits falling on the floor and rotting away.

Leyla, who diligently roamed around the forest, filled up the basket before noon. Even though she felt like her arms were about to fall out because of the basket’s heavy weight, she felt lighthearted.

Leyla threw her basket under the tree shade. She then swiftly headed towards the river to thoroughly remove the traces of the fierce raspberry scent and color off her hands and her face.

The Schulter River encased the Herhardt’s garden and its valleys. The river looked beautiful from the city center, but the place where the Schulter River looked the best was at the Arvis cemetery.

Leyla took out a handkerchief from her apron and wiped off the water droplets drizzling down her face. The refreshing river played a big role in cooling down the scorching weather during the summer. Leyla thought of dipping her feet into the river but she then shook her head.

There were five cousins older than Leyla in her aunt’s house, where she first resided in before getting sent out. Everyone was rough and mischievous. One day, her cousins had dragged and plunged Leyla


into a river. They justified themselves by stating it was her initiation ceremony into the household. If it weren’t for her neighbor who saved her after hearing her yells, Leyla would have been taken by the water ghost.

Even though it was her cousins in the wrong, Leyla was the one who was beaten that night by her drunk uncle. And within a few weeks, she was driven out and had moved to her next relative’s house. They said they couldn’t take care of a child who took their kindness for granted.

Although it was unfair, Leyla decided to consider it as a good thing because she believed her next relative’s house would be better to her.

The next house. The house after the next. Every time she was passed on from one place to another, she hoped for a better treatment. She thought her earnest wishes came true when she finally settled down at Uncle Bill’s cabin.

So all was good.

Leyla turned around and headed underneath the tree. She put the newspaper that was pinned in the corner of the basket into her apron pocket and began to climb the tree. Although she wasn’t as quick and agile as before, she had her know-hows. She learned it from Uncle Bill.

Leyla sat cozily on the tree branch like a fitted chair. She firmly believed the Schulter River was the most magnificent river in the world. Kyle, who was used to traveling to many cities, agreed to her words. Leyla thought her opinion was proved to be an objective fact.

She observed the water birds looking for food as the fresh scent of the river seeped into her nose.

Summer was definitely a heavenly season.

Leyla, with a determined look on her face, suddenly opened the newspaper from her apron pocket and flipped to the mystery serial novel page. The detective, with his brilliant brain, was about to expose the criminal through his deductions.

She began to excitedly race through the novel.



It was only after a while when Matthias emerged his face out of the water’s surface.

His distinct Adam’s apple moved up and down to the rhythm of his heavy breathing. The man’s healthy, nude body reflected over the river current.

When he was about to return to his mansion, Matthias had changed his mind and began to swim towards the direction of the current.

Matthias, who liked the Schulter River and the Arvis forest, moved to the boathouse next to the dock, where he could see the whole landscape in the mini annex. His grandmother and mother rarely walked near the riverside so the place was Matthias’s private world.


When there were no visitors stopping by the mansion, Matthias often visited the annex in order to blankly stare at the landscape beyond the window, read a book, or even take a nap if he was bored. It was the most comfortable place to do anything. Of course, his most favorite thing to do was when he entrusted his body into the river just like now.

While lying in the water, Matthias stared up at the sky covered in between the green branches. The wind permeated the sound of leaves swaying and the sound of rippling water along with the birds’ cries. He could exceptionally feel the river’s calmness today as the mansion had been noisy over the last few days.

Negotiation contracts on the marriage the Herhardt and the Brandt household were about to sign had been going along smoothly. If nothing unusual came up, his engagement with Claudine was to be announced before the end of this summer.

Matthias agreed for his engagement period to last for about a year.

If he gained enough honor as the Duke of Arvis, he didn’t have to maintain his position as officer any longer. After spending around one or two years in the military division, he was at the most appropriate moment to discharge from the military and get married. He planned to focus all his attention on his family business after the marriage.

It was a life that he would go along like the flow of the calm current.

Matthias resigned his body to the river as his eyes closed. The warm sunshine, cold currents, and the sound of ripples breaking down in his ears felt as if that was everything in his world. But the moment he opened his eyes again, his perfect peace was disturbed.

There was a woman sitting on the branches of the steady tree standing by the river. Before he could blink, Matthias instantly recognized the woman’s identity. At that same moment, the woman who folded up her newspaper she was reading turned her head towards him.+

It was that annoying woman, Leyla Lewellin.


Chapter 7

For a long time, Leyla thought she was hallucinating.1

Leyla often did. Because of her bad eyesight, she saw the fruit that fell from the tree as a squirrel and she often got startled thinking a tree branch floating in the water was a person.

But this time, the visible silhouette was no doubt, a person. And it was a man. A tall, naked man. When his wet, black hair came into view, she could no longer cling onto her self-justification that it was an illusion.

Right now, that thing floating on the current was undeniably Duke Matthias von Herhardt.

The bewildered Leyla dropped the newspaper in her hand. If she hadn’t reflexively grasped the tree branch, she would have fallen to the ground along with her newspaper.

Her conscious told her.

Close your eyes right now. No, get off the tree as fast as you can and leave this forest. Or at least scream in shock.

But all Leyla could do was speechlessly stare at the man without any clothes on. It was indeed Duke Herhardt. The man just stared back at Leyla with no intention of hiding his naked body while still floating in the water.

I hope he’ll just wash away with the current!

By the time the wind started to eagerly blow, the duke suddenly began to swim towards the shore of the river, where Leyla was.

“Ah, no!”

Leyla’s scream reverberated high into the clear sky.

“No! Don’t come! You can’t come!”

Shrieking with fear, Leyla frantically descended from the tree.

She didn’t bother to show her courtesy towards the duke. She couldn’t think of anything. Leyla discarded her basket as well as her hat and simply ran. She ran without realizing how swift how legs moved into the forest.

“Leyla!”

Around the middle of the trail leading to the cabin, Leyla came across Kyle. The puzzled Kyle caught Leyla, who almost fell over.

“Where have you been? I was on my way to find you because you weren’t at home.”

“Kyle, Kyle, what should I do?”

Leyla’s hoarsely muttered as she breathed heavily like a half-crazy person.

“Why? What’s going on? Did you come across a wild animal?”

When Leyla vigorously shook her head, Kyle looked further beyond the road. There wasn’t anything in sight. There was just an ordinary forest in front of them.

“Then what is it? Why are you so surprised?”

“…… What should I do?”

Leyla collapsed to the ground in tears. She used her apron hem to cover her face and shook her head several times.

She didn’t want to remember, but the image of his well-built body kept appearing in her head.

Leyla clasped her hair.

“What should I do? What should I do, Kyle?”

“I’ll answer you if you could just tell me what the problem is. What the hell is it?”

Kyle frowned as he kneeled down in front of Leyla. It wasn’t long before Leyla’s face turned as red as a ripe raspberry.

“Hey, what the hell did you see? Did you see a ghost?”

Kyle began to giggle.

No.

Leyla wanted to say but her lips did not budge.

Something scarier than that.1

The words she quietly muttered poured out through her hot gasps.



The wild scene that had occurred front of him was so unbelievable, Matthias lost his breath. Drops of water from the wet end of his hair trickled down his nose.

After swimming to the dock of the annex, Matthias got dressed and returned towards the tree. It was all after Leyla had dumped all her luggage and ran off.

Matthias looked through Leyla’s traces. A large basket and a hat underneath the tree. A newspaper on the floor. A wet handkerchief.


He let out a false laugh after scanning the basket full of raspberries. Was she planning to exterminate all the raspberries growing in the Arvis forest? He was amazed to imagine that girl carrying such a huge basket with her slim arms.

Come to think of it, this was the exact tree where he almost shot that little child.

Matthias glanced up at the beautiful tree. He also remembered the time when the little face, sitting on the branch, vacantly stared at him. He burst into laughter.

No way, she still plays around climbing trees.

He was thinking of chasing after her but he changed his mind and headed towards the mansion.

Matthias was scheduled to meet the directors of his family company this afternoon. Although he wasn’t directly involved in the management of the company, it was his job to look over their plans. He also had to oversee the overall structure and the work quality of his subordinates.

The Herhardt family expanded their scope to trade and resources based on their land assets. Matthias’s grandfather, who acquired a huge fortune for the family, had made the bold choice to invest in the oil fields in the new empire.

All the honor and authority that had been built through the previous owners of the Herhardt household were now in the hands of Matthias.

Matthias was well aware of that and he knew it was his greatest duty to maintain the honor and authority and pass them onto the next Herhardt. He was confident that he would perform his duty more perfect than anyone else. He had never doubted himself.

Matthias headed straight to the bedroom after he arrived in the mansion. He changed his clothes and cleaned up his disheveled hair.

After all that preparation, Matthias obliquely leaned against the chair positioned by the window on the west side of the bedroom. There was still an hour remaining until his next appointment.

Judging that it was a waste to simply sit and wait, he was about to rise from his chair until he heard a bird’s cry.

Matthias headed his gaze towards the direction of the sound. The canary in the birdcage was singing on the table. He had used to believe the bird didn’t know how to sing because it was so quiet but now, the canary sang beautifully enough to overshadow his past thoughts.

Matthias slowly approached and opened the birdcage door. The canary, who stopped singing, flapped its clipped wings and escaped the cage.

He was thinking of leaving the bedroom but had changed his mind and observed the bird while leaning against the window frame. The tiny thing was very diligent. It flew a little, fell, and then hovered around the room without taking a break.


The canary eventually got exhausted and gently sat down on the chair’s armrest. Matthias picked the bird up to put it back into the cage. Instead of struggling and letting out an ear-splitting cry, the canary obediently entrusted itself to its owner.

Matthias was fascinated by the change in the bird’s attitude so he tried placing the bird on his finger. He thought the bird would’ve run away but it unexpectedly stayed still as it boldly stared back at him.

“It feels like I’ve met a new world.”

Leyla absent-mindedly whispered in shock. The gray-haired optician laughed heartily.

“It’s understandable. Your eyesight was pretty bad. You must’ve had a hard time.”

“No, it wasn’t all that bad. Except for when I had to read a book.”

Leyla cheerfully answered while putting down her glasses after she had lifted them up. The cloudy world magically became clear. Leyla was once again thrilled by the obvious.

The numerous raspberries the forest provided turned into jam through Leyla’s fingertips. When she had enough money to match her glasses, Leyla rode her bike downtown. She easily found the optician’s shop that she used to frequently pass by.

After conversing with the optician for a few more minutes, she left the store. The scenery outside became too crystal-clear that it was a little foreign, but amazing.

Leyla expressed her gratitude and love towards the wild fruits of the Arvis forest, which shined brightly in the summer sunlight. She also thanked herself for stirring raspberry jam in front of the fire underneath the scorching sun.

But why was she remembered of that terrible memory on such a happy day?

Leyla suddenly frowned upon the day she unintentionally saw the duke’s naked body.

How embarrassed and scared she was.

Leyla hadn’t dared to go back to pick up her basket and hat until the sun came down.

When she finally went back, the forest was serene and the river peacefully glistened.

The relieved Leyla hurriedly left the river with her basket and hat. But her cheeks had continued to burn. She was so distracted that she didn’t even how heavy the basket was in her arms. After that day, she was embarrassed to even look at Uncle Bill and Kyle.

Even though it’s his estate, how could he swim nude in the river? In the broad daylight?

Leyla shook her head to shake off the hateful memory.

I shouldn’t go to the riverside until the duke leaves this estate.


Leyla made a pledge to herself and was about head towards the direction of the cabin until she heard a familiar voice.

“…… Leyla?”

This high, clear voice was undoubtedly Claudin von Brandt’s.

Yep. That’s her alright.

Leyla collected her breath and slowly turned herself around. She prepared herself with a courteous smile. But when she unexpectedly met eyes with Duke Herhardt, the man who had disturbed Leyla’s mind just a few moments ago, she froze.

Leyla could clearly see the man standing in front of her.

Leyla frantically turned her eyes over to Claudine, who stood beside him. While Duke Herhardt was out working as an officer in the overseas front, Claudine didn’t visit Arvis as much as she used to. It had been quite a while ever since Leyla saw the lady. Claudine had matured into a flawless woman.

Leyla politely gave her respects and the two gracefully nodded to accept her greeting.

“When did you start wearing glasses? I almost didn’t recognize you.”

Leyla hoped for her to leave but Claudine spoke again.

Leyla faced her with a prepared smile. She tried hard to not meet eyes with Duke Herhardt.

“Have you been well?”

Claudine meticulously examined Leyla with her thinly opened eyes.

“Yes, Miss.”

“We were on our way for tea.”

Claudine pointed to the hotel across the street with her eyes.

Yes, Miss. Or I see, Miss.

Leyla was contemplating over which response to answer when Claudine generously said,

“Let’s go together, Leyla.”

“What?”

“It’s been a long time since we met, so I’d like to have a cup of tea with you. It that alright, Duke Herhardt?”


Claudine asked Matthias. Matthias expressed his consent with a slight grin at the tip of his lips. They didn’t seem to care about what Leyla had to say. As usual.

The two began to start their walk as Leyla followed from behind. The servants who accompanied them quietly followed suit.

Leyla sighed and dragged her bicycle. The creaking sound of the old wheel mingled to the sound of the footsteps.


Chapter 8

The doorman looked flustered.

Leyla nodded towards him as if she understood. She was sure one’s ever brought a junk bicycle to the best hotel in the city.

After the doorman took several turns of examining Leyla and Claudine, he took away her bicycle. Leyla expressed her gratitude with a short greeting and entered the hotel. The tearoom was sitting on the right side of the central lobby.

Coming with his quick steps, the manager guided them to the terrace that was headed to the riverside.

Leyla was the last to sit at the table. Her seat had happened to be facing right across Duke Herhardt.

Leyla hurriedly focused her eyes on her legs in order to avoid his vacant stare. The thin, gold-rimmed glasses glistened in the summer sun.

Shouldn’t the person who was seen naked be more embarrassed than the person who saw it?

Leyla was amazed at the duke who continued to casually look at Leyla as if nothing had ever happened at the river.

It was understandable. To the aristocrats, commoners and servants were nothing more than furniture or painting. No one was ashamed of being naked in front of a furniture. And there wasn’t a furniture that was ashamed to see a naked person.

When Leyla reached her conclusion, the tea-table was set up. Even though Duke Herhardt didn’t order anything, there was a cup of strong-scented coffee placed in front of him. His fingers holding the teacup were very smooth and long.

Claudine and Matthias continued their own conversation as if they had completely forgotten about Leyla’s presence. The exhibition they saw today. An update on their relatives. A weekend party at the mansion. Matthias’s soft, low tone and Claudine’s fluttering, high tone crossed at regular intervals.

Leyla wondered why they decided to bring her along if they were going to converse among themselves. Lady Brandt’s actions were largely beyond Leyla’s understanding. She never understood her ever since the first summer they met.2

“So, Leyla. How’s school? Are you having fun?”

Claudine’s voice was suddenly heard along with the sound of the cup being laid down on the saucer. Although she was only a year older than Leyla, she always spoke as if she was talking to a child in an adult-like way.

“Yes, Miss.”

For Uncle Bill. Leyla incanted in her head while she answered Claudine.


With a satisfied nod, Claudine formally asked a few more questions about Leyla’s school life and Leila repeatedly answered with a consistent smile.

‘Yes, Miss’ was what Claudine had only expected from Leyla’s responses. And Leyla was accustomed to answering that way.

“You’ll be graduating next year right?”

Although she had a dull look, Claudin’s tone was rather amiable.

“Yes, Miss.”

Leyla continued to answer faithfully.

“What are you planning to do after graduation?”

“I’m taking a class preparing for a teacher certification.”

“A teacher…”

Claudine stretched the corners of lips as she grasped the teacup. The ribbon and the corsage that decorated her small hat shook along with her nods.

“Good girl, Leyla. That’s a great goal. I think it would suit you very well.”

Claudine smiled again, praising the commendable child.

“Isn’t that right, Duke Herhardt?”

Leyla inadvertently turned her eyes towards Matthias. With her glasses on, his eyes gave off a more lucid blue color. When Leyla realized that she had been staring at the duke for too long, she hurriedly dropped her gaze.

“I see.”

He casually expressed his agreement. After that, Leyla’s presence faded away again. Leyla was relieved.

She simply wanted this uncomfortable teatime to quickly end.

She was supposed to meet Kyle in town, who had gone out to play tennis. She was worried was late for her promise.

The anxious Leyla raised her head. At the same time, Matthias turned his eyes and met hers. Instead of avoiding eye contact like before, Leyla looked back at him in silence.

When she was young, she thought his blue colored eyes would make a clear, tingling sound. They resembled her of a round, sapphire-colored glass candy. Leyla shook her head at her young self’s absurd thoughts.

“Well, pardon me, Duke Herhardt and Lady Claudine.”

Leyla could no longer stand waiting in silence and opened her sweet lips.

“May I be excused?”

After she moved her gaze from Matthias’s eyes to Claudine’s face, she felt like she could breathe again.

“I have made a promise to meet my friend later today.”

Leyla nervously but impatiently said.

Claudine smiled and gave her permission with a nod. Leyla relieved her tensed up face.

After she gave her polite farewell, Leyla hurried out of the hotel and pedaled her bicycle frantically across the busy streets. However, the further she pedaled away from the man, the more vivid his face appeared in her head.

It’s because of the glasses. Leyla thought with a heavy breath. She believed her glasses was the main reason why she was bewitched by the duke. It was natural to have her breath taken away at the sight of the duke with her improved eyesight.

When she was about to feel faint and dizzy from all that pedaling, Leyla arrived at her appointment. Kyle was there first. He broadly smiled and waved towards Leyla.1

She had entered her safe world.

“She’s grown up quite a bit, hasn’t she? She seems like a lady now.”

Claudine looked towards the direction Leyla had left. She sounded like Leyla was her daughter even though she was only a year older.

“Because she is a lady.”

Matthias gave a moderate, impassive answer with his proper smile.

“Yes. Because she is one.”

Claudine, lost in thought for a moment, then smiled as brightly as the summer sun.

“Oh. Did you hear? Riette had recently bought a nice new car.”

Claudine skillfully changed the subject.

The two resumed their conversation in the world they shared. It was as if Leyla Lewellin, who used to sit on the opposite side of their table, had never been there in the first place. But Leyla had revealed herself in front of Matthias again at an unexpected place.


After having a relaxing tea time, Matthias was on his way back to his mansion. The road was congested so his car was stopped. Matthias casually glanced out of the car window. Leyla was there. While dragging her bicycle, she was walking along the street with a boy. It seemed like the friend she had promised to meet.

Matthias then remembered the name of the boy with a familiar face. The doctor’s son. Kyle Etman.

Leyla Lewellin shouted at the boy who kept tapping on her glasses but the boy’s mischief became more naughty. Leyla sighed in frustration and then laughed.

After a long time of laughing and joking around, the two stopped in front of the library stairs. Leyla parked her bicycle and sat at the end of the stairs. The boy followed her with a paper bag. Two bottles of soda and a sandwich came out of the bag.

Leyla Lewellin and the boy sat side by side and shared their food. Every time the boy said something, Leyla laughed. And when Leyla laughed, the boy laughed along with her. In the meanwhile, the congested road started to clear out.

When the car started running again, Matthias moved his gaze away and turned towards Claudine, who was sitting on the opposite side of the car window.

The two smiled at each other and once again, their proper conversation began. At that moment, Matthias unconsciously recalled his memory during their teatime. Leyla Lewellin never touched the teacup in front of her. She sat still in an upright position with her hands on her knees and then left quietly.

She left me for the boy.

The painful truth evoked his recollection of Leyla’s nervous and agonized expression.

She wanted to go to the boy.

When his thoughts reached that point, his memory of Leyla’s back, which was leaving the hotel terrace, was revived. She had hurried as if she was running away.

She left me, to go to the boy.1

The car carrying the two had already entered the platanus road leading to the Arvis estate.

When Claudine and Matthias passed by the very road where Leyla had fallen from her bicycle, Matthias admitted. Leyla Lewellin couldn’t dare to be anything to him. Yet, he was not very happy about this emotion he was experiencing.



“Since I ate your sandwich, I’ll buy you ice cream.”


Leyla stood up from the library stairs with a light smile. She carefully packed the empty paper bag along with the bottled drinks and placed them into her bicycle basket.

“No thanks. You don’t have to owe me.”

Kyle got on Leyla’s bike with a slightly awkward smile. Leyla naturally sat on the back seat of the bike. He could clearly feel Leyla’s body temperature being transmitted to his back even in the midday heat.

Kyle started pedaling, trying to cool off the warmth from his cheeks.

She can hold onto me a little tighter.

Leyla held his shirt so gently that it seemed like she was tantalizing him. But he was still satisfied with her grip.

He had purposely left his bike behind in order to ride Leyla’s bike with her. Of course, Leyla was oblivious of his intentions.

“You know what, Kyle.”

Leyla’s soft voice permeated through the rushing wind.

“Yeah?”

“I’ll still buy you ice cream.”

He was wondering about what she had to say so he laughed at her sudden offer.

“Tell me honestly. You just want to eat ice cream, don’t you?

“….. It’s not like that.”

It was like that.

Kyle pulled up his bike in front of the ice cream shop while Leyla ran inside.

He was about to follow her inside but he changed his mind and leaned against the store wall to cool off underneath the shade. Leyla soon came out with two vanilla ice cream cones in both her hands.

The two ate ice cream alongside each other. Although this was one of their daily routines, Kyle kept gazing at Leyla. Her new glasses seemed unfamiliar to him.

“Leyla.”

Kyle softly whispered her name. When Leyla turned her head, her cheeks were red. Although her cheeks were red because of the hot weather, Kyle’s heart palpitated loudly. After nervously swallowing his saliva, he gulped down his ice cream in one big bite.2

“It’s delicious. The ice cream.”

Leyla smiled after waiting for Kyle’s words.

“I know right? Vanilla’s my favorite flavor.”

Leyla looked up at the clear summer sky. Kyle stared at Leyla’s long, thin neck as he started to eat his ice cream again.

It was cold and sweet.


Chapter 9

“Is she the one? The orphan the gardener is raising?”

Wrinkles formed on Countess Brandt’s forehead as she gazed at the garden over the window. A lady in glasses was helping the gardener organize the rose garden.

“Yes, mother. Leyla, it’s her.”

Claudine bluntly answered.

While Countess Brandt was distracted by Leyla, Claudine calmly moved her needle through the cloth.

Colorful roses bloomed from her fingertips as she diligently finished up her embroidery.

“She’s a very pretty girl. I think she’s getting prettier as she matures.”

“Doesn’t that bother you?”

“I know what you’re worried about, mother.”

Claudine put down her embroidered cloth. Countess Brandt’s eyes were wide open with a worried look on her face.

The weak Countess Brandt had one daughter after a series of miscarriages. That child was Claudine, the Brandt household’s only daughter.

The countess, who was suffering from an inferiority complex of being unable to provide her husband a successor, lived in fear of her husband falling out of love. Although the count’s mistress was also unable to provide him a son, Countess Brandt was still worried. Worried that one day, some young, beautiful woman will show up and birth him a son and take away everything.

Claudine felt sorry for her mother. But she was tired of her mother’s excessive concerns.

“I don’t want to dwell on those type of things.”

Claudine’s words were solemn as if she was making a declaration. The countess helplessly sighed.

“You’re too young to know men. Claudine, if I were you…..”

“You would get rid of all the beautiful women in the world out of Duke Herhardt’s sight?”

Claudine let out an exaggerated sigh.

“As you said, I am still young and I don’t know men that well. But I do know that men of great reputation usually have one or two mistresses alongside them.”

“Oh, my God. Claudine!”

“Of course, I hope such a thing doesn’t happen, but even if it does happen, I know it’s not a big deal.”

Claudine lightly shrugged.

When she had recently come across Leyla by chance, the usually calm Claudine was surprised. Although it was natural for a sweet girl to grow into a beautiful woman, Leyla’s mature appearance was more beautiful than expected.

With her unique, small body and delicate facial features, she looked like a fairy. The combination of her mysterious green eyes and her transparent white skin enhanced her resemblance to one.

That was the reason why Claudine had asked Leyla to accompany her for tea. She was curious. Curious to know how the Duke would react to such a woman. And he had exactly acted up to Claudine’s expectations. With proper interest and indifference, with perfect decency and moderation. That was enough for Claudine.1

“But Claudine, there’s nothing good about keeping that child close to Matthias.”

Countess Brant still looked restless.

“Why don’t I have a talk with the Herhardt household?”

“Mother.”

Claudine’s voice sank low.

Claudine was determined that she wouldn’t live like her mother, who cried because of love despite the fact that she had everything. That was why Claudine agreed to be engaged to Matthias.

Matthias von Herhardt was noble, rich, and handsome. Claudine believed that kind of man would never only love his wife that he married in an arranged marriage. She knew her life wasn’t the happy ending of a fairy tale.

Maybe he too might be swept away by his desire for a beautiful woman. Like father. Like so many other men.

But men who regarded their mistress simply as a mistress were harmless. It was men who didn’t regard their mistress simply as a mistress that caused trouble. Claudine was sure Matthias was the former type of man.

Do I love him?

Claudine tilted her head and just smiled.

Maybe. Maybe not. But it wasn’t a big deal. Matthias knew that as well.


What mattered to her the most was whether the Duke of Arvis was capable of playing the role of a great husband and the role of a perfect father. Claudine simply wanted that. A marriage that could protect her dignity and elegance.

“What’s the big deal if Duke Herhardt’s interested in that humble, beautiful child?”

The words that were calmly brought out by Claudine astonished Countess Brandt.

“My God, Claudine! What the hell are you talking about?”

“She’ll simply just become a mistress at least.”

Claudine laughed.

“It actually might be convenient for me for a girl like that to become a mistress. A woman who can’t dare to threaten my place, who I can tame with the grasp of my palms.”

“Claudine, my child. You…… you really don’t know anything about love.”

Countess Brandt’s lament for her daughter deepened.

She looked into her mother’s shiny blue eyes and then turned her head away with a strange smile.

She looked at Leyla out the window. The woman stood up from the flower bed and was laughing while massaging her back.

The cabin was empty when Kyle arrived. Leyla and Uncle Bill had seemed to have gone to the garden together. Kyle sat on the porch chair, waiting for the two to come back.

When he thought of Leyla’s face with glasses on, Kyle grinned. The future Mrs. Etman was attractive even in glasses. Although he initially felt a little strange looking at her new appearance, his heart now fluttered at the thought of her face.3

Kyle purposely coughed in order to prevent himself from having his cheeks turn red. Around that time, Leyla and Uncle Bill had returned.

“What the hell is that hat?”

Kyle’s brow frowned when saw a rustic hat covering Leyla’s lovely face.

“Wow. So tacky. You didn’t pay for that, did you?”

When Kyle mischievously teased her, Leyla’s and Bill’s eyes both turned towards him. Their glares were quite fierce.

“Uncle bought it for me!”

Leyla shouted as she scowled at Kyle. Bill retorted by picking up the shovel he had loaded on the cart.

“On second thought. Wow, it’s pretty! Uncle Bill has a good eye!”

Kyle hurriedly changed his view.

“Don’t make fun of it. It’s really precious to me.”

Leyla took off the problematic hat with a look of disapproval. It was a rather glitzy straw hat, lavishly dressed with artificial flowers and ribbons.

Leyla prepared lunch while Bill was busy putting away his cart. The problematic hat was placed at the end of the table. Kyle sat in front of the hat and tried to read Leyla’s expression.

“Leyla, are you mad?”

“Yeah.”

Leyla slammed Kyle’s plate down as hard as she could.

At least she’s still feeding me.

Kyle was relieved.

“I’m sorry. You know I wouldn’t have said that if I knew?”

“Whatever.”

“But why did Uncle Bill decide to gift you a hat?”

“Because I asked him to.”

“You? You know how to ask for stuff?”

Kyle asked in surprise. The Leyla he knew was a child who rarely asked anyone for anything.

“My glasses upset him a lot.”

Leyla’s voice dropped.

“Was he upset that your eyesight got worse?”

“No. That’s not it. He was upset I never told him that I was planning on buying expensive glasses with my own savings.”

Leyla sat across Kyle after she was finished setting the table.

Uncle Bill was dazed. It was as if he had been hit on the back of his head when Leyla showed up in the cabin with glasses on. After hearing her explanation of how she came to get her glasses fitted, his expression was as cold as an ice sheet. It was the first time Uncle Bill been so angry towards her.

‘Leyla. Am I not that reliable to you?’

Bill sighed. Leyla felt suffocated looking at Bill’s sad eyes.

The more she clarified, saying that she didn’t want to burden him and was thankful for everything that he had done for her, the more his eyes saddened.

Ever since that day, their relationship had gotten rather awkward.

Bill was sulky and refused to speak while Leyla was at a loss of what to do. The answer she found was the hat.

‘Uncle, please buy me a hat.’

Leyla blurted at the dinner table a few days ago.

‘I’d like a very pretty hat, please.’

Uncle Bill laughed at her serious tone.

The next evening, the old man who had gone downtown to buy a pair of electronic scissors came back with a straw hat decorated with flowers and ribbons.

‘I bought it at Lindsay’s, so if you don’t like it, go ahead and return it.’

Bill carelessly added while holding out the hat.

‘Did you pick it yourself?’

‘Well, yeah.’

‘It’s so pretty.’

Leyla brightly smiled and wore the hat.

Uncle Bill had personally bought her many things, but in most cases, he had asked Mrs. Mona to buy stuff for Leyla or he directly took Leyla out to the store to pick out what she needed. Leyla knew too well how difficult it must’ve been for Uncle Bill to choose a female hat. She also was aware of how big his love was for her.

For Bill Remmer, flowers were the prettiest thing in the world. So he believed a hat with many flowers was the prettiest hat. He was sure he picked the most charming hat.

“Hey! You should’ve told me that before.”

There was an embarrassment in Kyle’s face as he attentively listened.

“Now I feel like a scumbag for making fun of that gift!”

“When did you give me a chance to talk? You teased me as soon as you saw it.”

“That’s true, but……”

“You cheeky gluttonous herbivore. You’re eating up all my food again. Someday I’m going to ask Dr. Etman to pay for all that food you ate here!”

Bill, who burst into the door, loudly yelled. But his face was friendly and his tone was playful, which was completely different from his harsh words.

Bill then chuckled awkwardly at the sight of Leyla’s hat on the table. Leyla’s expression, smiling at Bill, was so sweet that Kyle was almost pathetically jealous.

The man who loved Leyla Lewellin had no choice but to accept the fate of being second place in Leyla’s heart. Leyla’s number one was forever Uncle Bill.

Comforting himself, Kyle grabbed the fork. He didn’t mind Uncle Bill’s nagging. Leyla’s food was delicious enough to bear Bill’s harsh lectures.



When Uncle Bill went back to work after lunch, only Kyle and Leyla were left in the cabin.

Leyla sat on the porch, reading as usual. Kyle stared at Leyla as he pretended to read. Except for the time when she had to put down her book to eat some biscuits, Leyla was totally fixated on her book.

I shouldn’t have lent you that novel.

Despite his bitter regret, Kyle smiled.

Leyla wouldn’t know. How charming her face was when she was concentrating on her book. How lovely she was when she munched on her biscuits with those luscious lips.

Should I tell her today?

Kyle, who had put the book down on the floor, looked at Leyla with a stern expression.

He believed he could wait a little longer, but now, he wasn’t so confident.

Even the touch of Leyla’s fingertips made his heart feel like it would burst. His body heated up as he often had guilty dreams of her.1

Kyle was recently worried about his concern. He feared that one day, someone would appear to take Leyla away from him.

So wouldn’t it be better to make a reckless confession?


The sound of slow horseshoes was heard from a distance when Kyle was about to open his warm lips. When Kyle turned his head to the direction of the sound, he saw Duke Herhardt in his equestrian uniform. Leyla, who was just about to take another bite of her biscuit, was surprised by the visitor.1

The duke stopped his horse in front of the porch railing.

His glance, which briefly brushed past Kyle, paused on Leyla’s face. Her face was blushing in confusion.


Chapter 10

“What about Mr. Remmer?”1

The duke asked Leyla.

“Uncle went downtown for the moment. Is something the matter?” Leyla managed to answer after wiping the biscuit crumbs off her lips.

With a short nod, Duke Herhardt turned his gaze towards Kyle. When he met eyes with Kyle, his lips curled into an affable smile. Only then did Kyle relieve his instinctive vigilance.

After asking to convey his gratitude and regard to Kyle’s father for taking good care of Norma’s health, he then looked back at Leyla again.

“Miss. Lewellin can bring the roses in on behalf of Mr. Bill, right?” He slowly spoke as the smile on his lips disappeared.

“Roses? You mean the roses in the garden?”

“Moderately cut off some roses and bring them to the annex.”

With a slight nod, the duke left. He hadn’t even listened to Leyla’s answer.

Leyla sighed hopelessly after looking at her blouse and skirt, which was covered with biscuit power.

Although she shook off the powder, it wasn’t enough to shake off the humiliation.

“Stop it. There isn’t any powder on your clothes anymore.”

Kyle burst into laughter as he then watched Leyla repeatedly rub her lips.

“Why did he have to show up like this?”

“Why not? Do you think the duke’s never eaten a snack in his life?” “But…”

Leyla unwittingly rubbed her mouth again.

“Why do you care when you always eat messy in front of me?” “You’re my friend.”

“And Duke Herhardt is a stranger. You don’t have to care about him more than your friend.” “That’s true but…. I don’t know. It’s so uncomfortable.”

Leyla wrinkled her nose.

“Why? Did something happen?”

“No, it’s not that, but… it’s so uncomfortable and suffocating with the duke around. Anyways, I don’t like it.”

“What about me? I’m comfortable and nice right?”1

Kyle asked with a subtle expectation. Leyla smiled and put on her hat.

“Of course, Mr. Etman.”

Kyle’s grin lit up at the satisfactory answer.

“As expected. I knew it. Ah, should I help you with your errand?”

“No, it’s not a big deal. You should go home now.”

“Then I’ll wait here.”

“I’m fine. Mrs. Etman will be veeery upset if she finds out you were hanging out here again. Don’t get me scolded along with you and go study.”

Kyle’s eyebrows flinched at Leyla’s reasonable point. He wanted to refute but couldn’t.

Kyle looked carefully towards the direction the duke had disappeared to.

I’m probably being too oversensitive these days.1

It was just Duke Herhardt. The flawless aristocrat who was about to announce his engagement to the public. But then…

“Leyla!”

Kyle tried to stop her. The thought of Duke Herhardt and Leyla being together still somewhat made him anxious. Meanwhile, Leyla was about to leave the porch as she said her farewell while holding a pair of scissors and a basket in her hands.

“See you tomorrow, Kyle!”

Don’t go.

Kyle simply waved his hands in effort to swallow down the words that he had wanted to say.

It’s Duke Herhardt. What could go wrong?

While Kyle was repeating those words like a spell, Leyla had moved towards the other side of the path.



“Again.”

Matthias’s voice touched Leyla’s back. Only after a few moments of blinking did Leyla realize that his words were directed at her. Leyle turned to him while holding her breath. Matthias sat, facing the butler at a table placed by the window. He was examining the documents that were piled up on the table.

“With colors that aren’t flashy.”

Matthias slowly said with his eyes focused only on the documents that he held in his hands.

“Again.”

Soon, there was a ridiculously gentle smile on Matthias’s face when he looked at Leyla.

Leyla clenched her fists tight in order to bear the pent-up irritation. So the roses were the problem. The roses that he told her to ‘moderately’ cut down.

While Leyla glared at the roses, Matthias’s gaze turned emotionless. The butler Hessen then continued his report, and Matthias, who was listening, replied back with brief instructions. The presence of the insatiable errand girl was completely erased in the room.

For Uncle Bill.

Reiterating the incantations, Leyla quietly left the annex located by the river and headed back to the garden. That guy, who bullies a person at 2 p.m. in the middle of summer, is supposed to be a gentleman. She emphatically expressed her dissatisfaction at his unacceptable reputation.

Even though she was disinterested in the mansion affairs, Leyla was aware the detached annex along with the river was Duke Herhardt’s. He rarely had guests in that annex and the number of servants who came in and out was limited.

Leyla initially thought the reason why he wanted the flower in the annex was because of Claudine. Claudine was about to get engaged to him so there was a chance that Claudine might’ve started using the annex as well. So Leyla, who knew Claudine’s preference of bright flowers, had cut down the most gaudiest colored roses and presented them to the duke. Only to get rejected by him of course.

When Leyla got out of the forest, the shadowless garden appeared in sight.

Leyla boldly walked and cut the roses again with great care. In response to the duke’s stressful demands, she chose subtle colored roses this time. Most of them were the types of roses that Leyla liked.

While holding a basket full of flowers, Leyla headed towards the annex again under the stifling summer afternoon sun.

Why didn’t you just tell me the color you wanted in the first place?


Leyla vented her anger by kicking the stones on the floor instead of spitting out the words that she had in mind for the duke.

I hate you.

The words that Leyla could never directly say to him were left behind along with the stones she purposely kicked.

By the time she was about to feel dizzy from the sweltering heat, Leyla arrived in front of the detached house.

The beautiful annex located next to the dock was built as if it was half-floating on the river. On the first floor, there was a boat hangar and a kitchen filled with simple refreshments, and on the second floor, there was a reception room, a bedroom, and a dining room intended for the duke to rest and eat in.

Leyla climbed the outer stairs leading straight to the second floor while holding the basket of roses in her hands. The butler and a middle-aged maid were about the leave the annex.

After greeting them her farewell, Leyla turned to the reception room. Matthias was still sitting on his chair, with his eyes closed and head tilted back.

Should I wait?

While Leyla was contemplating, he thankfully opened his eyes. His softly tangled hair was covering his forehead.

“I’ve brought you new roses, your grace.”

Leyla slightly lifted the basket full of flowers.

The duke simply stared at the cup of whiskey placed in front of him and didn’t bother to open his mouth. He had taken off his horseback riding jacket and loosened up a few buttons on his shirt. Because of his getup, he looked much more defenseless and languid than before.

“Should I…… go back again?”

Leyla’s voice quivered as she carefully asked. If she had to go to the garden once again, she felt like she could’ve hit the duke with the roses.

“If I tell you to go, are you going to?”

He asked with a slight drowsiness in his voice.

“If I made another mistake, I’d go but please tell me the color of the roses you prefer this time.”

Yes, your grace.

That was the answer she had originally planned to say but her mouth said the other.

Matthias, who was leaning deep into the chair’s back, fixed his posture and sat upright.

“Sit down.”

Matthias pointed to the seat that was placed at the opposite side of the table with his eyes.

“No, if my lord is satisfied, I’d now…….”

“If you brought the flowers, wouldn’t it be your job to arrange them in a vase? Miss. Lewellin?”

“But your grace, I’m not very good at arranging flowers.”

“Then, do you expect me to do it?”

Matthias looked around the room and then turned his eyes back to Leyla. Leyla didn’t find it difficult to recognize what that brief gesture meant. He and Leyla were the only ones in this detached house. She had no choice but to do something she wasn’t confident in.

She took a cautious step forward. The opposite seat was too burdensome for her so she carefully sat on the wooden chair in front of the window that was facing the river.

As Leyla began to trim the roses, Matthias turned to his piles of document scattered across the table. The sound of the scissor blade cutting the fresh flower stalk and the fluttering of the document paper permeated into silence.

At the moment he finished signing the last reviewed document, Matthias suddenly recalled the bird living in his mansion bedroom. Putting the zookeeper’s words that canaries were difficult types of birds to tame in vain, the canary in Matthias’s bedroom followed him well. It sat on his finger and sang without any hesitation.

He looked at it for a long time, amazed at the fact that the unbelievably small bird could sing so beautifully. The flapping bird that had sat on his finger even cried a little, as if it was chatting about its day.

While he was organizing the documents, Leyla quietly went to the bathroom and filled the vase up with water. Her steps were light and swift.

It was soon proved that Leyla’s words were no lies. Her flower arrangement was a mess.

“Do you like it?”

Leyla hesitantly asked as she brought up the rose filled vase up to Matthias.

“It’s terrible.”

Matthias’s tone wasn’t condescending, but dry. Leyla’s eyes blinked in shock as her cheeks turned red with embarrassment.

“I’m sorry. I’ll bring in a qualified maid.”

“Sit.”

“Pardon?”

“Sit, Leyla.”

When his voice dropped, the tension in the atmosphere increased. His fingers pointed exactly towards the sofa located at the opposite of his seat.

Leyla placed the criticized rose vase on a console table near her and stiffly sat where Matthias had pointed to.

“Eat.”

Matthias turned his gaze towards the silver-colored dome dish that was placed near the sofa.

Leyla awkwardly opened the cover. There were sandwiches and a glass of lemonade meant for one person.

Matthias stared at the perplexed Leyla. He thought if she liked those types of food, he was going to give Leyla the right amount of expenses for her work. The results of her work were lousy but she had made quite the effort.

“Thank you, your grace. But I’m fine.”

Leyla laid down the dome dish with trembling hands. Her face, that used to brightly smile in front of the doctor’s son, simply looked perplexed now.

“If you don’t want me to do anything else, I’ll take my leave….”

“Leyla.”

Matthias’s voice was now close to a whisper.

Leyla slowly blinked while Matthias took a sip of the cold whiskey in front of him. The droplets on the surface of the crystal glass slowly rode down his long fingers.

“Do my words sound like a request to you?”

Matthias smiled as his lips reddened with the wet whiskey.


Chapter 11

The annex, which had large windows attached in all directions, provided a panoramic view of the forest and the river. It was also a place where the wind could freely flow in and out.

The weather today was hotter than ever, so it was hard to feel any chills.

But Leyla felt shivers go down her spine. She was determined to quickly eat and leave, but the food in front of her didn’t seem to reduce in amount.

Leyla didn’t think she could swallow anything. She already had lunch and even ate a snack. And to count it off, she ran an errand under the sultry heat so she had lost her appetite. Matthias concentrated on his work with his head tilted, but Leyla still found it hard to breathe properly.

Is this like a punishment for my poor errand and flower arrangement?

Leyla pondered as she swallowed another bite of the sandwich. If so, Duke Herhardt had accomplished his goal. Leyla felt like she was being punished.

Leyla hurriedly drank the lemonade to beat the urge to spit out her sandwich. After she wiped the water droplets off her hands with her apron, she picked up the sandwich again. Leyla then lowered the hem of her hat to cover her face that filled with dread. It was at that moment when a long finger suddenly touched the tip of her chin.

“If you’re a lady, Leyla.”

His hand untied the ribbon knot that was tied under her chin.

“You’re supposed to take off this hat when you’re inside.”

Before Leyla could even reply, Matthias took off her straw hat. Surprised, Leyla reflexively leaped from the sofa. The sandwich fell because of her sudden movement and rolled over the floor. The corner of Matthias’s eyes slanted, but Leyla’s attention was only focused on her hat.

“Gi- give it back.”

Leyla’s voice was now quivering with anger, not fear.

“Give it back, please. I will take my leave now. I want to go home. Give it back.”

Matthias tightly clutched the hat he snitched. He had no intention of returning it. Leyla reacted as if she was stripped naked, even though it was just her hat that had been taken away. Leyla’s red blush that had traveled down her neck amused Matthias. Her sensitive skin had easily responded to her irritation.

“Eat.”

Matthias pointed to the sandwich that still had two slices left.

“Eat, get your hat, and go back. It’s easy.”

“No, I don’t want to.”

Leyla shook her head as she approached him.

“I don’t want to eat. I can’t anymore. I hate it.”

Leyla’s frightened eyes were shaking. She seemed like she had no idea what she was talking about.

Matthias rose from his chair as his grip on the hat tightened more. His figure had cast a shadow over her.

“……You hate it?”

“It’s all my fault, so please give it back.”

Leyla stretched out her hand. She looked as if she was about to burst into tears. Matthias looked at her face and slowly lifted her hat over his head. Leyla’s eyes moved along with his movement.

When their eyes met, Matthias threw the hat lightly over the window. The wind carried away the hat, and it gently flew over the river. Leyla gave him an icy glare and frantically ran out of the reception room.1

Matthias approached the front window that overlooked the dock and the river. Leyla, who soon appeared on the dock, started stamping her feet around in panic after looking at the hat that was floating on the water. She suddenly took off her apron and glasses and set them on the dock.

Are you going to jump into that river just to get that stupid hat?

Standing in front of the window, Matthias gave her a rather amused stare. Leyla was shaking. It seemed like she was afraid of the water.

Are you serious?

Matthias sneered as Leyla entered the river. She hesitated in the river for a moment, but then started to walk towards her hat. Leyla Lewellin didn’t stop when the water level reached her knees, her waist, and then her chest.

Matthias watched with his arms loosely folded.

Leyla reached out her hand to the fullest, but the river current had pushed her hat as it traveled farther away. When Matthias thought she was going to give up, Leyla suddenly took a bigger step closer to her hat.

The water level should be deeper than your height by now.


Leyla’s hand finally grasped the ribbon end of the hat while Matthias slowly tilted his head. At that same time, Leyla Lewellin’s figure disappeared below the surface.

“As expected.”

Matthias softly murmured and frowned. Leyla drowned exactly at the point he had predicted her to submerge in. Surprised by the sudden deepened water, Leyla struggled desperately. But the more she struggled, the deeper she was pulled into the river. She was grabbing onto her hat for dear life.

With his arms now unfolded, Matthias headed for the dock with wide steps. His other prediction was proved right. Leyla Lewellin had jumped into the river even though she didn’t know how to swim.

Stopping at the end of the dock, Matthias looked upon the floundering Leyla. Her screams gradually faded away as she repeatedly rose to the surface and sank.

Eat, get the hat, and go back.

What a fuss she created when she could have done that simple task.1

Sighing between his twisted lips, Matthias dived into the river.

The wooden panels on the dock that touched Leyla’s cheek were hot from the sun. When she felt the vividness of the heat, Leyla realized that she had safely come out of the river. Pain and fear soon followed the relief.

Leyla trembled as a deluge of coughs came out of her mouth. Even at that moment, she had refused to let go of the hat she held onto.

Leyla’s appearance was so absurd that Matthias lost his breath. She heard a mixture of weak breaths and a low laughter coming from the duke. Leyla Lewellin met eyes with him by the time the droplets of water from her wet body left a dark stain on the wooden floor.

“How….. Can you do… something like this….”

Leyla asked while gasping for breath. She gave him a dirty look, but it was the tears in her eyes that caught his attention.

Sweeping his wet hair that covered his forehead, Matthias looked at her as if she was something entertaining. As Leyla’s breathing calmed down, his laughter grew louder.

Leyla lifted her upper body up with her trembling hands, touching the scorching wooden floor. Droplets of water poured down like rain from her wet head. Her eyes turned red, but Leyla didn’t cry. Instead, she continued to glare at Matthias. That wicked man with a pleasant smile.

Leyla, who changed her mind after trying to figure out what to say, stood up. Matthias sat on the wooden floor as if he was enjoying his sunbath. He then looked up at her. The thin, wet clothes starkly revealed the lines of her body.


While Matthias’s eyes focused on her trembling shoulders, Leyla suddenly shook off the water from her hat.

The cold droplets of water hit Matthias’s indifferent face. Although Leyla flinched a little, she didn’t stop her revenge. After wearing the hat that was still dripping with water, she now brushed off her skirt. Her eyes glistened provocatively at Matthias.

“Is it fun?”

Matthias slowly swept his face as if he were washing it and opened his mouth.

“I’m starting to get a little bored.”

His laughter quickly disappeared from his stony face. Although Leyla cowered instinctively, she didn’t avoid his gaze.

“How… What… Why… Are you doing this to me?”

“Leyla, your gratitude.”

Matthias slowly rolled up the sleeves of his wet shirt.

“Your gratitude towards your lifesaver.”

He nonchalantly teased Leyla, who looked back at him in astonishment.

“I don’t think any of this would have happened if you hadn’t thrown my hat into the river.”

“No.”

The gap between his eyebrows narrowed.

“If you’d patiently eaten your sandwich and left, this wouldn’t have happened.”

Leyla simply blinked. His tone was too calm for it to be a joke.

“Nor if you hadn’t made the pathetic decision to jump into the river, even though you don’t know how to swim.”

Matthias lightly brushed off the dripping water with the tip of his finger and tilted his head.

“…… Thank you for saving me, your grace.”

Leyla clenched her jaws and bowed. Uncle Bill. Uncle Bill. Uncle Bill. She once again started her incantation.

“Again.”

Matthias ordered as if he was checking the sincerity of her gratitude.

“Like a lady. Again.”

The duke didn’t smile or laugh.

“My apologizes, your grace, I’m not like the other aristocratic ladies. I’m not even a lady.”

Leyla’s angry words slipped out of her mouth. Matthias silently stared at her without any agitation.

“But you have to be a lady in front of me, Leyla.”

The droplets on the tips of his fingers bounced off Leyla’s foot.

“Whatever you are, I’m still a gentleman.”

The duke smiled while quietly staring at Leyla.

Leyla grasped her soaked skirt with her white, hardened hands. Just like the graceful lady the duke had wanted her to be, she gave a courteous bow. The droplets of water from the straw hat brim fell onto the wooden floor of the dock.

“Thank you very much for saving my life, your grace.”

Although her body trembled to the point her teeth collided against each other, Leyla lowered her head, enunciating her every word correctly. Matthias gave a pass for her ladylike gratitude with the nod of his chin.

Don’t cry, Leyla Lewellin.

Leyla tightened her fist.

Don’t cry over someone like that, please.

Comforting herself, Leyla then straightened her waist, which used to be bent towards the duke.

“Then, I’ll go back now. Goodbye, your grace.”

Leyla resolutely turned, leaving behind the silent Matthias. Behind the walking Leyla was a long trail of water droplets falling from the skirt.

Her legs were loose, and she nearly fell several times, but Leyla desperately tightened her leg muscles. She clenched her teeth and made her mind that she wouldn’t fall today. That she won’t be his plaything anymore. Never.

Once Leyla was out of Matthias’s sight, she now ran. The corners of her eyes were so red that even the hat’s shade couldn’t hide her eyes. Leyla ran faster and faster, increasing the speed of her running.

She saw it by chance one day. He was walking along the forest path with Claudine. The elegant gentleman escorting the alluring lady was just like a scene from a fairy tale or a court novel.


When they reached the end of the road, the wind blew off Claudine’s hat. Matthias slowly approached the hat and picked it up to give it back to Claudine. His non-urgent gesture was very graceful. By the time Leyla noticed how he always moved that gracefully, the two were out of Leyla’s sight.

With that non-urgent gesture as that day, he had insulted Leyla today. She stopped running after realizing the harsh difference between his attitude towards her and Claudine.

The pale-faced Leyla staggered to the grass to throw up the food she forcefully shoved in. Tears welled up in her eyes, but she didn’t cry.

When the nausea stopped, Leyla went to the shallow stream running through the forest and rinsed her mouth. She felt much better after taking a rest in the tree shade.

Leyla wiped her lips with the back of her hand and returned to the path leading to the cabin. She had no more energy left to run, so she trudged her legs along. The damp stocking and skirt got dirtied, but she didn’t mind because her appearance was already messy.

When the cabin in sight, Leyla gathered up her last energy and kicked the hazel tree fruit off the side of the road. While she watched the fruit roll down, she suddenly realized the fatal mistake she had made.

“My glasses…”2

Her face crumpled up. The road she looked back on felt far away.


Chapter 12

When he moved the stylus needle, music began to flow out.

The aria of an opera carried by the phonograph placed on top of the mahogany cabinet instantly defeated the silence that was filling the reception room of the annex.

Matthias changed the frequency a few times to let a different music genre, the waltz, to flow out and then sat back on the sofa. The melody was bright and cheerful. His long fingertips, lightly touching the armrest, slowly tapped along to the beat. The desk clock on the opposite console table indicated it was currently five o’clock.

Matthias’s gaze briefly focused on the lousy arranged rose vase next to the clock and soon turned his head towards the window. The wind got cooler as evening approached. The wind from the river shook his gown before it headed out into the forest.

Matthias reached out and opened a small silver box placed at the end of the drawing table. While he picked up a cigarette from the box and lit it up, the waltz song was over. Matthias slowly smoked, listening to the raucous string music that followed. The late afternoon of the summer was boring and still.

When the song stopped, Matthias picked up Leyla’s glasses, which he had carelessly thrown in the tray next to him. Matthias held up the glasses to his face. Her eyes seemed to be pretty bad because the world he saw over the lenses was dizzy.

Is that why she always frowned?

He suddenly thought of the little child staring at him with a sulky frown. The scrawny, unpretentious girl whose eyes were glistening despite her appearance.

The child who was supposed to stay for a brief time had grown in Matthias’s world and matured into a woman.

The woman’s slender face with the thin gold-rimmed glasses overlapped the scrawny girl’s face. The woman with the glistening eyes still had that fresh, sweet smell. It was the fragrance of a rose, the flower that filled up Arvis’s summer garden.

Having let out a long stream of cigarette smoke, Matthias went out to the balcony that stretched towards the river while loosely holding Leyla’s glasses. His shadow lengthened as he playfully threw up and caught the glasses several times.

“Leyla.”

He whispered in the hot summer.

“Leyla Lewellin.”

The fact that he had to tickle the tip of his tongue in order to fluidly pronounce her name annoyed him.

After returning to the reception room, Matthias put her glasses in the drawer of the console table.

When he closed the drawer, the memory of the green eyes that he saw over her glasses disappeared.

Matthias went to the bathroom and took a long shower. He changed his clothes and waxed his hair. By the time he left the annex to attend dinner, he was again the perfect, Duke of Arvis.



“What if the crow took it again?”

Bill asked with some jest. Leyla, who was sitting at the table with a serious look on her face, shrugged.

“Well…… I hope not.”

“Just saying. They’re the type of birds who go crazy if they see something sparkling. Remember? Your hairpin.”

Bill burst out laughing. Leyla’s face hardened by the memory that Bill reminded her of but soon laughed with him.

Uncle Bill had bought Leyla a shiny hairpin on her thirteenth birthday. It was chosen by Mrs. Mona, who had researched the type of hairpins girls her age liked.

Leyla tried to carefully preserve the pin. If Bill hadn’t said he’d throw it out if she didn’t wear it right away, it might’ve been asleep in her drawer forever.

But on the first day she wore the gift, the pin met its harsh fate. The crow carried away the pin Leyla had briefly placed on the fence in order to take care of the garden. It was an incident that caused Leyla, who used to love all birds, to have a disdain for crows.

“If you can’t find it, tell me Leyla.”

Bill strained his voice as if he was requesting.

“You don’t have to look like that because I can buy you a new one. Okay?”

“Okay, uncle.”

Leyla gladly nodded.

“I will.”

She was able to answer back because she was completely sure her glasses were at the dock, where she had taken them off before diving into the river.


However, the next morning when Leyla came out to the riverside, she was devastated. She tried to thoroughly search the dock as well as the surrounding area of the annex, but her glasses were nowhere to be found.

The undone apron was still in its place, but only the glasses were gone. She thought the wind must have it blown away, but because of the apron on the dock; she dismissed her thought. She was sure she took off her glasses first and then her apron. There was no way her glasses alone could disappear.

No way… Maybe?

Leyla snooped around in front of the annex and then shook her head as if it was nonsense.

There’s no reason for the duke to take it.

Leyla turned around with her drooped shoulders. She regretted not coming back earlier to pick up her glasses. She was just afraid of running into the duke.

“Is it really you?”

Leyla muttered, staring at the crow sitting on the branch. The crow tilted its head several times and soon flew away into the far woods.

With a determined face, Leyla clenched her first. She began to walk with wide steps.

She was first going to go back to her cabin, have breakfast, and think again with a clearer mind.

The suspect seemed to be one of the two.

The crow, or the duke.



The snow-white dove sat by the window. Kyle, who casually turned his head, smiled and opened the window.

“Hey, Phoebe.”

The dove didn’t run away even though he had reached his hand out. Kyle naturally pulled the letter from the bird’s leg.

The mountain dove, Phoebe, was Leyla Lewellin’s messenger. Having been obsessed with birds since childhood, she read a book about doves being able to deliver letters so one day, she had a grand ambition to have a dove of her down.

‘Sure. Go ahead.’


When Kyle snickered at her ambition, he never dreamed that day would actually come until the ancient, legend-like precursor suddenly flew through his room window. The persistent girl, Leyla Lewellin, had done it. Leyla, who did not give up despite her many failures, managed to train the bird.

It was late spring two years ago when Phoebe first flew into Kyle’s window. He had opened the window and a dove that brought Leyla’s letter stared at him. It was a pretty dove with shiny white feathers and black eyes.

[Hello, Mr. Etman]

Leyla’s letter brought by the dove that day contained only one short line. But Kyle was able to read many other things. Leyla’s excitement in her success. Leyla’s eyes sparkling with joy.

Leyla. My dear friend, Leyla.

Doves delivering letters in a world like today.

Kyle laughed at the absurdity but he understood. For Leyla, Phoebe was, so to speak, a telephone. In a cabin with no telephones around, letter-carrying pigeons were quite efficient.

But today’s letter from Leyla’s messenger contained tragic news. The letter read that she had lost her glasses. She had to go find her glasses. She couldn’t keep their promise to go to the library. And that she was very sorry.

After finishing its work, Phoebe left the window while Kyle read the letter with a serious face. Kyle put the folded letter between the thick book that was spread out on the desk and hurried out of his room.

“Kyle Etman! Are you going to Leyla’s again?”

Mrs. Etman frowned at the sight of her son coming down the stairs but Kyle silently smiled.

“You need to study, Kyle!”

“I’ll do it at Leyla’s!”

Kyle left the front door, leaving only a lively answer behind.

The shiny silver bicycle glided past Etman’s house. When he entered the Arvis territory, Kyle frantically peddled as he grew more and more impatient. He wasn’t interested in going to the library. He had made the promise just to be with Leyla. He was worried about her.

Those were the glasses she bought with her hard work.

His heart ached when he thought of Leyla, the fool who saved and earned money by making jam and selling it just because she was worried of being burdensome to Uncle Bill.

“Uh, Kyle?”


When the bicycle squealed to a halt, Leyla, who was hanging the laundry, looked at Kyle with a surprised face.

“Did you find your glasses?”

“No. Not yet.”

Leyla’s face grew sullen.

“I’ll buy you a new one!”

Kyle blurted out because he was upset to see the depressed Leyla.

“…… Kyle. You? Why?”

Leyla replied back with confusion in her eyes. Kyle suddenly realized what he had said. His feelings got the best of him so he had forgotten what kind of person Leyla was.

“Thank you, Kyle, but I can’t.”

Leyla smiled brightly as if to keep him from being embarrassed.

“And I, really want to find my glasses.”

Unlike her smiling lips, her eyes were firm. Kyle knew those eyes well. It was the eyes of Leyla Lewellin, the stubborn woman who wouldn’t back down no matter what.

“I’ll find it for sure.”



Leyla had been stirring the forest for days. The doctor’s son was with her.

Their vain efforts were so admirable, Matthias pretended not to know. It was quite entertaining to see them search around the innocent bird nests.2

Do you really don’t know or are you pretending not to know?

Matthias paused his legs that were climbing the annex stairs and then looked at the vast expanse of the forest along the river. He was about to get bored with their foolishness. He was also getting bored of visiting this place for the past few days, smirking at their search attempts despite his busy schedule.

Matthias continued climbing the stairs while slowly sweeping his hair that had been disheveled by the strong wind. Hessen, who followed, took a step back after quietly opening the door.

Matthias headed straight to the reception room. Instead of usually sitting on the sofa, he leaned against the window, facing the forest.

“Marquis Lindman will arrive around noon today.”

“Riette? His arrival is earlier than scheduled.”

“Madam has instructed me to pay special attention to the luncheon. She asked the master to join if you didn’t have any previous appointments scheduled.”

“Sure. I will.”

The chiffon curtain that was covering half of the window slowly swelled up with the gust of wind. When the curtain deflated, Matthias’s eyes narrowed when he saw the path covered with the tranquil sunlight. Leyla stood under the tree at the end of the road. She was circling around the tree with her hands held together.

Maybe she isn’t a complete fool.

Matthias silently grinned and he focused his attention to Hessen’s reports while the middle-aged maid served him cold lemon water. The clatter of ice in the glass was quite pleasant to hear.

When the maid and the butler left after finishing their job, Matthias watched the scenery beyond the window with the long-necked glass cup in his hand. Leyla began to approach the river when the maid and the butler were completely out of sight.

Not long after, the doorbell rang out the tranquil annex.

Matthias slowly rose from his seat.


Chapter 13

Unlike the day she had angrily left the annex, the Leyla now looked like a gentle, precocious lady.

Matthias stared at the ‘gentle’ Leyla while languidly leaning on the couch.

“I’m terribly sorry for this sudden discourtesy, your grace.”

Leyla hesitatingly opened her mouth while she kept her head down in efforts to avoid his gaze. Her dense eyelashes were very long and straight. Her long eyelashes seemed to be a reason why she left a soft impression when she gently lowered her eyes.

“Pardon me, but I have a question.”

Leyla, who had been licking her lips several times, finally managed to open her mouth. But at that moment, the phone started ringing.

Matthias slowly stood up to pass by Leyla as she retreated. He picked up the phone. It seemed to be a business call regarding a complicated contract he had to look over.

Leyla looked a little surprised when she saw Matthias on the phone. He skillfully led the conversation. Even with his brief smiles and polite way of talking, she could feel the power and dignity that overwhelmed the person on the phone. He looked like the perfect Duke of Arvis that everyone admired.1

I mean, no way.

The suspicion that the man could have taken her glasses felt ridiculous at the moment.

I feel like I’m doing something useless….. Then was it the crow?

While judging how many crows’ nests there might be in the forest, Leyla silently greeted the duke, who was on the phone, and was about to leave. He unexpectedly turned to Leyla while holding onto the telephone mouthpiece.

“Wait.”

His short order sounded like someone else’s. His voice was quite different from the perfect Duke of Arvis she heard while he was on the phone.

Leyla stopped at a strange position. Matthias was focused on his call again as if nothing had happened.

Leyla realized another trait of Matthias while watching him.

Even at the moment of his social conversation, Duke Herhardt’s eyes were calm. His smile was also calm. But his posture was uniformly straight and elegant. Despite the fact the phone caller wasn’t able to see him, he didn’t lose his posture. Leyla thought perhaps it was a trait that was embedded into his body.


After a few more minutes of his call, he went back to the front of the table and made a note of something. Leyla nervously grasped her wriggling hands from behind her back. By the time she suspected that he must have forgotten about her presence, Matthias’s eyes finally turned to her.

“Tell me.”

“What?”

“What you were going to say.”

Leyla gently lowered her eyes when Matthias’s stare made her uncomfortable.

“Ah….. The thing is, my glasses. On the day I jumped into the river…..I was wondering if you saw my

glasses at the dock.”

“Well. I don’t think I’ve seen it…….”

Matthias slowly stood up from the sofa and started approaching her.

“I might have I’ve hidden it.”

“Uh….. What?”

Leyla was so shocked that she raised her head.

“My glasses. Did you really hide it?”

“What do you think?”

“I don’t think you would’ve done such a thing.”

Leyla answered with a slight frown.

“Why?”

Matthias tilted his head as if he was amused. His black hair that slightly shook on his forehead resembled the crow’s feather.

“Because… that’s… that’s rude.”

Leyla curled up her feet in order to not back away.

After days of searching the crows’ nests with Kyle, she managed to muster up her courage and came here. Even though she didn’t like Matthias, she could at least communicate with the duke, unlike the crows. She felt like it would be better to quickly eliminate either one of the two suspects, the crow or the duke. But she wasn’t sure now. She wasn’t sure if the duke, who only increased her confusion with his enigmatic words, was really a person who she can communicate with.


The two looked at each other’s eyes without saying a word for some time. The moment would’ve lasted longer if the butler hadn’t returned to the annex with an urgent telegram and mail.

Leyla headed towards the window with a little blush in her cheeks.

After a low conversation with the butler, Matthias obliquely looked at Leyla. His red lips seemed to be slightly tilted, although Leyla wasn’t completely sure because of her glasses missing.

“I……”

With all the courage she had, she opened her mouth but Matthias cut her off by lifting the tip of chin towards the door.

It was a concise and cold gesture to announce that there was no room left for Leyla Lewellin.

“A bird. What’s with your weird hobby all of a sudden?”

Riette looked at the cage with a puzzled look. In the beautiful golden cage, there was a golden bird.

“Are you now planning to raise a bird and shoot it yourself?”

Riette’s jokes brought laughter to the people sitting around the mansion suite reception room. Matthias gave a small chuckle. But his answers weren’t heard. While Riette added a few more silly words, the servants came in with the champagne.

A huge dinner was held at the Herhardt’s place to celebrate the gathering of all the relatives who had spent the summer together. Matthias, Claudine, Riette, and other aristocrats of similar ages had moved to the reception room after finishing their dinner. By Claudine’s special request, they were in the master suite reception room, the space that Matthias only used. Matthias, who rarely shared his own space, seemed quite generous to his fiance as gave her his chaste permission.

The engagement between Matthias and Claudine was pretty much confirmed by the relatives. It was obvious why Countess Brandt visited Arvis every year with her only daughter and how the Herhardt family gave their conspicuous welcome every time the Brandt household came to their estate.

This engagement surprised none of the relatives. It was as if natural things had come true. They would’ve been more shocked if Matthias had chosen a different woman.

“That bird doesn’t seem to know what kind of person Duke Herhardt is.”

When the bird flew out of the open cage, it sat on Matthias’s shoulder. Riette broke into a jolly laughter.

“A bird in love with the bird hunting master. Should I call this foolish or pitiful?”

The bird moved over his finger when Matthias reached out his hand.

“Claudine, what do you think?”

Everyone’s eyes were on Claudine after listening to the question Riette threw.

“Well. I don’t know.”

Claudine glanced at the singing bird sitting on Matthias’s finger.

“You could call it a foolish but pitiful bird.”1

Another burst of laughter broke out at her compromise.

The atmosphere between the people in the reception room was intimate because they had seen each other for many years. The names everyone knew, the world everyone shared, the same interests everyone had. It was truly a society that only they could enter.

“That bird, what’s its name?”

Claudine asked a friendly question.

“If you don’t have a name for it yet, would you like me to name it for you?”

“It’s not worth your effort, my lady.”

When Matthias turned his eyes and looked at Claudine, he smiled. His smile seemed the same as before but it somehow felt subtly different.

“A bird is just a bird.”

His answer was heartless in contrast to the soft gaze of the singing bird on his fingers.

“As expected, the stupid poor bird.”

Riette tsked as he showed his sympathy for the bird.

“It loves a hunter who doesn’t allow to have a name of its own!”



The group of people laughing and chatting over the champagne didn’t leave the suite until it was late at night.

Passing by the servants who came in to clean up the reception room, Matthias left the mansion for a night walk alone. His face, no longer smiling, was as still as the night.

The trap was laid, so it was time to check.

It wasn’t a fool so it would’ve noticed but he knew it wouldn’t give up.

That’s why he was sure it’ll get caught.


Matthias walked through the rose garden. The wind got cooler as he got closer to the river and then through the forest. His steps stopped in front of the annex along the river. The moonlight was white.

Entering the annex’s reception room, Matthias approached in front of the console table and opened the drawer. The neatly placed glasses glistened, reflecting the moonlight.

Holding the glasses as if it was his canary, Matthias laid his tired body on the sofa.

What do I want from the bait I set up?

Matthias thought while looking at the glasses. He had difficulty answering but he wasn’t impatient. He believed he’ll find out once he caught it.

The night grew deeper as he repeatedly threw the glasses up and down. It was a moonlit night.



It was a crazy act.

Leyla was clearly aware. Sneaking into the duke’s annex was something no one with the right sanity would do.

“Yeah. Let’s get some sleep.”

Leyla, who had been wandering around the room, threw herself onto the bed. She wrapped herself in a thin blanket and tightly closed her eyes.

“My glasses…”

But she couldn’t fall asleep.

Leyla was sure of her decision. Although she knew she was acting ridiculous, she was determined.

She needed to get her glasses.

Leyla sprang to her feet. She predicted that Matthias couldn’t have brought it to his mansion so she was sure that it was somewhere in the annex.

That place was remote and it was near midnight so Leyla thought it would be fine. The moon today was so bright that the darkness didn’t scare her.

“Yes. It’s all right.”

Leyla opened the door with a convincing murmur. The cabin was filled with still darkness. Uncle Bill’s snoring was the only disturbance.


While picking up a lace shawl that hanged on the door, Leyla hurried out of the cabin. Whenever she had second thoughts, she thought of the countless fruits she had collected and the jam she boiled in order to buy the glasses.

“It’s my glasses anyways.”

As the glittering Schulter River was seen in the distance, Leyla suppressed her anxiety by talking to herself. Her soft blonde hair that went down her waist rippled along to the fast-paced rhythm of her footsteps.

But the more I think about it, the duke is a strange man.

Leyla suddenly thought as she walked along the dock that was connected to the annex.

Does he like sparkly things like the crow?

In the midst of her questioning mixed with vexation, Leyla arrived in front of the annex where her glasses were hidden. She realized that she was on her pajamas but soon shrugged it off because it was the middle of the night and no one was there to see her.

Leyla took a deep breath as she took a step forward.



As expected.

Leyla Lewellin’s actions once again didn’t go beyond Matthias’s expectations.

When he heard the footsteps climbing up the stairs coming closer, Matthias’s breathing became slower. Even though he had left the door open for easy access, Leyla eventually came in through the hallway window after wandering outside for a long time.

She was a girl who didn’t deviate from his expectations, but she always gave a little impact.1

Matthias lay still on the couch and listened to her approach. Leyla’s sigh of relief was followed after the hardwood floor creaked smoothly.

Matthias silently sneered and lowered his gaze from the ceiling. It wasn’t long before Leyla entered the reception room. She initally looked around her surroundings with a stiff stance, and finally took a cautious step forward. She started her searches by the window.

Matthias’s eyes, already accustomed to the darkness, instantly captured Leyla’s figure. The moonlight that flowed through the window shone upon Leyla, who stood in front of the table.

By the time Matthias narrowed his eyes, Leyla had moved to her next destination, the cabinet. The skirt wrapped around her slender calves shook along with her footsteps. The white dress made with thin material that distinctively revealed her body line clearly looked like she was in her nightwear.

What do I want from the bait I set up?

Matthias stroked the slender temple of the glasses with his fingers. The cold, smooth texture made his conscious clear. In the meanwhile, Leyla now moved to the front of the console table, which was placed right across the sofa where Matthias lay.

Matthias looked back towards Leyla’s back, which was illuminated by the moonlight.

That woman.

Matthias acknowledged the answer to his question.

The reason why he endlessly waited while setting up this pathetic trap.

In order to have that woman. That woman, Leyla Lewellin, who was no longer a little girl.1

“Are you looking for this?”

Matthias steadily shook the glasses in his hand and opened his lips.

Leyla, who was just about to touch the console table’s drawer, quickly turned around. She looked like was about to faint. She staggered backwards while her trembling hands covered her mouth.

Matthias slowly raised himself up. As he sat, leaning against the sofa, the moonlight glistened over his face, which had been in the dark all along.

The two person’s eyes met in the moonlit night


Chapter 14

In his sight, Leyla was trembling helplessly.

Even though she often pretended to act brave, she was always easily frightened.

She had been like that since childhood.

Matthias started walking towards Leyla while he recollected his memory of the young girl. He stopped a few steps away from Leyla as her eyes gradually turned to his hand. To be exact, to the glasses he was holding in his hand.

“I’m….. sorry.”

Leyla barely opened her lips. Her eyes were filled with anger, but her apology was polite.

“I didn’t think you’d be here. I’m very sorr….”

“What if I didn’t have it? Did you think it was okay to sneak in?”

Matthias tilted his head to look at Leyla. Every time she blinked, her eyes progressively got redder. Even though she looked like she was about to cry, her eyes were still steady.

“Like… a thief?”

Matthias sneered with his low voice. Leyla’s blushing cheeks were visibly seen even in the dark.

“I just wanted to get back what was rightfully mine.” “Ah. This?”

Leyla’s cheeks flushed harder when he lifted her glasses. When Matthias looked closer at Leyla’s face, her ears were even beginning to turn red.

“Yes.”


Her replies to his questions were quite fearless.

“My glasses that you hid.”

Even though you’re shaking that much.

Matthias headed to the window with the glasses still in his hand. It was the same window that he had thrown her hat over.

“N… No!”

Leyla, who was blankly watching, turned pale as she rushed after him.

“Give it back! Please!”

The lace shawl that had covered Leyla’s shoulder fell to the floor. Leyla hurriedly raised her arms to cover the deeply-cut, v-neck pajamas.

“Isn’t it kind of hilarious that you’re making a big deal over your nightwear when you’ve already thoroughly seen my whole body?”

Matthias now scoffed at Leyla. Her blush had reddened down to the nape of her neck.

“….. That. That was inevitable!”

The frightened Leyla shook her head. “It’s not what I wanted, so I had no choi….”

“Did you think I wanted it?”

“What? Oh….. I’m sorry. I didn’t mean it like that.”

Leyla hastily picked up the shawl and covered her shoulders and her chest. Her half knocked-out expression was fairly amusing that Matthias softly chuckled.


“Why are you acting like a lady all of a sudden? You said you weren’t a lady.”


“….. Whatever I am, the duke is still a gentleman.”

Her refusal of losing to his words was provocative but still respectful. Matthias chuckled once again.

“Well.”

When his chuckling stopped, Matthias’s voice dropped a little more lower. “I don’t know, Leyla. Maybe I’m not a gentleman.” “Oh…No!”

Leyla urgently shouted as she firmly tied the end of her shawl.

“The duke is a gentleman!”

“Really?”

“Yes! You’re the best gentleman in the Berg Empire!” “Your appraisal is quite generous.”

“That’s what everyone who knows you would think.” “Aren’t your thoughts different?”
“…… No.”

Yes!

Although she wanted to agree, she held back her true thoughts by vigorously shaking her head.

“No way.”

Leyla decided to sell her soul for her glasses tonight.

“So, your grace, please give it back.”

She was so upset that tears were about to fall but Leyla begged again.


“It’s very important and precious to me.”

She bowed her head and suffered the humiliation.

Leyla felt like she could kick all the stones in the forest to release her pent-up rage but Leyla knew how much of a disadvantage she was currently in.

If he put his mind to it, the duke could’ve driven her into a thief. He could’ve thrown her glasses into the river beyond the window. All those actions that were simple to him were fatal to Leyla.

So she had to endure.

Matthias approached the determined Leyla. As he threw the glasses up and down again, the gap between the two narrowed. They were now at a distance where they were close enough to feel each other’s body temperature.

Leyla glanced up in surprise. Matthias’s eyes that looked down upon her were deep and tranquil. It was like the bottomless river. The huge, cold river that had engulfed her on that hot afternoon where all this misfortune began.

Leyla was immersed in her thoughts when all of a sudden, her vision, which had been blurry, suddenly became clear. Leyla slowly realized that Matthias had put on her glasses for her. His hands that covered her cheeks, were soft and hot like the sun-heated sand.

His face was distinctively clear, yet everything else surrounding him was cloudy.



The flustered Leyla tried to avoid his eyes but Matthias drew her attention by applying a little force to his hands.

Why…..

She wanted to ask, but a strange and fearful sensation overwhelmed Leyla. It was then, when Matthias’s fingers started caressing her lips.


His relaxed fingertips stopped in between the crevice of her lip. His frustrated sigh tickled Leyla’s forehead. His breath was also soft and hot, like the touch of his fingers.


While directly staring into Leyla’s eyes, Matthias fondled the wet, soft skin that was inside her lower lip. His fingertip deeply moved in and out of her mouth, that the end of his fingernail almost brushed her lower teeth. Leyla, who had long forgotten to run away, innocently endured his gaze and his touch.1

Matthias slowly closed his eyes by the time Leyla was about to cry over his incomprehensible, strange act. The hands that had grasped her cheeks gently gained strength but then was let loose.

Leyla staggered back when his hands finally released her face. She was now able to properly breathe after being tense at his grip.

Leyla’s body gingerly trembled as she gasped for breath. In the meantime, Matthias had opened his blue eyes. It was the crystalline blue eyes that had shamed and frightened Leyla.

Duke Herhardt, who had been staring at Leyla for a long time, quietly ordered.

“Go on.”

Leyla couldn’t remember what had happened after she left the annex.

She said goodbye, turned around, and walked away. But all that memory was vague. Leyla realized she was already standing at the end of the forest road when she heard the cries of the grass bugs, felt the cool wind, and saw her own shadow walking under the moonlight.

Leyla headed for the cabin, still dazed. She didn’t vent her anger on the stones and the tree branches, nor did she run away. She just walked. Her slower-than-usual pace was as weightless as a ghost.


Leyla drew water from the pump that was located in the corner of the yard and washed her lips. She unconsciously rubbed and rubbed her lips until it was swollen and crimson red. Although she felt like her skin was about to peel off, the water had still failed to wash away her strange feelings.

Leyla’s face, her shawl, and the front of her nightwear were soaked with cold water by the time she quietly returned to her room. Without even thinking of drying them, Leyla sat at the edge of her bed.

She didn’t know what had happened, but Leyla was sure for one thing. She didn’t want to run into him ever again. 

The canary that was quietly sitting in its cage flew towards Matthias at the snap of his fingers.

Matthias stretched out his hand towards the bird while he languidly leaned against the window frame. The canary naturally sat on his finger. Its clipped wings had grown long enough for it to fly a little farther. It needed to have its wings cut again, but he didn’t feel the need to cut it as short as before.

Matthias looked down the window while listening to the canary singing. The gardener, Bill Remmer, was in the middle of his job. Leyla Lewellin, who had been helping him from time to time, was nowhere in sight for several days. She was gone the day after the night she went to find her glasses. Leyla desperately started to avoid him.

Matthias wore a scarlet red hunting jacket after returning the canary to its cage.



He desired her.1

Matthias now clearly knew what this emotion was.

That woman, Leyla. He desired her.


There was no reason to deny that fact anymore. Leyla Lewellin grew up to be a beautiful woman. Beautiful enough to provoke a man. But Matthias knew. This kind of desire was bound to disappear shortly after.

Do I need to leave a stain in my life just to satisfy that desire?

That night, with Leyla in front of him, Matthias thought and thought again. And he concluded.

No.

Leyla Lewellin wasn’t worth the trouble and his desire for the woman was within his control.

Then why.

He released Leyla that night. But if she had acted like this after he had set her free, then he had no choice.5

“I’ve prepared your hunting session, master.”

Hessen quietly approached. Nodding his head, Matthias took the gun Hessen had handed him and left the bedroom.



“Did something happen?”

Kyle worriedly asked Leyla. Leyla, who was gluing the pedals of a well-dried flower into her notebook, calmly looked up and faced him.

“No.”

Leyla’s unhesitant voice was bright was usual.

“Do I look that way?”


Leyla lowered her voice and whispered as she wrinkled her eyes. Kyle somehow felt a burning sensation around his neck when he saw her expression.

“You’ve been stuck in the cabin these days. It’s strange.” Kyle calmly shrugged.

Leyla blankly blinked a few times and soon regained her bright face. Her lips left a faint smile as her eyes brilliantly twinkled.

“Now that you’ve found your glasses, you should travel around more. But it seems like you’re doing the opposite now.”

Kyle stared at Leyla as he rested his chin on his hand. She blandly smiled and started to meticulously write down the places and the features of the flower petals she found in her notebook.

Leyla usually drew and pasted unfamiliar flower petals to her notebook and took it to the library to search for their names. Kyle always came along with her to see the smile Leyla would make when she found out the names of the flower petals. Leyla was a child who wanted to know the names of all the birds and flowers in the world. Kyle loved that geeky side of her.4

Leyla carefully covered the notebook after lightly pressing it with a piece of blotting paper to prevent the ink from smudging. The returned glasses glimmered on her small face.

“Wanna take a walk? To that tree you like, the one that stands in front the river.”



“No.”

Leyla briefly replied as soon as Kyle had finished his sentence.

“Didn’t you always go there? Why? Did you see something scary in the woods again?”


“It’s not like that. And I can’t go into the forest today anyways.” “Why? Ah, is today the duke’s hunting day?”

Leyla nodded after pushing the note to the end of the table. Not long after, there was a sound of horseshoes coming from a distance.

“Wow. That’s awesome.”

Kyle quickly ran in front of the window and admired. Duke Herhardt and his group of men were about to enter the forest through a path beside the cabin. The hound dogs were leading the way, followed by five young men on horseback.


Leyla glanced out of the window along with Kyle. The duke was riding a glossy horse with dark brown fur today. His red jacket and sparkling shotgun caught her eye.


“But of course, Leyla. I don’t hunt. I won’t hunt for the rest of my life.”4

Kyle suddenly changed his expression after admiring the duke. At that moment, Duke Herhadt had turned his head towards the hut. Even though Leyla was already hiding behind the curtains, she was startled and backed away from the window.


For the past ten days, Leyla tried her best to evade him. She didn’t go near the river and she didn’t even take a stroll into the forest. She felt apologetic towards Uncle Bill because he had recently gone out to manage the garden all alone. She only helped when the duke was out of the estate and when he returned, she briskly left the garden.


She was planning to endure her inconvenient actions until the end of this summer. When autumn came, Matthias was going to get engaged and leave for the capital city. Then, Arvis was going to be at peace again.

“Do you not feel well? Do you want to come over to my house?”


Kyle anxiously asked while looking at Leyla’s pale complexion.

“No, Kyle. I’m fine.”

Leyla shook her head and sat back on her seat that faced the dinner table.

“It’ll be over by evening anyways.”

The moment she carelessly opened her book, shots rang out. It was followed by the barking of the hounds and the running of the horses.

With her fist clenched, Leyla turned the pages of her book that she couldn’t read properly.

She thought she had no choice but to go to the woods this evening. There were many poor birds to bury.


Chapter 15

After sending his party first, Matthias pulled up his horse in the middle of a wide road between the woods. When he took off his hat, the tangled hair draped down his forehead. The forest, which was swept away by the bloody disturbance, felt more tranquil than usual.

Today’s hunt was quite enjoyable. Matthias hit every target he aimed at and each moment was as thrilling as ever. But he somehow felt unsatisfied because of that one bird that had desperately attempted to fly away.

While looking towards the direction of the cabin, Matthias slowly turned his horse. The little girl who lived in his hunting grounds came out of the woods crying when the hunt was over and had buried the dead birds. He still remembered her actions because it was so absurd.

Then what about that woman who is no longer a young girl?

Brooding his curious interest, Matthias aimed his gun at the little bird resting at the edge of the branch.

Bang.

With an upbeat shot, the bird dropped to the floor.4

Matthias steadily motioned his horse to move as he left behind the prey he hit.

Once. And then once again.

Aiming and firing, Matthias headed for the evening forest. One by one, the blood-stained birds fell along the road.



I hate him.1

Leyla dug a hole and repeated those words every time she buried each and every bird.1

I hate the duke’s atrocious hobby. I really hate it.

Wiping her sweaty forehead, Leyla swallowed down her sorrows. She thought she was almost at the end when just a few meters away, another bloody bird was there lying down. Leyla grabbed her shovel and approached the bird.

She didn’t want to blame the act of killing an animal. Uncle Bill had also hunted for food and Leyla raised livestock. But it was hard to understand why the duke killed for entertainment and thoughtlessly left his hunt behind.

When will this summer be over?


With a long sigh, Leyla prayed that her favorite season would quickly come to an end as she buried another bird. It was a red-crowned bird with a beautiful pattern.

Leyla suddenly felt something strange after she had already entered deep into the evening forest. Duke Herhardt enjoyed hunting and Leyla buried those birds he hunted down every year. But somehow, Leyla never had any previous memories of making a regular sequence of tombs. It felt like she was creating a pathway made up of dead birds.

Should I turn around now?

Leyla seized when she sensed an ominous feeling. The sky she looked up was blazing red. As she turned her gaze from the sunset down beyond the bush of shrubs. She saw him.

Duke Herhardt, who was sitting on the cut tree trump, stared back at her.

Leyla almost stumbled as her mind went blank. He greeted her in a carefree way.1

“Hello, Leyla.”4

Matthias von Herhardt’s voice was as smooth as the feathers of the birds he shot and killed.



“By the way, Matthias is quite late. I think the people who went out with him are already back.”

Elysee von Herhardt’s eyes slanted while she put down her card. The card game she was playing was getting boring. She wanted to start dinner early but Matthias hadn’t returned from the hunting grounds yet.

“He said he’ll take a walk in the woods.”

Claudine answered with a friendly smile. Her expression was unlike that of a person who had just lost the game.

The ladies, who were well aware it was her deliberate defeat, looked at Claudine with a pleasing smile. The next Duchess of Arvis was sharp and had courtesy as well as grace. Claudine knew she was greatly praised between the aristocratic ladies.

“Matthias sure loves that forest.”

Elysee von Herhardt lightly rang the bell and the maid began to organize the table.

The bored ladies who sat around the reception table enjoyed a simple snack and chatted. They chatted about the most obvious stories with the most formality.

“Oh, Claudine. Why don’t you invite your friends and open a party?”

Claudine’s eyes went wide open at Elysee’s von Herhardt’s recommendation.

“Me? Here in Arvis?”

“You’ll be bored dealing with us every day, so don’t you need a change of heart?”

“No. Not at all.”

“Why are you so surprised. I was just kidding Claudine.”

Elysee’s relaxed, smiling face was so young and beautiful, it was hard to believe that she was the mother of an engaged son. She resembled Matthias.

Although the Duchess Elysee von Herhardt was praised by the people of the empire for her time-honored beauty, she had failed to win her husband’s love. When Claudine thought about Elysee’s tragic love life, she believed women who were obsessed with love were ridiculous.

Matthias’s predecessor had a mistress like any other man in his position, but he didn’t cause any trouble for his next successor by bringing in an illegitimate child. Even though they didn’t love each other, the Duke and Duchess of Arvis respected each other and remained faithful to their duties. There were no meaningless greed or hope that gnawed out the calm household. Claudine had hoped for the same relationship with Matthias.

“You don’t have to feel pressured Claudine. Think of it as a rehearsal. We’ll also have fun if the mansion is crowded with young people.”

Elysee’s smile had gotten much brighter.

“Don’t you ladies think so too?”

Everyone in the room knew that her question was not actually asking for their opinion.

“The duchess is truly generous and caring.”

Countess Brandt praised Elysee. Soon, other ladies joined by making complementary remarks with some exaggeration added.

Claudine shyly smiled as she gently lowered her head. She was thinking of the names of friends she had wanted to invite until she drew her eyes to the window. That girl came into mind when she saw the forest beyond the sunset garden.

Leyla, the poor orphan who lived in that forest.

She was well-mannered and very mindful of her own circumstances but she was still somewhat arrogant.2

“May I invite Leyla?”

Claudine’s cheerful question raised the eyebrows of the ladies.

“You mean the orphan the gardener raises?”

“Yes. That girl, Leyla Lewellin.”

“Hey. Claudine.”

The embarrassed Countess Brandt glared at Claudine but Claudine was undisturbed.

“That pitiful girl must have never attended a formal party before. I want to give Leyla an unforgettable experience.”3

Claudine didn’t lose her ladylike courtesy and dignity even when she made those imposing remarks.

“After hearing your words, it does indeed make sense.”

A satisfied smile was on Duchess Norma Catarina von Herhart’s face, who had been watching Claudine this entire time.

“Do as you please, Claudine.”

Leyla looked back at the path of buried birds. When she turned her head and examined the duke, there was only one conclusion that she reached.

Crazy person.1

There were no other words to explain this situation.

Leyla’s bloody gloves were filled with sweat. Her heart began to throb with rage mixed with fear.

Run away.

That was what she could only think of and was about to return to the cabin when she heard his voice.

“Leyla.”

His expression was impassive while he steadily pronounced her name.

“Leyla Lewellin.”

The name he quietly intoned sounded like a song.

Leyla used the shovel in her hand as a cane to straighten her posture. She firmly closed her lips and applied strength to both her legs.

There was no use running away. As long as he put his mind to it, the duke could easily catch Leyla. Her mind became clear and cold.

Leyla raised her twitching eyes and met his gaze. The sound of the forest swaying in the wind rose while the quiet stares remained.

“Continue.”

Matthias broke the silence first.

“You should do your job.”

On the side of the bushes he indicated with his eyes, there lay a bird that seemed to be the last of his hunt. Leyla plodded up to the bird. There was a red thread tied to the bloody bird’s ankle. It was the thread Leyla had tied to the baby birds who hatched near the Schulter River last year.

Leyla dug a hole without a word and buried the bird. She was now used to her actions because of that beautiful bird slaughterer.

“That thread. Did you tie it?”

He asked while observing.

“Yes.”

“Why.”

“I wanted to notice the birds that left their nest to migrate… When they ever came back.”

Leyla answered while patting the soil.

“I didn’t want this kind of reunion.”

As she felt a shortness of breath, Leyla saw Duke Herhardt’s nonchalant face.

“Do you want to criticize me?”

He asked while sitting cross-legged. At that moment, the mockery that grazed past his lips made Leyla’s patience run out.

“I can’t refuse to say no.”

“What’s the problem?”

His eyebrows frowned.

“I only hunted my birds, in my territory, and in my hunting grounds.”

“But the birds don’t know.”

Think of Uncle Bill.

Leyla finally opened her mouth despite the repeated words in her head.


“For the birds, it’s just a forest. A place where they are born and raised. It’s also a place where they would want to come back after their migration.”

“Do I need to bother understanding them?”

“Not really, but…..”

Leyla took off her bloody garden gloves and steadied her breath.

“You don’t have to hunt them down so cruelly.”

In order to let those words come out of her mouth, she had mustered a lot of courage. There was a belated regret that came after, but the duke showed no displeasure or anger. The strange calmness made Leyla feel more suffocated.

“Leyla Lewellin, the woman who knows the birds’ hearts well.”

Matthias opened his mouth after a long period of silence.

“What the hell do you think hunting is?”

“What?”

“Do you want me to do some kind of friendly hunting?”

His ridicule clawed out her heart. Leyla endured his insult by simply twisting her skirt.

“…… I’m sorry. I’ve said something presumptuous. Please forgive my disrespect.”

“Why do you like birds so much?”

“I don’t think it’ll be an interesting story for you.”

Leyla lowered her eyes because she didn’t want to see him anymore. The duke stood in silence.

“Now that I’ve finished my work, I’ll get going.”

She bowed deeply as he still remained hushed.

Leyla relievedly turned her body. And just when she was about take a step forward, a bitter shot rang out.

Leyla swiftly turned around with a ghastly expression. The duke had fired a shot towards the end of a tree branch and was looking at her with a gun in his hand. Another bloody bird lay in between him and Leyla.

“What to do, Leyla.”

The duke sat back on the tree trunk as if nothing had happened.

“I don’t think your job has finished yet.



Chapter 16

As the sun began to set, the forest rapidly darkened.

Leyla looked at the dead bird with unfocused eyes while Matthias stared at Leyla. There was a long moment of silence, but Matthias wasn’t impatient. Leyla was right in front of him and he believed she probably wouldn’t able to run away for a while.

“Just……”

Leyla soon lifted her head. Her eyes were filled with indignation that even the darkness couldn’t hide.

Her eyes were arrogant and daring, but he thought that was much better than avoiding eye contact.

“Just tell me. What did I do wrong?”

“Wrong?”

“Yes. What kind of wrongdoing did I commit for me… for me to get punished like this?”

“I never gave you any punishment.”

Matthias answered quite seriously.

“I did my job, and you did yours, Leyla.”

He was sincere.

“Wrongdoing… Well…”

After a moment of thought, Matthias looked at Leyla with a subdued look.

“Why do you like birds so much?”

The same question was asked with a tone that wasn’t a bit different from a little while ago.

When she opened her tightly shut eyes, Leyla looked at the sky, the dead bird, and then at Matthias again. Her shoulders were trembling, but her eyes were wide open. Matthias found it quite hilarious and a little irritating.

“For always being by my side.”

Leyla Lewellin clearly answered. She sounded a little furious, but she wasn’t threatening.


“I’ve always been wandering around so many places ever since I was a child, but the birds were always there wherever I went. Always near me. When the seasons changed, some of the birds that left never failed to come back when I waited for them. The birds always returned.”

Leyla’s voice calmed down as she continued to speak. Her voice sounded very delicate. It was perhaps, because of her soft pronunciation.

“There are no seasons without birds. There are no places that don’t have birds. I love being around those beautiful and free creatures.”

“Really?”

“Yes. Although my words may be meaningless to the duke.”

Bluffing with a face that’s about to cry.

Matthias stood up with a low snicker. His dinner feast was drawing near before he knew it.

“Are you going to hunt like this again?”

Leyla hurriedly asked him as he was about to make his leave.

“If necessary.”

Matthias answered with no hesitation. At that moment when Leyla’s eyes filled up with despair, fear, and anger, Matthias was pleased.

“Leyla.”

After changing his mind to pass by her, Matthias stopped in front of her.

“I want everything in my world to be in its place. In a place where nothing needlessly hides or runs away.”

“What do you mean?”

“Stay in your place.”

“I…. I don’t know what you mean by ‘place’.”

“Think it over.”

“Duke.”

“Who knows? If you find the answer, I might start having ‘friendly’ hunting sessions.”

Matthias turned with no hesitation while Leyla was left behind in a daze. He really didn’t want much from Leyla Lewellin. However, he wanted Leyla to be in Leyla’s position. As an orphan who lives in the forest. As a curious schoolgirl. And soon, as a female teacher at the place where she should be in.


Sitting on the back of his horse, Matthias turned his head and looked towards the bush. Leyla had crouched her small body in front of the dead bird. Seeing her cheeks sparkling, he believed she was probably crying. There was a sense of satisfaction in Matthias’s eyes when he saw the tears.6

He was born into a world dominated by perfect order and was soon to become its master. Everything was simple and clear under that order. It was not at all difficult to live up to a given role and expectation.1

The grandmother’s and mother’s proud successor. The generous master to the people of Arvis. The brilliant officer on the battlefield. The directors’ competent businessman.

Matthias was always someone’s ‘something’ and was willing to play the appropriate role. The people who treated him were no different. The prescribed roles, attitudes, and refined emotions came and went by him in an orderly fashion. Those were the feelings that Matthias saw, heard, and learned.

But that lowly orphan who lives in my forest?

Matthias’s eyes at Leyla narrowed.

She’s nothing.

The easy conclusion made Matthias smile.

It was his first time to have something that was ‘nothing’. There weren’t any unnecessary stains needed in Duke Herhardt’s life.

It was strange to have something that wasn’t necessary in his life, but he thought it wasn’t too bad. The emotions that woman, who was nothing, showed toward him entertained him. Just like the moment of a flying bird falling to its death entertained him.

Most of all, the tears. He liked the crying Leyla. She was a woman who cried prettily. Pretty enough to make her cry again and again.

Matthias left the forest with a lighter heart.

The usual routine was repeated in the mansion he returned to. The boisterous dinner time. The empty but elaborate conversations. The cold champagne and the phony laughters.

When the short summer night passed and morning came again, Matthias thought it wouldn’t be too bad to do a ‘friendly’ hunt next time. When he looked out the window, Leyla was there in the rose garden. She was silently helping out with the gardener’s work.

See?

Matthias turned away from the window with a smile.+

It’s easy, Leyla.

“Thank you, Leyla.”

Claudine kindly expressed her gratitude. Claudine’s friend, who had sat beside her, also thanked Leyla with a slightly pulled smile.

“No problem, Miss.”

Leyla politely bowed. Her white hands were grasped together. There were grass stains at the end of her fingertips, which were from the flowers she had picked. There were also several bloodstained wounds from the rose thorns that had stabbed her fingers.

“I’m now……”

“Can you cut off that red rose as well? I think a bundle would be enough.”

Claudine cut off Leyla’s words with a gentle question.

Leyla turned her head and looked towards the direction that Claudine had pointed to. It was the central flower bed of the garden. There were splendidly colored red roses in full bloom.

“Yes, Miss.”

Leyla obediently followed orders as usual.

Claudine quietly looked at Leyla’s distant back as Leyla grabbed her basket and scissors again.

Claudine had found Leyla while walking in the garden with a friend who had visited Arvis. After being out of sight for several days, she was now working diligently today to help the gardener.

Claudine changed their plans to have tea together and then suggested arranging flowers to her friend. Emilia agreed with delight, and the floral arrangements for the two ladies were prepared under the pergola that was beneath the vine roses.

And then Leyla.

Claudine sent a maid to call Leyla. They’ve been like that since childhood. It was Leyla Lewellin’s job to pick up the roses Claudine needed whenever she started arranging flowers under the pergola.

She was not enough to be Claudine’s playmate, but Leyla followed errands well. On days where everything was boring, Claudine occasionally called for Leyla to say a few words.

“That girl, she acts very politely, but it strangely feels arrogant.”

Emilia pouted her lips as she watched Leyla.

“What should I say… It seems like she doesn’t know her circumstances that well.”

“Don’t be like that, Emilia. Leyla is a pitiful child.”

Claudine lightly frowned. The rose branches were cut off with the scissors that Leyla had given her.

“Of course, she does have some flaws, but let’s still be tolerant of her.”

Emilia grinned at Claudine’s words.

“Well. You’re too generous to your residents.”

“Residents who do their part faithfully should be respected.”

Claudine’s voice got lower and softer. The blue porcelain vase was filled one by one with the flowers she trimmed.

Leyla soon returned with a bundle of red roses. Again, with impeccable politeness, Leyla bowed and put the roses on the table.

Claudine stopped her moving hands and looked at Leyla. Emilia’s critique of Leyla was correct. Claudine, who had seen that child for a long time, agreed with Emilia’s remarks.

Claudine had a vague idea of why Emilia was able to make such a critique.

Leyla Lewellin’s docile demeanor seemed like it actually came through her unconcerned attitude. There were famous aristocratic daughters who were anxious to be friends with Claudine, and yet, Leyla was not excited or pleased at all whenever Claudine was near her. Leyla didn’t bother to look good in front of Claudine. She never flattered Claudine either.

She was just that type to submissively endure and follow orders.

Claudine wasn’t used to such indifference. The fact that Claudine had received such indifference from the orphan made her feel humiliated.

“Good work, Leyla.”

Claudine smiled.

Leyla stepped back as she bowed and the maid, who was waiting a few steps away, approached Leyla. It was the moment Claudine had looked forward to the most. The moment when Leyla’s authentic emotions were revealed through her eyes when she was given the gold coin in her hands.

After all these years, Leyla still couldn’t maintain her composure when she was presented with the gold coin. Claudine was satisfied when Leyla’s hand that held the gold coin, trembled as if she was holding a hot potato. Claudine was planning to present her with another gift to top it off. An invitation to the party that would give that pitiful child a beautiful memory.

“Are you giving this to me?”

Leyla’s eyes grew bigger when she received an invitation from the same maid who had provided her the gold coin. She looked very flustered.


“Yes. I had asked for permission and the two madams allowed it.” “But, Miss…..”

“I really want you to come, Leyla.”

Claudine smiled as she cut off Leyla’s words again. Leyla’s face turned pale while Claudine’s smile grew brighter.

“I’m sure you won’t refuse my invitation.”

After Claudine spoke to Leyla as if she was her longtime childhood friend, Claudine then turned her eyes away.

I’m going to have to tame that stiff child before I become Duchess of Arvis.

Claudine started to trim the red roses while calmly reflecting on her intentions.

The rose vase decorated by the skilled Claudine was perfectly beautiful.


Chapter 17

Mr. Remmer’s Leyla was invited to the duke’s party.

The rumor quickly spread among the residents of Arvis. Everyone was initially puzzled, but at the end, they expressed their sympathy for Leyla. The people who lived at Arvis well knew how Lady Brandt treated the pitiful Leyla like her dog.

“I don’t get why all the aristocrats are so malicious.”

Upon hearing the news, Mrs. Mona, the cook, immediately rushed to the cabin that afternoon. The news was a bolt out of the blue for Bill Remmer, who was taking a break from the midday heat.

“The aristocrats say that they’re being considerate, but how intimidated Leyla would be in such a place?”

“Leyla isn’t that type of child to get intimidated by things like that. She can just show her face for a while and come back.”

“Ugh. Men. They know nothing!”

Mrs. Mona shed a tear while Bill scratched his neck and put out his cigarette.

“Let’s show them what they deserve!”

“What the hell do you mean?”

“What else do you think I mean? With Leyla’s pretty looks, let’s take the aristocrat ladies down a peg or two.”

“No, why are you so…….”

“I knew it. Were you thinking of sending Leyla to the party in her uniform?”

What’s wrong with school uniforms?

When Bill made a puzzled look, Mrs. Mona tsked and shook her head.

“Look here, Bill Remmer. Don’t you think you should know how to raise a daughter now, after all these years?”

“What do you mean daughter? I’m just… Still thinking about where to send her….”1

“Sure. That thinking you do. You’ll think when you send Leyla off on her wedding day, think when you hold her children, and think even when you’re in your coffin.”

“No! How can you possibly send that little girl away to a marriage! You’re talking nonsense.”

Mrs. Mona’s lips softened after she saw Bill heat up with anger.

“And you say she’s not your daughter. You’re a man I really can’t understand.”

“If you’re going to keep talking nonsense, leave.”

“Let’s buy her a fetching dress, Mr. Remmer. Like a surprise present. She’s a girl. How happy would she be?”

Mrs. Mona emphatically said as if it was a command.

“Leyla’s not that kind of child to ask for a dress, and you’re not the type of person to care, so I have no choice but to come forward. I’ll help you.”

“…… How?”

“If you pay for the dress, I’ll prepare it for her.”1

“Then go ahead.”

While grumbling, Bill entered the house and brought out his purse. He always kept money in the cabin because he distrusted the bank.

Leyla, who had been to the goat’s cage, returned when Mrs. Mona steadily accepted the money for the dress, including the shoes. The two hurriedly hid the traces of their deal and acted in pretense.

Leyla offered her a cup of tea, but Mrs. Mona refused and left the cabin. In the meantime, Bill hid his purse into his back pocket.

“Did Mrs. Mona nag you about me again? I haven’t been climbing trees lately.”

Leyla anxiously asked after sitting on a chair next to Bill.

“It’s not like that, so don’t worry about it.”

Bill cleared his throat and then lit up the cigarette he had extinguished for a while.

“I’m glad to hear that.”

Leyla smiled and leaned deep into her chair after taking off her hat.

This summer, Bill was more than happy to see Leyla’s straw hat she wore every day. When he thought it would be several times more rewarding to see Leyla dressed up in a lavish dress, he no longer regretted giving his money to Mrs. Mona.

“Leyla.”

Leyla looked at Bill when he suddenly called her name.

“What are you planning to do? The duke’s party.”

“I’m just going to stop by and show my face. The Etman household was also invited, so I decided to go with Kyle.”2

“Really? That herbivorous glutton is finally paying off all that food he ate in my house.”

Bill felt a deep sense of relief when he heard Kyle’s name. Bill deeply trusted Kyle.

“Even so, don’t you need anything? Clothes to wear, things like that?”

“I’m fine, uncle.”

“What do you mean you’re fine. Are you planning to wear your uniform?”

“That’s not a bad idea.”

Leyla snickered playfully. Her face looked so calm that Bill was lost in thoughts.

Do I really not know how to raise a daughter?

“No.”

Bill muttered to himself in astonishment.

What do you mean, daughter? What nonsense.

He shook his head.

Leyla looked at Bill with a confused look on her face. He felt uncomfortable when he saw the glittering glasses on her small face.

Bill was well aware of the child’s struggles to avoid causing trouble and not be indebted to him if possible. It was understandable. Nevertheless, he didn’t know how to comfort her, so he always said blunt things to her.

He admitted that Mrs. Mona, although she was somewhat extreme, had made a brilliant decision to surprise Leyla with a dress and shoes.

“Leyla.”

Bill gathered up his courage and called her name again.

“….. The weather is awfully hot.”

The words he had originally wanted to say failed to come out.

Bill cleared up his throat after saying useless things. Leyla laughed and gently grasped his hand that was on the chair’s armrest.

I’m the one who should be comforting you instead.

Even with a sour look on his face, Bill couldn’t shake off that little hand. Leyla gave him a smile. She was a child that smiled gorgeously.

Leyla woke up instantaneously. It was dawn, and the room was filled with ink-colored darkness.

Lying motionless, Leyla slowly looked around.

Familiar ceiling. Window with creamy curtains. Old desk with a few books spread out on it. Soft quilt with a faint smell of sunlight.

I’m in my room.

A sigh of relief came out when she realized where she was.

She had a nightmare after a long time. She was reminded of the time when she was left all alone in this world and had moved around the homes of her relatives. Every day, she had experienced a repetition of nightmares until she met Uncle Bill. But her memory of the house that instilled her fear of water remained deep and clear.

‘This is all because of her!’

When her uncle was drunk, he had expressed his anger at Leyla. He was a timid and quiet man when he was sober, but the uncle Leyla remembered was a man who was drunk five days a week. On the days when he lost his money at the gambling table, he became more aggressive. He had cursed and smacked Leyla without fail.

She hated him. She despised him. But all Leyla Lewellin, the orphan who had nowhere else to go, could do was to bear it.

Leyla desperately tried her best. She helped with housework without a break. She tried to eat less. Like an object placed at the corner of the house, she barely moved around. Yet, on the day she was eventually kicked out of the house, her aunt handed her a paper bag with some cookies in it. Leyla received the paper bag and greeted her bruised aunt goodbye.

Leyla took out a cookie and ate it in the back of the wagon before heading to her next relative’s house.

Her heart broke because the chocolate cookies were so delicious.

But Leyla didn’t cry. She practiced smiling on the way to her destination. The more she wanted to cry, the brighter she smiled. No one in this world liked crying orphans. Her smile had improved after getting kicked out again and again.

But she wasn’t able to easily smile when she had to cross the border to Berg. The young Leyla believed the one address grasped in her hand was her last hope. If she was abandoned again, she was forced to go to an orphanage.


Leyla still couldn’t forget the day she had her best smile the moment she met Uncle Bill’s eyes, which were full of warmth and compassion. She would never forget the day she finally had a family and a house that she would always want to go back to.

So everything was alright.

Leyla relieved herself and lightly got out of bed.

The duke’s party was held this evening. Leyla didn’t want to mind or dwell much about it. She was planning to proudly attend the party and quietly leave.

Lady Claudine didn’t know. How much Leyla was willing to do anything for Uncle Bill and this warm cabin.

Leyla opened her window. She hurriedly washed her face and changed her clothes. When she vigorously opened the door, she saw Uncle Bill, who has already prepared to go out for gardening.

“Let’s go together, uncle!”



When the afternoon came, the mansion was already ready to welcome guests. It was a large-scale party, but it was a daily part of the life of the Arvis residents.

They did what they had to do in their respective positions. All that remained left was the sun to set to mark the start of the fancy party. No one in this Arvis was worried about the success of today’s party. For tonight’s party would have been perfect, as was everything that lay in the Herhardt’s name.

Matthias left the dressing room in his evening coat. He left a colder impression whenever he combed his hair back and revealed his forehead and eyebrows. The faint smile on the tip of his lips had failed to soften his sharp facial features and his piercing eyes.

“It went well as you ordered, master.”

Hessen whispered. Matthias turned around with a cigarette in his hand and slightly raised his eyebrow.

“They left about an hour ago, so the prepared items must have been delivered by now.”

“I see.”

After he nodded, Matthias lit the end of the cigarette that was in between his lips.

“Well done.”

Hessen bowed his head at Matthias’s response with a slight smile.


The news that Claudine had invited Leyla Lewellin to the party came to Matthias through his mother’s mouth. His mother praised the kindhearted Claudine, who had shown compassion and charity to the poor orphan.

Matthias didn’t bother to oppose because he thought it would be quite an entertaining sight. The sight of Leyla arriving to the party in her shabby clothes, and Claudine showing her full sympathy and kindness.

Matthias seemed to know what aspect of Leyla Lewellin was stimulating Claudine. Leyla was an annoying little girl, so it was quite the enjoyment to break her pride.3

That was why.

That was why he didn’t want to give her to Claudine. All that enjoyment and pleasure belonged to him and him only. Matthias von Herhardt didn’t know how to share his own with others.

“What shall I do with these, master?”

Hessen pointed to the box near the fireplace where the fire was put out. It was the gift box the chef had prepared for Bill Remmer.

The gift, which was supposed to be delivered to Bill Remmer’s cabin today, was moved here through Hessen. Hessen had switched the chef’s gift with the box Matthias had ordered him to prepare.

Matthias slowly smoked as he gazed at the gift. It was not that difficult to guess what was in it without opening it.

“Get rid of it.”

His order that flowed out with the cigarette smoke was calm.


Chapter 18

“Uncle, this is… too much.”

Leyla, who looked into the box with wide eyes, said in a trembling voice. Bill couldn’t find a suitable rebuttal. He too was surprised.

“How much did you spend?”

Leyla gave Bill a look of reproach.

“No. That’s…. Well…. I’ve spent enough! You care too much about everything.”

Bill barely came to his senses when he answered back. The dress Mrs. Mona prepared had arrived at the cabin on the day of the party. Bill believed the mailman would bring the dress in, but a young man who seemed to be an employee of the dress shop delivered it himself.

Bill thought Mrs. Mona must have paid special attention to the dress well enough for the nicely dressed employee to deliver it directly to them. When Leyla opened the box, the dress was beyond Bill’s expectations. Even in Bill’s eyes, who didn’t know a thing about women’s clothes and accessories, the white dress stitched with gold threads looked very luxurious and heavenly. The same was true of the shoes, gloves, and the necklace.

How much did I pay Mrs. Mona again?

Bill calculated with his fingers folded.

But did she take the money for the necklace?

Bill was puzzled and had calculated again while Leyla firmly covered the box lid.

“Why? You don’t like it?”

“No way.”

“Then why?”

“Let’s return it. I can’t let you spend this much money on a party that lasts for just one day.”

Unlike Mrs. Mona’s assurance that the gift would thrill her, Leyla simply looked worried.

“Leyla, if you don’t wear this to the party. I won’t ever see you again.”

Bill’s face suddenly turned cold.

“You always don’t want to be indebted to me. I know your reasons, but Leyla, you shouldn’t draw a clear line between me and you.”

“Uncle…..”

“If you don’t take it, I’ll just use it as a firecracker. And I’ll never see you again, Leyla.”

The red-faced Bill stepped out of the front door as if he was running away. As he circled around the flower bed and smoked, his mind was filled with late regrets for saying such mean words to the child. He didn’t mean it when he said he’d never see her again.

While Bill was wondering if he should go back in, Kyle walked in from the other side of the road in his tailcoat. Bill used to believe Kyle was just a little boy who always pretended to be an adult, but seeing him dressed up so nicely, Bill realized that he was all grown up now.4

“Mr. Remmer. What about Leyla?”

Kyle excitedly asked.

“Well. I don’t know.”

“What? Leyla’s not home? The party’s about to begin.”

“Not really, but……”

While Bill hesitated, not knowing how to explain the situation, the front door creaked open. The two men inadvertently turned their heads and gasped.

An unfamiliar Leyla stood there.

~

“Kyle, don’t I look weird?”

Leyla asked with a grimace.

“I feel so awkward wearing these clothes…..”

“You’re pretty.”

Kyle, who had barely been able to speak for a while, decisively cut Leyla’s words.

“You’re beautiful, Leyla. I mean it.”1

Kyle said once again with conviction. His childlike smile disappeared as his face turned red. He was aware that Uncle Bill was planning to prepare a gift for Leyla, but he had never imagined it would be this much.

He was really worried about Bill’s eye for picking tacky things, but this was……

“Wake up, Kyle Etman.”

Bill clicked his tongue and patted Kyle’s flustered back.

“You’re going in my place today.”

Bill looked at Kyle with a serious look.

“That means you have to take responsibility and protect her. You can do it, right?”

“Of course, Mr. Remmer.”

Kyle replied emphatically.

“I’ll make sure to protect her!”

Bill burst out laughing when he watched Kyle vow with a crimson red face. In the meantime, Leyla took a cautious step towards Kyle. Kyle relieved his beating chest with repeated deep breaths and reached out his hand in a dignified manner.

“What’s this?”

Leyla confusedly asked about his hand, but Kyle didn’t panic.

“Today’s the party. And we’re partners.”

“Yeah.”

“So.”

Kyle mustered up his courage and led Leyla’s hand over his arm.

“It’s what it’s supposed to be. Being your partner for the party.”

Kyle was so nervous, he almost stammered.

Leyla, after being lost in thought for a while, nodded assiduously and lightly linked her arms around Kyle’s.

“Let’s go, Kyle.”

The moment Leyla smiled brighter than the sun, Kyle thought.

I will never forget this moment for the rest of my life.

Leyla Lewellin appeared with the doctor’s son.

When Matthias was greeting the guests, he suddenly turned his eyes and saw Leyla entering the hall under Kyle Etman’s escort.


Hessen had proved himself to be the most competent butler through Leyla’s appearance. Leyla Lewellin was gorgeous with the outfit Hessen picked. Matthias believed she would still be beautiful, even with the shabby gift the chef had chosen for her.

Matthias’s gaze shifted from her shoes, her dress, and then to the necklace that adorned Leyla’s white, slender neck. It was a stunning necklace pieced together by pearls and emeralds. Hessen prepared the dress and shoes, but Matthias chose the necklace. It was unexpected. He was on his way to the hotel because he had an appointment and saw the necklace in a display window near the hotel. The lucid green color of the emerald, delicately crafted, was quite impressive. While he was returning to his estate that day, Matthias had instructed Hessen to buy the necklace.1

Leyla noticed Matthias’s gaze as she suddenly turned her head. Her eyes, resembling the lively summer forest, stopped exactly on Matthias’s face. Leyla seemed to recognize who he was only after she squinted her eyes.

Unlike Matthias, who looked at her with an unwavering stare, Leyla avoided eye contact in surprise. She tightly held the boy’s arm and hid behind him.

“Long time no see, Duke Herhardt.”

Matthias turned away after a familiar face gave a greeting.

With a modest smile, he welcomed the guest and exchanged brief regards. Although his mind was in a different place, Matthias was able to perfectly accomplish his job.

When Matthias turned his eyes again, Leyla and the boy were moving away to the other side of the hall.

Kyle Etman triumphantly escorted Leyla. He led that woman and acted as if she was his.



“This is Leyla. She’s my friend.”

Claudine took Leyla to another group of ladies.

“Hello. I’m Leyla Lewellin.”

And Leyla did her part again with a polite greeting. She acted as if she was a doll without any will or emotion.

Claudine gave a gleaming smile and continued to introduce her to other people. Claudine was satisfied with how obedient and kind Leyla was.

“Leyla’s preparing to become a teacher. Isn’t that wonderful?”

The ladies agreed with Claudine’s proud praise in unison and complimented Leyla. Their compliments were a tribute to Lady Claudine, who regarded the poor orphan as her friend. The ladies knew the two couldn’t be real friends, and that reality didn’t impair Claudine’s dignity.

“Oh, Claudine. I heard you’re about to get engaged.”

One of the ladies gracefully changed the subject as if she was done talking about an orphan who was about to become a teacher. Everyone’s interests were now focused on Claudine Brandt’s engagement.

Claudine took a shy and humble attitude. Since the engagement hadn’t been officially announced yet, it was frivolous to act as if she had already become Duchess Herhardt.

“The Duke Herhardt is here!”

Another lady standing in the opposite direction of Claudine gasped in admiration.

Everyone’s eyes moved toward the direction the lady pointed at. Leyla, who had a perfunctory smile this whole time, had widened her eyes along with Claudine.

Matthias brushed past Leyla and naturally stood beside Claudine. Claudine wrapped her arms around his. Leyla’s face, when she glanced at the two, was visibly paler than before.

“They’re my friends, Duke Herhardt.”

When Claudine started introducing them, Matthias greeted them elegantly. Matthias’s gaze, as he looked at one person after another, stopped on Leyla’s face standing at the end of the group.

“It’s Leyla.”

Claudine tightly grasped Matthias’s arm.

“You couldn’t recognize her, right? She so different than usual that I almost didn’t recognize her either.”

Leyla blushed in embarrassment at what Claudine said in the guise of sarcasm. No matter what insults Claudine gave towards the emotionless Leyla, Leyla always seemed to react differently when Matthias was in front of her.

“Um, excuse me.”

A warm voice dissipated the sudden silence. It was Kyle Etman, the boy who had been loitering around with a disapproving look ever since Claudine took Leyla away.

“I’m sorry to interrupt, but may I take my partner now?”7

Kyle held Leyla’s hand without hesitation. She seemed a little surprised, but Leyla didn’t refuse his touch. Rather, she looked as if she was a lost child who had found her parents.

“My friends are also eagerly waiting to be introduced to Leyla.”

Unlike his gentle demeanor, Kyle’s eyes on Claudine were firm and cold.

“Then I’ll have to give my permission. We can’t keep holding Leyla on for too long.”


Claudine willingly nodded her head and looked at Matthias. Matthias was watching Leyla and Kyle with insensitive eyes.

“Thank you, Lady Brandt. And Duke Herhardt.”

Kyle bowed politely.

“Let’s go, Leyla.”

It wasn’t until Kyle showed a gentle smile when he saw Leyla’s face. Through his mellow smile, Claudine could tell. That boy loved Leyla.

Leyla looked smaller and thinner next to Kyle, who was as tall as Matthias. The boy seemed to cherish Leyla like a treasure.

What about Leyla?

Claudine carefully examined Leyla with her lightly opened eyes. She was smiling back at Kyle. Leyla Lewellin always smiled in front of Claudine, but it was the first time Claudine had seen her face smiling as comfortable and bright as now. It didn’t seem to be unreasonable to say that she looked like a girl in love.

It was the son of the doctor, not Duke Herhardt?

Claudine was in confusion as Leyla and Kyle turned around.

Then was it him that made Leyla Lewellin into a princess?

“Ah, Leyla!”

Claudine, who had been pondering, impulsively opened her lips. The chandelier light had shined down upon Leyla.

“How pretty you are today. Especially that necklace.”

“What? Ah….. yes. Thank you, miss.”

The bewildered Leyla fondled her necklace. The long necklace that dangled over Leyla’s chest suited her well. The edges of the emerald that gave off the same color of her eyes were meticulously crafted into a flower petal. It looked authentic. The same went for the milky-white pearls. All the jewels were too delicate and alluring to be regarded as imitations.

Can that Kyle Etman, the son of the doctor’s family, afford to hang such a necklace on Leyla?

“Isn’t that right, Duke Herhardt?”

Claudine faced Matthias and smiled.

“Yes. She does.”

Matthias answered without a grain of hesitation. He looked undisturbed.






Chapter 19

Kyle led Leyla to a terrace connected to the rose garden. As the tumultuous and colorful atmosphere of the party faded from a distance, Leyla finally breathed a sigh of relief.

“Thanks, Kyle. Thank you so much.”

Leyla thanked while leaning against the marble railing. She thought Kyle would laugh, but he somehow looked austere.

“Kyle?”

“Why are you holding it in?”

“Huh?”

“They’re dragging you around like a spectacle. Why are you staying still? You’re not like the prideful and clever Leyla Lewellin that I know of.”

“Who cares.”

Unlike Kyle, who was unusually furious, Leyla simply smiled.

“They’re not wrong. I am an orphan, I am indebted to Uncle Bill, and I am planning to become a teacher.”

“I really don’t get you.”

“People are born two-faced, Mr. Etman.”

“You’re only good at saying useless things.”

Kyle ended up smiling at Leyla’s mischievous reply.

“Go now, Kyle. I’m really fine.”

“Go where.”

“You have a lot of people to meet here. You also have a lot of friends.”

“No thanks.”

Kyle waved his hands as if he was annoyed and leaned his back against the railing along with Leyla.

“Don’t be like that…..”

“Leyla, I’m here as your partner today.”

Kyle slowly turned his head. His brown eyes gleamed warmly in the dark.

“So I’ll be by your side.”

A smile slowly spread over Kyle’s lips.

“I want to.”

The wind carried the sweet rose scent from the garden. Leyla tried to answer back, but all she could do was to grasp the handrail with her lips tightly closed.

“Why aren’t you answering?”

“……. I’m not sure.”

“Are you being shy in front of me?”

“No way.”

“Your face looks red.”

“No!”

Leyla raised her hands and stroked her cheeks.

“Fooled ya.”

Leyla laughed when she saw Kyle playfully giggling. It was then when Mrs. Etman, who had been searching for her son, found the two on the terrace.

“Kyle. What the hell are you doing here?”

She approached and let out a deep sigh.

Leyla hurriedly straightened her posture and bowed her head. Mrs. Etman accepted her greeting with a frank look and then turned to her son.

“There’s a lot of people waiting to see you.”

“You mean my father.”

Kyle grinned, but Mrs. Etman’s eyes became stern.

“Kyle Etman. Are my words funny to you?”

“Mom, you know that’s not what I meant.”

“Let’s go. Madam Norma’s waiting for you. You’re not thinking of making her wait are you?”

Mrs. Etman’s attitude was obstinate, it was as if she wouldn’t allow any further counterarguments.

“See you, Kyle.”

Leyla carefully opened her mouth after holding her breath.

Madam Norma adored the only son of her doctor. Leyla knew how proud Mrs. Etman was.

“I’ll wait here.”

Leyla smiled to reassure Kyle.

“Thank you, Leyla.”

Mrs. Etman was, only then, able to smile at Leyla. Her brown eyes that resembled Kyle’s had always looked bitter towards Leyla. Leyla knew that as well.

Kyle reluctantly took a heavy step. Leyla gave a small wave at Kyle, who kept looking back.

“Wait for me!”

Kyle cried as he grimaced.3

“You have to wait for me, Leyla!”

Ok.

She was willing to answer, but Leyla couldn’t take her lips off. All she could do was to wave her hands more vigorously.

After Kyle and Mrs. Etman left, the terrace was calm again. The music and laughter from the hall mingled with the beautiful lights, creating a relaxed atmosphere. Leyla had left her glasses at home so the lights looked blurry, but the scenery looked more dreamy with her blurry vision.

Now Leyla Lewellin’s role was over.

Leyla was able to relax. With her relaxed state, her unfamiliar clothes came into view.

When she slightly moved her legs, the waist decorated ribbon and the bottom of her dress shook. Leyla started becoming jolly as she tiptoed up and down while looking down at the rich hem of the flowing dress.

The white dress embroidered with the gold thread was as majestic as the dreamy night. The dress’s texture that brushed against Leyla’s skin was so soft that her entire body was ticklish.

And the necklace.

Leyla gently fondled her necklace as she lost her shy smile.

Why did Lady Brandt say that?

Leyla guessed that Claudine was probably expressing contempt and sympathy in a sophisticated way, but Leyla didn’t mind. Uncle Bill’s gift was dazzlingly beautiful. No matter what others said, Leyla was content with her gift.

Leyla smiled again, and when she raised her head, a tall man came out onto the terrace. Leyla believed it was Kyle and had gotten excited, but when she recognized who the man was, she froze.+

It was Duke Herhardt. Along with Lady Brandt.

“It’s very clear at night, isn’t it?”

Claudine asked as she took a deep breath. Her behavior seemed like she had led Matthias to the terrace because of the night breeze.

“I like the summer because its nights are pleasing. What about you, Duke Herhardt?”

Claudine smiled brightly as she stood in front of the marble railing. Her gaze had left Matthias’s face and went towards Leyla Lewellin, who was standing at the far opposite end of the terrace. Leyla was the primary reason Claudine had brought Matthias here.

“I don’t like summer very much, my lady.”

Matthias stood beside Claudine. His eyes that were looking at the rose-filled garden then briefly passed by Leyla’s face. She looked very embarrassed and nervous at the appearance of unexpected guests.

“Really? I thought you liked summer.”

Claudine now looked at Matthias with her back against Leyla.

“Come to think of it, I feel like Duke Herhardt is a heartless man. Of course, you know that’s not a reproach, right?”

Claudine, with her hands held together behind her back, came a step closer. The distance between the two was close enough to reach each other’s breath.

“I actually like your insensitivity. I think it accentuates your nobility and elegant manner.”

“I’m glad to hear that.”

Matthias didn’t back down and faced Claudine.

“Kiss me, please.”

Claudine demanded boldly. Matthias stared at her in silence.

“I like the heartless Duke Herhardt, but don’t we still need to put in some passion or enthusiasm?”

As Claudine tilted her head, the thickly curled brown hair shook elastically.

“I mean, we are getting engaged, married, and will live together for the rest of our lives.”

“Minimal passion…..”

Matthias narrowed his eyes for a while and gave a nod to agree.

“Indeed.”

Matthias wrapped Claudine’s cheek without much hesitation. Claudine looked a little surprised but she soon naturally closed her eyes.

While looking at the shadows of Claudine’s eyelashes, Matthias’s gaze unconsciously turned to the opposite end of the terrace. The fidgeting Leyla had met eyes with him just in time.

Leaving his gaze of Leyla intact, Matthias lowered his lips over Claudine’s lips.4

The spectator Leyla Lewellin that Claudine wanted was faithful to her role. Frozen in place, Leyla blankly watched the two. Even the darkness and the long distance couldn’t hide Leyla’s red cheeks.

Throughout the very restrained kiss, Matthias’s eyes had continued to be on Leyla. Her green eyes helplessly looked at him in a paralyzed state. Although the moon was bright, her eyes looked as dull as the night.

When Leyla avoided his eyes, the two people’s blunt kiss was over. Leyla ran down the stairs leading to the garden while Claudine slowly opened her eyes and oddly smiled.

“Let’s go.”

Matthias politely reached out his hand. Claudine held the hand as if nothing had happened.

“I’m sure, Duke Herhardt.”

Claudine, who had just entered the hall, grinned.

“I’m sure that we’ll become a pretty good couple.”



Leyla frantically ran down the stairs. She knew she wasn’t being chased, but Leyla kept running faster.

The sound of Leyla’s shoes on the promenade shook the serene garden of the night. It wasn’t until she reached the massive fountain in the middle of the garden when Leyla finally stopped. She didn’t realize the pain in her feet because all she could think of was escaping the terrace.

“Ah…….”

Leyla slightly took off her shoes and winced. There were raw scratches all over her feet, which suffered from the new pumps. Her heel was skinned and blood flowed down. All she wanted to do was to run to the cabin but she eventually turned around.

She promised Kyle that she’ll be waiting. Leyla believed she had to at least tell him that she was making her leave first. But she was afraid to go back to that mansion, to that strange and uncomfortable world.

Leyla agonized as she limped along the right side of the path. She stood under the vine roses where the pergola stood. She was planning to first wait in the garden and then visit the mansion when Kyle was about to come back.

Can I sit down?

Leyla stared at the bench and wondered. It was the rose vine Uncle Bill pruned with special care, but she had never gone under it. It was a seat not allowed by any other residents or servants.

But wouldn’t it be okay today since I’m here as Arvis’s guest?

After more thoughts, Leyla was able to quietly sit at the end of the bench. She needed a little more time and courage to then take off her shoes.

Leyla leaned her back against the armrest of the bench and wrapped her knees in her arms. The throbbing feet touched the cold marble and the pain started to subside a little. She now learned how good looking shoes wore out her feet, so she couldn’t bear to wear the shoes again.

If I hadn’t ran, I could’ve at least saved my heels.

Leyla gently grazed the painful wound with her fingertips. She shook her head to shake off the sudden memory.

When she thought of the man who stared at her while kissing his fiancé, Leyla frowned. Leyla didn’t understand why Claudine had casually accepted the kiss even though she knew there was a person there.1

“Why are they like that?”

Mumbling to herself, Leyla unwittingly rubbed her lips.

“….. So shameless.”

This time, she rubbed the inside of her lips with the back of hand. It was as if to erase the memory and the strange feeling of that night when the moon was lit.


Chapter 20

“How kind of you, madam.”

Mrs. Etman’s eyes, looking at Madam Norma, were full of heartfelt admiration.

“How can you show such great kindness?”

The clearer the joy spread on Mrs. Etman’s face, the more troubled Kyle Etman looked as he stood beside her. Matthias watched the two with an interested glance. He knew that his grandmother liked her doctor and adored his son. Dr. Etman was a competent doctor and had excellent character, so it was reasonable.

Maybe Kyle Etman, who resembles his father, will live that same life as long as there is no change.

Grandmother was sure of it, and Matthias agreed.

But that was it.

There was no reason for Matthias to pay any more attention to the obvious and tedious facts. Linda Etman, the very ambitious lady of the house, acted differently from the two men of the Etman’s family.

“May I greet them now?”

Fearing that Norma might change her mind, Mrs. Etman lost her composure and pressured Norma.

“Dear.”

Dr. Etman, who had been quietly watching, gently dissuaded her, but she didn’t seem to be willing to give up at all.

Matthias turned to Kyle Etman again.

His grandmother had offered to introduce Baron Arundt’s family to the Etman family. There wasn’t anyone who didn’t know the hidden meaning behind her words when Norma said the two families would match well so they could be good acquaintances. Baron Arundt had a daughter who was around the same age as Kyle Etman. A daughter who was at the age to start thinking about getting married.

Even though the Etman household had no title of nobility, they were wealthier than the Arundt household. They also had greater prestige. If the two families became in-laws, it was Baron Arundt who benefited the most.

“Yes, Mrs. Etman. That sounds good.”

Norma Catarina von Herhardt called in her servant with a generous smile. She had ordered to bring in Baron Arundt and his wife. The servant quickly disappeared through the crowd. Kyle’s face, glancing towards the terrace that connected the garden, was now indescribably nervous.

It was as if he had left behind something precious there.

A smile flashed on Matthias’s lips as he was sure of what that was.

A mother who had an infinite attachment and expectation for her son, and a son who didn’t know how to disappoint her. When Matthias thought of Leyla Lewellin in between the two, he almost chuckled. In the meantime, Baron Arundt and his wife, who were guided by the servant, appeared. Their daughter was with them, of course.

Kyle seemed to have noticed the meaning of the occasion. Even though he had a look of immediate desire to run out, the boy couldn’t let go of the role of a good and polite son.

If that was the case.

Matthias left the stage of a boring matchmaking scene. His gait across the terrace and down the stairs was relaxed without the slightest sign of impatience.

It was obvious what kind of ending the dutiful son’s puppy love would come to. Leyla was ultimately going to be abandoned and left in Matthias’s woods.4

By the time the obvious conclusion was reached, Matthias found Leyla. She was staying underneath the pergola in the corner of the garden, not bothering to go far because she had promised to wait for the boy.

Matthias moved towards her at a slower pace. He was wondering why she didn’t become flustered as usual, but he then realized that she was fast asleep. The faint moonlight that traveled through the rose bushes shone on the small, crouching woman.

Matthias stopped at a short distance from the bench. And deeply looked. At her neatly taken off shoes, wounded feet, slender arms wrapped around her knees, and her face that looked more innocent when asleep.

A long stretch of hair wrapped around her thin neck and shoulders. Matthias gently lowered his waist and picked up her shoes as he wondered how soft her golden locks would feel.

It was then when Leyla slowly opened her eyes.



It’s a dream.

Leyla vaguely thought. In the meantime, Matthias stood against the pillar of the pergola that faced the bench. In his hand, there were shoes that looked like a woman’s.

But even if this is a dream, isn’t it too strange?

When the question came to mind, the lingering feeling of sleep receded.

“…… the duke?”

Leyla couldn’t believe what was seeing, so she had whispered to him. Instead of answering, Matthias took out a cigarette and held it to his mouth. The white smoke of his lips streaming out of his mouth proved that this moment could never be a dream.

Leyla, who was about to faint in surprise, belatedly realized that the shoes he held in his hand was hers. Leyla crouched her body to the edge of the bench. Matthias stared at her as if he was amused and slowly waved her shoes.

“Do you want it back?”

A low voice came along with the hazy cigarette smoke.

“Yes.”

“Then cry, Leyla.”7

The following words were even more languid and appalling.

His unbelievable words stunned Leyla. She hoped that Kyle would come quickly, but the road beyond the pergola was empty.

“He’s not coming.”

The duke spoke calmly as if he had read her mind.

“Kyle Etman.”

Matthias whispered as he looked at Leyla frowning in doubt.

“The one you’re waiting for.”

Matthias dropped the half-smoked cigarette onto the ground.

When the thinly rising smoke stopped, Leyla looked up in tears.

“No.”

Leyla pulled herself up as she was determined to not show her wounded feet. She faced Matthias with both her feet strongly placed on the floor. Although she was still afraid of him, she didn’t want to become his amusement anymore.

“Kyle always keeps his word.”

“Does he?”

“Yes.”

Leyla replied with conviction.

“You look quite confident.”

“I think I know more about Kyle than you do.”

Leyla clearly and emphatically said, mustering up all the courage she had. A smile spread over the duke’s lips.

“Confidence isn’t something to be reckoned with, Leyla.”

The duke approached along with his words. Although her shoulders cowered in fear, Leyla didn’t back down.

“I…. I really don’t know.”

“About what?”

“Why do you hate me so much?”

Leyla’s eyes were direct and lucid, unlike her trembling voice.

“I feel pleasant when I hate you.”

He calmly answered with one corner of his mouth raised. “It’s enjoyable when you cry, and it’s fun to see you beg.” “How can you say that?”

“Leyla, I’m just answering your question.”

Matthias simply looked nonchalant with the astonished Leyla in front of his eyes.

“You don’t act like this to anyone other than me.”

His insults had brought tears to her eyes, but Leyla managed to put up with it. Matthias willingly nodded to her words.

“Right.”

“Then why is it only me…..”

“Because it’s you.”

“What?”

“Because it’s you, Leyla. Because you’re a nobody.”7

His reply was calm and dry. His tone had made Leyla even more miserable.

“I’m sorry, your grace.”

Leyla stared at him as she tried not to cry. She started to miss the relatives who had kicked her out for various reasons. Not even her drunk uncle was that cruel to Leyla.

“I’m so sorry that I’m a nobody that dares to stay in your territory.”

Now, not only her voice but also her hands that were clenched into fists trembled.

“If you were going to act like this, why didn’t you just disallow me to stay in your estate instead?”

“Leyla, isn’t that too unsympathetic?”

“You’re truly unsympathetic enough.”

No matter how hard Leyla had tried to hide it, her voice continued to whimper.

“Are you going to kick me out now?”

“No.”

Matthias’s eyes grew darker.

“Don’t worry about that. You’re doing enough for your use.”

“You said I was a nobody.”1

“That’s your use.”5

When she slowly opened her closed eyes, Matthias erased the scorn that used to remain at the end of his lips. His expressionless face now looked stiflingly cold and still.

“That’s enough of an apology.”

Matthias raised his head, which had been leaning deeply towards Leyla, and stood in a straight posture.

“The Kyle Etman you’re waiting for is not coming.”

Matthias’s hand pointing to an empty path touched Leyla’s hair that flowed over her shoulder. Leyla backed away in fear, but was blocked by the bench and couldn’t take a step further.

“So Leyla…..”

With her golden hair grasped and fondled by Matthias, he looked at Leyla with a deeper look than before.

“Cry.”

Even at the moment he gave a heartless order, Matthias remained calm.

“Even better if you beg.”

With the addition of his suggestion, Matthias’s lips had formed into a faint smile.

Crazy person.

Leyla had been thinking that for a long time, but she was sure now. This man was definitely crazy.



When Matthias had returned to his mansion, Kyle Etman was still held up by his mother. The Baron and Baroness Arundt seemed to like the idea of becoming in-laws with the Etman household. They showed considerable favor and Mrs. Etman’s response was not much different. Kyle’s attitude was now noticeably stiff, but his mother didn’t seem to care much about her son.1

Matthias once again drew away his attention from the obvious and tedious affairs. Mixed between familiar faces, he began to play the role of the master of Arvis, Duke Herhardt.

Leyla cried.

Matthias felt satisfied while recalling the moment. She trembled and droplets of water fell from her face as she couldn’t hold in her rage. Her wet eyes looked more clear because of the corners of her eyes that had turned red. At the moment, Leyla Lewellin’s eyes sparkled like the jewels that hung around her neck, and Matthias liked that.

He returned her shoes because she cried beautifully.

When he was about to leave the garden, he looked back and saw Leyla still standing there crying. She cried because of him, therefore, the tears that came from Leyla’s was his. Matthias’s steps became lighter.

His despondent feeling of when he saw Kyle Etman escorting Leyla into the mansion was washed away with Leyla’s tears. As well as the indescribable feeling he felt the moment he kissed Claudine while staring at Leyla.

Tonight, in his world, Leyla was beautiful, and the beautiful Leyla had cried in front of him.

So it was a perfect summer night.

By the time Matthias reached that satisfactory conclusion, Leyla unexpectedly reappeared. Standing on the edge of the aisle linking the hall to the terrace, she was carefully looking for someone.

“Kyle Etman.”

Matthias slowly whispered the name.


Leyla seemed to have found him soon. However, she wasn’t able to approach. She seemed to have understood what it meant for Kyle Etman to be surrounded by the Arundt household, especially Baron Arundt’s youngest daughter.

Leyla, who had been hiding behind the post for a long time, approached the passing servant and had said something to him. The servant nodded his head and started to head towards Kyle Etman, who had a cold look on his face as if he had reached his limit. Meanwhile, Leyla had left the terrace.

Matthias impulsively approached the servant.

“Please call Count Klein.”

The eyes of the servant grew bigger at Matthias’s order. For a moment, he glanced over to Kyle Etman’s side, but gave the very answer Matthias expected.

“Yes, master.”

Turning his steps, he hurried through the crowd to accept Matthias’s order.

Matthias left the terrace and leaned on the pillar where Leyla had stayed a while ago. Leyla was drifting absently along the promenade and then to the center of the garden. Her feet seemed to hurt as she limped. She later took off her shoes and walked barefoot from the middle of the path.

Matthias watched her as he waited for his servant. Of course, Count Klein wasn’t going to come. Having a neurotic headache, the count had only shown his face early in the evening and returned home.

By the time Leyla disappeared deep into the forest, the servant from before had approached.

“I’m sorry, master. Count Klein had already returned home.”

“I see.”

Matthias nodded and smiled.

“Well done.”

Matthias leisurely left the terrace after his salute.

Only then did the servant return to his previous duty. As he approached Kyle Etman, he delivered Leyla’s words and a sense of dismay flashed across Kyle Etman’s face.

Kyle suddenly began to rush out to the terrace after asking for his understanding, but Matthias didn’t mind any longer. Leyla Lewellin, despite her little figure, walked pretty fast. It was too late for Kyle to catch up to her.

Matthias willingly took the glass of champagne Riette had offered.

The glamorous midsummer night, the party was perfect.


Chapter 21

“I don’t know if I can leave you here alone.”

Bill sighed with a worrisome face.

“Uncle, you’ll really miss the train at this rate.”

Leyla kindly urged him. Bill was reassured at her confidence in being home alone, but he somehow felt a little sentimental.

An obituary was delivered to the cabin yesterday afternoon. Bill’s brother had passed away. Even though the two brothers weren’t close and hadn’t seen each other for a long time, Bill couldn’t ignore the fact that his brother used to be the only family left in the world.

Bill eventually decided to take a few days off and travel to his hometown. Going there was not a problem for Bill, but leaving the little Leyla alone made his heart feel as heavy as lead.

“You have to make sure to keep the door shut. Even if it’s hot, keep the windows closed.”

Bill repeated his words of advice several times since last night.

“The hunting gun is hanging in my room…..”

“I’ll make sure to lock the door, the windows, and move the hunting gun that’s in your room next to my bed. If a bad person shows up, I’ll shoot them.”

Leyla calmly recited the words she had heard so many times.

“I’ll eat well, sleep well, and stay well.”

He would only be gone for three days at most, but Bill worried about Leyla as if he was going to be away for months. Bill reluctantly took off, even though he still had a concerned look. Leyla followed him to the entrance of the mansion to see him off.

“Leyla, did something happen at the party that day?”

Bill carefully asked after taking a glimpse of the magnificent mansion building.

“No, I had fun. There weren’t any trouble. I’m serious.”1

“I’m glad you did…. But somehow, you seem to be distancing yourself from Kyle after that party.”

“Me? Kyle?”

Leyla laughed as if it was nonsense.

“No way. It’s just that… we’ve been busy these days.”

“Can I take your word for it?”

“Yes. Why would I tell such a lie?”

“That’s true. There’s no way your relationship with Kyle would get awkward. Then Leyla, if you’re too scared to be alone, then bring Kyl…. No, no. Pretend you didn’t hear.”

Bill shook his hand with a serious look.

“He’s the most dangerous.”2

“Uncleee.”

“If he comes over, make sure to send him back before sunset. Keep in mind.”

“Stop saying strange things now, go ahead.”

Leyla comforted Bill’s back with a warm touch.

Bill looked back several times and repeated his advice as he moved further away on the other side of the platanus road.

Leyla stayed there for a while until Bill was no longer in sight. Every time he turned around, Leyla smiled and waved her hands.

She believed the next three days were going to be very long.



“Leyla’s avoiding me.”

Kyle was sure now.

“I think it’s because of the party that day.”

The reason wasn’t that difficult to find.

“You think so too? Phoebe?”

Kyle seriously asked, but Phoebe sat on the window frame pecking at the oats and pretended not to hear. Kyle deeply sighed when he found himself talking nonsense to the dove. Phoebe brought Leyla’s note again today with disappointing news. The note read that Uncle Bill was going to be at his hometown for a few days and Leyla was planning to be at the library all day long so the cabin was going to be empty.

He’s been getting these types of messages for days lately. Her notes said she was planning to go to another friend’s house; she had an appointment downtown; she was busy helping Bill with the orchards. At first, he thought it was her consideration of notifying him instead of having him come into the cabin


in vain when it was actually empty. But at this point, it all seemed like excuses. Clumsy excuses to avoid Kyle Etman.

“I don’t blame her. I would do the same.”

Kyle clutched his head and gave a deep sigh.

He proudly declared that he was her partner and promised he would protect her. Yet, he had left Leyla alone. After hearing the servant’s words that Leyla left him, he ran out of the hall, but she had already taken her leave.

He didn’t know why he couldn’t get out of there sooner. Even though he had told her to wait. He made her wait. He failed to keep his promise.

Kyle nervously wandered around the room while Phoebe, who ate its fill, left. Kyle stared into the direction where the dove flew away and impulsively stormed out the room.

He couldn’t remember how he got on his bike and pedaled. He thought of Leyla as he went out of breath. By the time his heart was about to burst at the thought of Leyla, Kyle had arrived at the cabin in the Arvis estate. His shoulders moved up and down as he tried to catch his breath in the scorching sun.

There were white sheets and pillowcases dripping with water on the clothesline at the yard. And beyond it, there was a shadow of a woman with a soft, thin body line.

Feeling both relief and despondency, Kyle slowly swept his sweaty hair behind his forehead. Leyla gently showed her face over the sheets as if she had felt his presence. Her green eyes grew round when she met eyes with him.

“…… Kyle.”

The sweet voice that came through her lips was enough to make him forget this embarrassing situation.



“I’m sorry.”

Kyle, who had been sitting in front of the table, remained silent for a long time and then sighed. Leyla sat on the opposite side. When she was looking down at her fingertips, she had suddenly raised her eyes at Kyle’s apology.

“I’m so sorry. It’s all my fault.”

“No. Don’t.”

Leyla shook her head after being taken aback.

“I’m the one who’s sorry. I’m sorry I lied about not being at home.”

“No, it’s because of me. It’s all my fault.”

“It’s not like that. I’m not upset or mad at you. I’m serious, Kyle.”

“Then is there another reason? Why…. you’re avoiding me… “

“You know Kyle, I like you as a friend. You’re kind of like my family. So….. so I think we should further

ourselves now.”

Leyla attempted to pull up the corners of her lip to calmly smile, but Kyle didn’t seem to notice.

Leyla was sincere when she said she wasn’t upset or angry at Kyle. But that night, at that dreamy party, Leyla saw a clear line. A line drawn between Kyle and herself that she couldn’t cross just because they were friends.

She had already thought that she wasn’t enough to be hanging out with a son of a brilliant household.

But the gap between her vague thoughts and the sight of reality was painfully cruel.

The heir to a widely respected family of doctors who can easily mingle with the aristocrats. The Kyle Etman that Leyla saw on that day at the duke’s dazzling banquet hall, was a man who lived in a world beyond that definite line. Kyle Etman could no longer be the child who used to play with Leyla.

Why should a child grow up and become an adult?

That night, as Leyla walked along the dark forest path with her shoes in her hands, she brooded on that transparent, sad question. And then she decided. To accept time. And to accept the only way she could protect her precious friend, even in that passing time.

“You know you’re talking nonsense, right?”

Kyle opened his lips after a long time. His voice was lower and calmer than usual.

“No. I mean it.”

“You like me, but why should we be apart?”

“That way, we can be good friends for a long time. Kyle, I don’t want to lose you.”

“You think I’d want to lose you?”

Kyle’s eyes shook as he looked at Leyla.

“How can we, not anyone else, be apart? That’s impossible, Leyla.”

“Kyle.”

“I’ll never lose you. I won’t even go further away from you. How can you say that?”

Kyle set down the glass cup and clenched his fist with all his might.

You can’t do that, Kyle.

Instead of saying what she wanted to say, Leyla smiled.

It’s time to become an adult.

Leyla stood up while swallowing the thorn-like words.

“Let’s have lunch, Kyle.”

Leyla hurriedly fastened the apron she had taken off earlier ago.

“As an apology for lying, I’ll make you a veery delicious lunch..”



“Matthias, can’t you just discharge from the military and concentrate on your family’s work now?”

Riette lay down on the sofa as he put down the newspaper he scanned over. As he turned his head while yawning, he saw Matthias sitting on the wing chair reading a book.

“It’s not that bad spending a couple of years in the military division.”

Matthias gave a leisurely reply as he turned the page. Even on this hot summer afternoon, he wore a jacket and a tie in his bedroom.

“Well, that’s the tradition of the Herhardt family all right.”

Riette murmured while languidly stretching.

“Matthias von Herhardt will be the most perfect Duke of Arvis, better than any other predecessors.”

While Riette chuckled, the canary, who was playing well in the cage, suddenly spread its wings. The bird lightly flew and landed on the book that Matthias was reading.

A soft smile came upon Matthias’s face as he stared at the chattering bird. It was quite an astounding scene for Riette, who had seen Matthias shoot and kill birds without batting an eye in the hunting grounds for years.

“I hope that bird is a she, Matthias.”

Riette shook his head as he lost his breath.

“If it’s not, I think I’ll be grossed out.”

Matthias reached his hand out to the bird without a reply. The little bird tilted its head from one side to another and then started to gently rub its beak at the tip of his finger.

“Don’t you think so, Claudine?”


Riette turned to Claudine, who was sitting right across from Matthias and Riette. She looked at Matthias and his bird with an embroidery on her hands. When she met eyes with Riette, a faint smile spread over her expressionless face.

“I heard that birds with beautiful voices are usually male.”

“Ugh. Please, Claudine. Let’s just believe its a female.”

Riette jokingly shuddered.

“It’s creepy to think they’re interacting like that if they’re both male.”

“What’s wrong with that? It’s just a bird.”

Claudine laughed and grabbed the needle to start her embroidery again.

Matthias turned a page only after the bird that was bouncing on his book moved. He looked unconcerned even when the bird distractedly flew around tapping his hands, shoulders, and head.

“You should wear a light yellow dress at the engagement party, Claudine. Duke Herhardt might love you like that bird.”

“No.”

Claudine answered back without a delay.

“I hate yellow.”

After taking a deep breath, she continued to stitch.

“It’s somewhat vulgar.”

Her words were accompanied by a little scoff.

A strange smile came upon Riette’s lips. At that point, he stopped talking about the bird and began to rattle on about Matthias’s military service and the engagement ceremony that was just around the corner.

“Our little lady Claudine will soon be the lady that beat the royal princess.”

“I’m ashamed of that kind of flattery, Riette.”

Although her eyes frowned, Claudine brightly smiled.

It was an open truth that the Berg Emperor coveted Duke Herhardt as his son-in-law.

The emperor’s love for his youngest daughter was extreme. Moreover, she was a beautiful lady who was called the ‘Flower of the Socialites’. Claudine, who had taken the position of Duchess Arvis for granted since childhood, felt a sense of crisis because of the princess.

But in the end, Claudine won. Of course, she didn’t win because of love.

‘Matthias doesn’t need to.’

The Herhardt’s response to the reason for not becoming in-laws with the imperial family was summed up in that brief remark.

Herhardt was a household with history, wealth, and honor that were no less than the emperor’s. It wasn’t unreasonable to judge that the hassle of serving the princess was greater than the benefit of having her as a duchess. Such arrogance was understood when placed before the Herhardt’s name.

Thanks to that, Claudine Brandt became a lady who beat the emperor’s daughter. It was obvious why the Herhardt family chose her. She was the only daughter of a reputable count who didn’t have a successor. So the Herhardt family judged Claudine to be a bride with a good pedigree and dowry no less than the princess. They also didn’t have to serve Claudine, unlike the royal princess.

When the engagement ceremony was held, Claudine Brandt’s name was expected to be placed in a higher position than the emperor’s daughter. The thought made Claudine feel like she could love everything in this world. Including that vulgar little bird.

“I can’t believe your engagement is just around the corner. It makes me feel all strange.”

Riette sat up and stretched his arms.

Claudine, who had been calmly looking at Riette, began to casually stitch again.


Chapter 22




Into The Blanket of Light







Matthias had made a wrong decision by turning around.

He was planning to stay in the annex before dinner time to finish his pile of work. In hindsight, nothing had changed in his plan. At least until he left the annex.

Matters were thrown into disarray after he twisted his body to look behind and found himself standing on the road leading to the gardener’s cottage.

Matthias halted, pausing in his footsteps with a pensive look on his face.

The days had marched on as they should. Everything went off without a hitch and in an orderly fashion.

Her tears on that night had also been washed away and cleaned off all traces of his foreign feeling.

Matthias expanded his stride and strolled through the shady forest path. He tugged at his tie and loosened it, then pushed open a few buttons on his tight-fitting shirt. His gestures were a bit rougher, and he wasn’t as calm as he always was.

It was sickening.

He loathed these emotions that were out of his track.

It was aggravating for him to be plagued with feelings he couldn’t curb.

Mathias wanted everything in his world to be in its place. So did his own feelings. That’s the reason why he had never been enamored of a creature called a woman.

In his orbit, the lust for sex was simply an instinct. He had never dwelled on it or been swayed by it.

Rather, it was cumbersome-nothing more than a need to be adequately satisfied and dried away. Such desires, to begin with, didn’t rule the roost in his mind.

That’s how the annoyance and discomfort he felt because of Leyla grew and wreaked havoc on his stable world.

Only she now could be in his world.


His whole five senses were fixed on her and blinding passion welled up deep inside him uncontrollably. There were oftentimes when his gluttonous desire and lustful thoughts to possess her became too much for him to handle.

Matthias was displeased as he learned he was obsessed with such trivial things. He couldn’t even put it on his list of priorities.

Leyla Lewellin was a good-for-nothing who belonged to that league.

Still, he needed to make sure.

The long line of the forest trees gradually petered out as the cottage building grew closer.

Pondering, Matthias walked into the blanket of light. The jolly beam of summer sunlight was drifting down, permeating his eyes through the slats of twigs.



Leyla had found a baby bird sprawled on the ground.

She was traveling home after sending Kyle off when she suddenly heard the sound of a helpless squeal.

Leyla spotted a fallen baby bird under a tree in the backyard. A tiny, fragile nestling that had just recently had it’s feathers begin to grow.

“Oh, did you fall?”

Leyla wrapped the baby bird with a careful touch and raised her eyes, looking up at the tree.

Precisely as she had thought, there was a bird’s nest sited in one of the tree’s limbs. The tree loomed quite high, but thankfully, the baby bird wasn’t severely injured.

“It’s okay. I’ll take you home.”

Leyla petted the baby bird gently and tucked it into her apron’s pocket. She hurried back to the cottage to take the ladder stashing in the warehouse.

She securely leaned the ladder against the tree and started climbing up.

The nest was nestled between branches higher than the ladder, so she had no choice but to clamber further.

Climbing that high usually had never been a problem for her. But with the baby bird in her pocket, Leyla became more circumspect in her movements and couldn’t be as nimble as usual.

After ascending the closest bough to the bird’s nest, Leyla snatched the branch with one hand and thrust the other into her pocket.


She painstakingly stretched her arms as far as she could and safely handed back the baby bird to its nest.

Too bad, just as she breathed a sigh of relief, her foot suddenly slipped off, and she lost her grip on the branch.

The world spun upside down in a split second as her body bounced and lost its balance. She had managed to grab the branch’s end and hold it tight, but the ladder had dropped to the ground. Alas, the branch that was too weak to support her body weight, started making a crackling sound.

“Uncleeee! Uncle Billlll!”

The terrified Leyla reflexively screamed aloud. But her shout was met by the silence that she realized Uncle Bill wasn’t at home.

“Kyleee!”

Though she knew Kyle had walked too far and couldn’t hear it, Leyla kept crying and calling out to him. Kyle was her only hope when Uncle Bill wasn’t here. Because they were the only ones who would come to help her when she was in trouble.

“Leyla.”

Suddenly, a familiar voice appeared out of nowhere.

The mellow voice called out her name softly as if singing a song.

Her mind had turned white with fear, but Leyla could still recognize the owner of the voice. She lowered her frightened gaze, and someone she knew was standing right below her.

Duke Herhardt.

With an unbothered state–his eyes strayed at the fallen ladder and calmly watched her hanging precariously on the half-broken tree branch.

He laughed, asking her.

“Shall I save you?”

‘That crazy person, why does he …?’

“No need!”

Even amidst her fear, Leyla flatly refused his offer of help. She persisted in holding onto the tree branch though she knew her tries were fruitless.

The branch began to shake even more showing how rickety it was quickly becoming as the crack became deeper.

“Kyle! Kyleeee!”

Her cries mingled with fright, calling for Kyle reverberated through the Arvis’ forest. Matthias giggled at a peek. He turned to look down the path that the young man had gone. “He’s not coming.”

He said and relaxedly folded his arms.

‘No matter how heartless he is, doesn’t he feel the least bit concerned when he sees people in danger?’

Leyla soon understood that astounding fact about the person standing before her. He was Duke of Herhardt. That insane duke wouldn’t be able to have a reasonable mind like a normal person.

“Go away!”

She snapped at him in annoyance and shooed him away.

“If you’re not willing to help, just go! Why are you still standing there!” “It seems you’re gonna fall, I’ll call someone to save you.” “What did you say?”

“I’m not such a heartless person, Leyla.” Matthias’s lips curved into a drowsy grin. “I’ll call Mr. Etman, whom you were calling desperately.”

‘You dipshit.’

His voice could no longer be heard as the noise of her panting breath had drowned it out.

“Well, let me see, what am I gonna do? Looking at the height, I think It’s better to call Dr. Etman instead.”

‘Goddammit.’

Leyla felt she had every reason for mowing him down with a hail of the most virulent cusses, if only her position right now didn’t hinder her from doing so.

“… … Sa, save me!”

Leyla wailed in despair.

Rather than begging the man in front of her, she would rather crumble to the ground and be wounded.

That’s all she thought before her fear compelled her to forego her principles.

“Are you sure?”

Matthias asked, leisurely taking off his coat.

“Call me, then.”

“What?”

“Call me.”

He took a few steps closer to the tree before coming to a stop and staring longingly at her.

As if he were waiting.

Waiting for the moment of her fall if his demand would not be met. Leyla freaking knew it, that he was a man capable of those deeds.

“Duke, please!”

Leyla begged him with teary eyes and her voice miserably sobbing.

“Dukeeee!”

Her plea grew more despondent as the moment for her fall drew nearer.

After she hailed him for the millionth time, the branch ended up broken.

She fell.

Leyla’s mind went blank. Her vision became hazy as her body floated down from the tree.

Then he cometh.

Matthias ran hell for leather towards the tree and embraced her deeply in his arms. Their bodies bumped onto the ground but Matthias refused to let go, and kept hugging her with all his might.

The dirt and dust brume clouding them colliding on the soil gradually dissipated. Leyla’s head was buzzing, but slowly she got her consciousness back.

Soft.

It felt pillowy and unbelievably cozy even though she had fallen from a elevated place.

Leyla opened her eyes. The warmth she felt belonged to a man, whom she had unknowingly hugged tightly.

Duke Herhardt lay underneath her. And she was blanketed safe and sound in the his arms.

She could feel the sound of his beating heart transmitted to her chest that were intimately in touch with each other.

His arm muscles wounded around her waist and the back of her head stoutly, were incredibly strong.

As she slowly raised her head, a faint minty scent of water could be smelled from the nape of his neck.

His skin was smooth and warm, and mantled with a wonderful fragrance.

The heat, which had started from her cheek, quickly dispersed throughout her body in no time.

It gave Leyla a startled shudder when her body started to reheat. She wrestled her hardest to escape from him.

Glossing over the shame as their bodies were entwined in a close knot. He was too big and too hefty.

Matthias’ bondage had only gottem stronger the harder she tried to secede.

“Ssst..Stay still.”

Matthias ordered her with a low sigh. But Leyla’s resistance grew fiercer.

‘No.’

She was fed up. Her blood was boiling.

‘What a jerk. I don’t want to.’

Leyla tried to scream, but she didn’t get a single word in.

Matthias’s choking embrace which was trapping her, meanwhile became growingly hot. His head and waist hugging her were ever mightier. All of those strange yet unfamiliar sensations were getting awol to her and Leyla couldn’t take it any longer.

She was scared shitless and desperately tried to break free. But the more she wanted to resist, the more helpless she felt. Whatever she did, Leyla couldn’t push herself off of him.

The moment her delusion soon coalesced with her worst dread, without heed of, she blindly bit the duke’s ear.

“Ackh!”

Matthias grimaced in pain and straight off shoved her backward. He was dumbfounded, but soon, his mouth twisted in a pucker of amusement.

Matthias found it hilarious watching her trembling so badly when she was the one who had savagely assaulted him.

Leyla’s vivid green eyes glared at him ferociously, acting as she wanted to rip him into pieces. Matthias stopped laughing.

“Be a lady, Leyla.”


Matthias lightly caressed his bitten ear— immediately grabbed Leyla by the hair without batting an eye.

Without reflexes, she had been pushed to the ground. Matthias’ visage loomed above her, glowering at her with his void-slitted eyes.

“So this is what I get in return after saving your life? Don’t you think it’s too unladylike?”

“Why should I be ladylike when you’re not even a gentleman?”

Leyla turned her face aside. Embarrassment was splotching her cheeks with red color as she tried to push his body one more time. But Matthias had snatched her chin with his scorching-hot hand and dragged her face to his.

“Didn’t your mouth just say I was a gentleman?”

“… … No! I misspoke!”

“Did you?”

“A gentleman, huh. It’s hogwash. If you’re a gentleman….H-How can you d-do …this?”

Leyla stammered with a face that was going to break into tears and struggled to get away from him.

Matthias’s eyes narrowed. A small furrow formed between his eyebrows as he looked at Leyla rubbing her lips as if they had been polluted with something filthy.

“Please step aside.”

Leyla glared at him with a sullen look invading her face.

“Something like this, I……Argh!”

A shrill scream came out, letting the last syllable hang in the air. Matthias had lowered his head and bit back her ear.

All happened in a snap, almost unexpectedly.

With a relentless thud, Matthias slammed her onto the earth. He gripped her clawing little hand, hindered her move, and roughed up her ear.

“Ackhhh!”

Her shrieking breath fell when Matthias began to suck and nibble on her lobe.

Matthias initially planned to repay what she had granted him, but he had changed his mind and pushed her with a tenacious force.


Leyla groaned and twisted her body when he bit her clammy earlobe hard. The sound of sobbing and gasping was muggy and ovenlike. Matthias weight-pressed her flailing limbs and branded his teeth’ mark all over her reddish ears.

A satisfied smile presented on his face after he saw Leyla’s messy countenance.

Her innocent eyes were soggy, transparently swollen with tears. Her slightly open lips, which were even darker than its hackneyed shade, gulped in a lungful of heavy air.

Matthias tightly clutched her crumbly intertwined fingers and sensuously devoured her moist lips.

Astonished by his sudden kiss, Leyla firmly clenched her lips, but Matthias had easily dispatched her resistance.

This sweltering summer would end by soon enough.

Matthias perfectly got the picture. Still, it didn’t stop him.

He kept shoving his hasty tongue in, sucked it up, and swallowed it as if he meant to engulf her.

Pellucid saliva, moaning voice, and rough breathing began to flow through their overlapping lips.








Chapter 23




Tore It Out, Crushed It Up, and Threw It




Whenever Leila struggled, Matthias increased the strength of his hold and Leyla desperately resisted as he did so.

What was plastered over her sight every time she opened her tightly closed eyes was only a fickle scene.

The shaking leaves…

The unfolding sky…

and Matthias….

The dirty floor, wherein the leaves’ silhouettes flickered over it, and him again.


The yellowish dust clumped onto and canopied them in a sandy shroud. Their passionate kissing came perilously close to a brawl.

At some point, Leyla didn’t even know what she was up to. The fear of not breathing and the necessity of needing to do so were grouped into one.

On the flip side, the duke’s attempt to suck her lips and tangle her tongue with his only seemed to flare more. Leyla had no choice but to resigned herself defeatedly as if she were a living prey that was being had been consumed by a predator.

Her breath became weak and thready at the brachial. She cried out in heartbreak when Matthias’ desirous lips started to travel her scruff quickly and strongly.

A flurry of buttons scattered as he tore off her blouse, revealing her slender clavicle. His lips persistently provoked one specific spot on her neck where her pulse was beating.

His hand that had fondled her thighs and waist, tardily made its way up and grappled her luscious bosoms.



“Ah… !”

Leyla shook her head hard and yanked on Matthias’ shirt. The ripped button on his shirt bounced on the ground. She scratched his skin with her sharp nails, stamping red streaks on his neck several times.

The red hickey engraved by Matthias’ lips one by one began to garnish her clavicle. Tears sprung to her eyes as his lips began to trail down her collarbone.

Leyla’s mind went numb.

Matthias’s body heat, which came into contact with hers, did give her a discombobulation and novel feeling.

She was afraid and baffled as to why she had to go through this nightmare.

Matthias, thankfully, was able to put a stop to his deeds. He bowed his head and glanced down at her, one arm supporting his body.

Leyla opened her eyes; Matthias’ gasp was still erratically rough, but his eyes didn’t seem to be those of a man engrossed in lust.

His eyes were deep and serene. Akin to the day he stomped on a coin or the moment he calmly shot a bird to death. The way he looked at her made Leyla’s face flush in indignation.

Matthias placed his stare on her for a few seconds. He drew his eyes closed and slowly opened them.

The wriggling of his Adam’s apple had ceased as he got a grip on his breathing a little.


The forest wind randomly fluttered Leyla’s hair into a complete mess. The smooth golden waves hovered in front of him as he lowered his gaze.

Matthias wiped off the dirt from his hands, then twisted his body to the side.

He carefully took in his surroundings.

A woman who was lying under the shade of a tree and sobbing.

A yard with a clothesline loaded with freshly dried laundry.



The old cottage that stood alone.

And he who was seated in this ludicrous world with a screwed-up appearance.

Matthias scoffed faintly and swept his drooping hair off his forehead. Beside him, Leyla curled up her body in a circle, trying to suck in more air.

” Pfft..Ha..ha..ha…”

The moment he saw her battered figure riddled with dust, Matthias’s laughter, became more and more devastating to her ears.

‘You.’

Drawing in a long breath, Matthias wiped his damp lips with the back of his hand. There was a splotch of blood.

‘Just because of a nobody like you.’

When he turned to look behind him, Leyla had already bolted to the bottom of the tree. She glared at him vehemently and scrunched the picked-up tree branch with her quivering hands.

Tears were still dripping from her gleaming eyes.

Matthias lifted himself from the ground after receiving such a menacing glare from a woman who was doing the same thing to him. He gazed down, hushedly, at his hand, which had recently grabbed a handful of toasty soil.

‘You may not know. I truly wanted to wring your little neck with this hand.’

Mathias turned around unhesitatingly after having grabbed his coat.

Summer in Berg was brief.

When the time was ripe, a cold breeze would blow, and the seasons would change in a jiffy.

Mathias was no stranger to it.



Leyla was only able to get up after Duke Herhardt was no longer in sight.

She picked up her glasses and put them on. Both of her legs seemed to rumble. She walked stumbling, trembling, tripping, and had to take several break before she finally reached the cottage.

‘I shouldn’t have fallen to the ground.’

The tears beaded down her cheeks with great regrets. The unpleasant taste was still there, no matter how many times she cleaned her lips with her hand or her apron.

Leyla strolled over to the water tap and pumped it hard. The cold water spilled out of the bucket because of the pressure, soaking her clothes but she didn’t care.

“…No.”

She muttered, unsure about what exactly she was trying to deny.

‘No. No. No.’

Leyla shook her head. The bucket was full as her irregular breathing mingled with those repetitive sentences.

She covered her shaking hands and looked around nervously as if she were being hunted by something.

But, everything was the same.

It was Uncle Bill’s cottage. The homiest place in the world. The place she endlessly loved.

The wind ruffled the leaves, and birds sang while perched on the tree’s slats. The backdrop of the forest looked beautifully dazzling and still as the time neared the sunset, bathing everything in a golden shaft of light.

But Leyla’s heart kept throbbing uneasily. She was mystified with what she denied but also didn’t know what she was afraid of.

One thing was clear though. She had to get away from all this.

Leyla took off her glasses and washed her face repeatedly with the water-filled bucket. She wiped the nape of her neck which was mottled with red marks. She continued to clean her ears, yet the finer traces that he left behind were still vivid.

The overcast sky appeared so buff, Leyla stared at it with a blank look on her face.


She suddenly clenched her teeth, lifted the bucket, and submerged herself with cold water. Her body trembled with a chill as the water washed her down from the head to toe.

Leyla drew water from the tap again, shaking, as she was fed up with the unpleasant memory of her persistent survival. This time, she thoroughly rinsed all over her mouth with her palms full of water.

Cough!

Splashing water, she thought, would flush away those memories. But it was no use. She still recalled that nasty and absurd things.

Cough! Cough!

Leyla stopped washing. Her throat choked as she had accidentally swallowed the water.

She crouched, crying, before pumping more water from the tap.



Matthias took a leisurely walk around the garden before stopping at the periphery where the rose flower bed garden and the marble stairwell leading to the manor were assembled.

Though he had brushed the dust off his clothing, the remnants of it still could be seen in every place. For it was of no account to him. The problem was his memory. Those memories only became more clear whenever he took a step at a time.

When Leyla huddled in his arms, any semblance of his rationality evanesced. There was nothing but a hunger-like thirstiness to have her; as if he had morphed into a wild beast.

Matthias licked his lips and batted his bangs aside from his forehead. He sought to see how and where this lascivious desire would stop.

If that nobody woman, Leyla, hadn’t cried, it would have been meaningless, vain, and ultimately insignificant.

If only he could restrain himself. If only he could refrain from hurling abuse at such a woman. Perhaps…..

Rearing his head, Matthias saw the mansion sitting in the tawny sun of the afternoon. Behind him, the forest across the garden seemed to be a desolate world cloaked in stillness.

It was quiet.

Something stood by itself in a place of nothingness.

A hankering interest and ruling passion for a beautiful woman. Matthias haltingly closed his eyes as if erasing something silly that was bothering him.

He opened them again and plucked a cluster of roses in full bloom which resembled her tears.


From his grasp, the pungent scent of crushed roses spread thickly, poking the nose. It had a pleasing redolence that reminded him of that woman’s body odor.

He tore it, crushed it, and threw it.

The torn and broken rose petals fell scattered strand by strand at his feet in a lumbering pace.

The memory of a girl passing through this garden came to his mind one after another along with the fallen petals.

Every time he returned home to the Arvis manor, that child always grew up more hearty.

A full-blooming rose meadow had become a familiar sight in the neighborhood where the child resided.

As the winter months came, the flower bed was peacefully carpeted with snow. Seasons continued to be repeated, the time elapsed, and the girl did grow up and turned into woman like a sequence of scenes.

By the end of the day, however, it was all for naught.

Matthias fondled his lips with the rose-scented hand and strode over the flake of petals.

As the sun began to set, a cool breeze blew clemently, foretelling the end of the summer.

Matthias never looked back as he climbed the stairwell and entered the blinding artificial light of the mansion.



The sky on the western horizon, where the sun had returned to its nest like the doves was now tinged with deep purple hues.

The darkness ploddingly inked across the room, but Kyle didn’t switch the lamplights on. He leaned deeply on a chair by the window, his gaze reared at the sky, which was continuously shifting its radiant shade.

Ever since coming back from the Arvis’ cottage, Kyle had been confined to his room. Without a playful grin teased on his lips, his grayish eyes gave a shady cold nuance.

He ate lunch with Leyla in a friendly setting. Kyle didn’t say no because she was trying to act as usual.

But he knew. Their time together wasn’t the same as before.

If he can’t find a solution any sooner, he’d have to let her go.

Kyle wiped down his dry face with his hand as if washing it.

Leyla said that she wished for them to remain good friends for a long time. And to stay as friends, they should keep their distance.


He finally grasped the meaning of it. Yet, Kyle had a very different plan. Surely, he wanted to spend a long time with her, but not as a good friend in disguise.

Thereby, he was unable to wait for long.

Kyle took a hard stance after he came to that conclusion. He didn’t want to squander those happy days with Leyla, so it was time to let go of his unseeable feelings.

Taking a deep breath, Kyle opened the door and stomped down through the corridor.

A dim light glinted, seeping beyond the door of his father’s study. Kyle reassured himself in front of the door before drawing yet another breath.

At the duke’s party, Kyle got the gist of his mother’s reason for presenting him to the aristocracy. He didn’t have the faintest notion of what was going through his mother’s mind when she was considering engagement or marriage at the time, but today, he was rather grateful for that, somehow.

‘I can’t lose you. Or be apart from each other. How can we do that?’

Mulling on the words he said to Leyla, Kyle knocked on the door vigorously.

“Father, it’s me.”

“Come on in, Kyle.”

He heard his father’s warm and loving voice beyond the door. Encouraged by his sweetness, Kyle slowly opened the door to the study. Dr. Etman, who sat in front of the desk, smiled as he welcomed his son.

Instead of slumping in the chair across his father’s desk like he usually did, Kyle stood upright in front of his father.

“I have something to tell you, father,” he said.

“This isn’t something you usually do. It’s quite a serious thing to say, isn’t it?”

“Yes.”

Kyle clenched his fists tightly to muster up his courage.

When push came to shove, he was going to say this anyway.

He heartened himself and swallowed.

Next year, he will enroll in the college and leave for the capital. And Leyla, on the other hand, had planned on staying in this city and pursuing a career as a teacher.

Distance would separate them for a long time.


Kyle, however, wasn’t quite convinced with just that. The fact that there would come a day when Kyle Etman wouldn’t be standing next to Leyla Lewellin.

He pondered upon this.

What if they both went to college together? How about they studied as medical and ornithology students at the same time? And what if they lived together for the rest of their lives as they had been? As friends, lovers, and family.

“Mother seems to be thinking about my marriage nowdays.”

Dr. Etman soon let loose a short lived barking yet delightful laugh at what Kyle said.

“That day, your mother went a little ahead of herself. Don’t let it bother you too much, Kyle. I understand your mother’s feelings, but I disagree with her. There’s no need to hurry.”

“No, father.”

Kyle looked at his father with a determined glance.

“I’ve been thinking of getting married.”

“Marriage? Kyle? You?” Dr. Etman’s eyes creased slowly as he faced his son.

“Yes.”

Kyle replied with a nervous but laid-back voice.

“I want to marry Leyla and go to college with her.”


Chapter 24




Blue Candy




The four days Leyla spent alone were daunting and somewhat bizarre.

Listening to uncle Bill’s word of advice, which she initially ditched as a joke, Leyla locked the window and put the hunting gun hanging in her uncle’s room next to her bed.

Even after getting ready for her slumber, Leyla stayed awake and had trouble sleeping. She jolted by the owls hooting and suffered from the suddenly-flashing nightmares. The duke’s countenance often dawned between dreams of her being beaten or thrown away. The memory of their kiss littered along tirelessly, and deepened in her dreams like a glutinous swamp.

The first blush of the morning rose and each passing day seemed so long and eternally lasting. Leyla occupied herself and kept moving without taking a single break.

She took care of the livestock, tended to the lawn, and swept and polished everywhere in the already spotless cottage. She washed all the curtains and bedding and even organized the warehouse. Reading a book or studying was the only chore she gave something a miss: as her eyes, strangely, couldn’t draw a bead on the book’s prose.

Leyla had spent the whole day alone, pacing until the nightfall brought upon her another nightmare.

On the morning of the fourth day, she went out to take care of the backyard, tightly knotting the apron’s string behind her.

Everything was so mind-numbing.

Bill Remmer regularly spent most of his day at work. Apart from helping him with his job, Leyla went through her everyday chores and studies.

Living together didn’t mean that everything could be done together. They just sat at the same table, returned to the same warm house in the evening, shared stories from their days, and so on…

“This is the first time.”




Leyla murmured pensively at the flash of realization.


Ever since she was driven to Berg, she hadn’t led a single day apart from Uncle Bill. He had always been by her side, and there was never a day that she was alone. Bill Remmer was always there with her, at both day-peep and eventide, like a clockwork.

But now, she was on her own.

The realization that Leyla Lewellin had realized over the span of four days brought her another realization. It enlightened her: how lonely, sad, and afraid she was when she wandered in this world, all alone.

Leyla plodded a step back after momentarily standing idly. While feeding the chickens and milking the goats, she kept taking a glance across the yard.

Her fondest wish for Uncle Bill’s return had grown into a sincere prayer. She was pretty sure much of her perplexity and frustration would wither away once he returned. Her loneliness, her teen sadness, the loathsome memory of her first kiss could be forgotten with someone to keep her company.

Everything was going to be okay, and things would go back to the way they were before.







“Kyle Etman.”

Kyle looked back, startled after someone suddenly hailed his name from behind. His father had already loomed behind his chair.

“Yes, father.”

Kyle hurried to his feet. A book remained open on the same page for several days on his desk. The page hadn’t been flipped since the evening when he announced he would marry Leyla to his father.

“You’re home early.”




Kyle alternated between staring out the still-bright window and at his father’s face. Dr. Etman’s lips bent into a gentle smile when he saw his son’s darting eyes. “It’s a weekend, Kyle.”

“What? Oh, already?”

“I won’t ask what you’re thinking. I think I know even if you don’t tell me.”


Dr. Etman mumbled a laugh and leaned in the chair where Kyle was flumping a while ago. It was his quirk whenever his father had something to tell. Kyle pulled a chair in front of the table and sat facing his father, a little nervous.

His father hadn’t answered and was silent on that very day. After giving Kyle a long stare, all he said was to give him a few days to think about it.. Kyle was mindful that there was no use of daring to talk when his father had expressed himself in such a manner and tone.

Hence, he did nothing but wait. Though his desire tempted him to sprint towards her in that split second. So Kyle endured it and wasted his days living in a slow-moving damn clock. Because he didn’t want to hurt Leyla by giving her ambiguous promises.

“I completely understand how you feel. I know how much you love Leyla. But Kyle, you and her are still too young to talk about marriage.”

“But father, you married mother when you entered medical school, didn’t you?”

“That was already 20 years ago.”

“Lady Brandt is only a year older than Leyla, and she’s getting engaged next week.”

“That’s…”

“Lady Arundt, who was introduced by mother, is also the same age as Leyla.”

Seeing Kyle refute every single one of his words with a stiff face, Dr. Etman’s laughter eventually burst out, “It seems, you’re more serious than I thought.”

“Father, I know I’m still young. I also understand what worries you.”

“Do you love Leyla so much that you’re willing to sacrifice anything for her?”

“Yes.” Kyle answered with no hesitation. For him, loving her was as natural as breathing. And so, it wasn’t even necessary to take it for granted.

“I can help Leyla go to college by becoming her sponsor.”

With a stern yet loving gaze, Dr. Etman looked at his beloved son dearly,

“Leyla is a good child. She’s good-minded and smart. I know her well, Kyle, and I’m willing to sponsor her to go to college if she wants to.”

“Of course I’m really hoping Leyla can continue in her favorite field of study. But father, what I want the most is to marry her.”

“It takes more than two people to make a marriage happen.”

“Household, dignity and prestige. I’m not saying that those things are unimportant.”

“So, how come you’re so obstinate?”

“No matter how important those things are, Father, there can’t be something more important than the person who will be with you for the rest of your life.”

“Kyle.”

“I want to be a great doctor, as well as a good husband and father. As much as you. But, Father, everything starts with Leyla for me.” Kyle said. His heart started to pound, almost as if it wanted to ball out of his chest. But he suppressed it and began to broach about all the things he had kept under his hat for years.

“I want to live with Leyla, by her side, as Leyla’s good person, her good husband, the good father of her child.”

His heart now felt like it would burst open, but Kyle went on to say.

“If I have Leyla by my side, I firmly believe that I can make all of that happen, but father, without her, those things are just a pie in the sky.”

He spelled back to his father in a firm, unwavering tone.

“Without her, I don’t have the confidence to live as such a person.”

Kyle raised his head to see his father; his hands clamped together on his lap.

“I believe Leyla is a woman who meets both her father’s and mother’s expectations. She’s perhaps the most wonderful thing I’ve ever had.”

Dr. Etman gave the eye to his son with a solemn face.

“I don’t want to lose her.”

Kyle’s eyes glistened with a determined light.

“Please help me protect Leyla, father.”

( ED: I don’t love him but good luck Kyle! At least you’re better than that a**hole Mathias.)





The night was getting longer, but Bill Remmer hadn’t returned yet.

Leyla sat drowsily on a porch chair, waiting for him since she couldn’t think of any more domestic chores to focus on. Uncle Bill’s vacant chair felt so big today in a strange kind of way.

Was there a mishap of any sort?


The alarming notion that passed Leyla’s mind made her spring to her feet. One day, she recalled reading an article in the newspaper about a rail accident. Trains, in addition to carriages and cars, often engaged in a variety of incidents.

Which train was it?

Leyla circled around the yard and plucked up her courage to head towards the mansion’s gate by the time the sun plummeted. It had become a path she couldn’t cross in the last few days due to her fear of encountering the Duke.

For every step she took, Leyla kept thinking of Uncle Bill. She did have a propensity of assuming the worst since she was a little girl. The unhappiness of a like-a-clay-pigeon person was harrowing. So she believed, if she had just the barest of preparations, at least, she would be able to accept the ill-fortune without becoming too overwhelmed.

Leyla braced herself for the unhappiness that would follow after her relatives stared at her with displeasure in their eyes.

Don’t cry even if you get hit.

You’ll hear harsh words, but don’t get hurt.

I should be polite and brave even when I’m getting kicked out.

I’ll try to smile brighter on my way to another house next time.

Her efforts had been fruitful. Leyla was less hurt and able to smile a little better. The misfortunes seemed to follow her like straw in the wind, but she was able to bear them with ease, because she had steeled herself, ready for everything.

But, she was having qualms when it came to Uncle Bill.

“Uncle….”

Calling his name, she passed the entrance to the mansion.

Uncle Bill was not the type of person to leave her behind. Undoubtedly, he would return.

But if he didn’t, then…

“Please come back….”

Leyla put her hands together like she was praying.

“Don’t leave me alone…”

The picture of her from yesterday, which had calmly soothed the man who had been frightened about leaving her for four days, now had dissipated, replaced by her own worry.





‘Mom, where are you going?’

Leyla innocently inquired of her mother when she gave her candy in a pretty glass jar for the first time in her life. That day, her mother was as lovely as the sweets she was holding.

‘Far away.’

Her mother had been looking at her for quite some time, as she replied in a word.

‘Then, are you coming home late?’

Leyla asked again, impatiently, since she was eager to taste the candy.

‘Yes.’

‘How late?’

‘Very late.’

‘You’re coming home before I finish eating this, right?’

Leyla shook the glass jar full of colorful candies and her mother languidly nodded

‘Yes’

Again, she gave a short reply.

‘I will.’

*

“You shouldn’t have left me such an answer if you’re going to forsake me.”

Her mother was reputed to be too beautiful to exist as the wife of a poor man. She had eventually fled, leaving behind her husband and daughter as if she were discarding her ill-fitting clothes.

In keeping with the grapevines, she had become a high nobility’s mistress or married a silk-stocking merchant, and emigrated to another country.

People enjoyed overblown and twisted rumors like these which often soon withered. The only thing left was a man abandoned by his beautiful wife and a neglected young daughter, let alone such a cruel reality.


Thenceforth, her loving father became an alcoholic and bedrinked every day. He didn’t want to see Leyla’s face any longer, because it was hard for him to look at someone who reminded him of his truant-wife.

Leyla cherished her candies as she awaited her mother’s homecoming. By the time the bottom of the pretty glass bottle was exposed, she realized that her mother would never return. But she didn’t want to accept that painful truth. That’s why she couldn’t eat the last piece of her candy.

She ate that last candy for dinner only after she was left all alone in the world.

Her father, whose health was ruined by alcohol, at a later time passed away due to sickness.

‘Was it a foreshadowing of his departure and last farewell? ‘

Her father, who had ignored his daughter for years, smiled at her on the day he died.

‘Let’s go to the park together when the flowers bloom, Leyla.’

Her father whispered in a lifeless voice. But, after he departed that evening, his words only became a vain will.

“Don’t leave any promises if you’re leaving.”

Leyla was orphaned in an empty house. Her relatives couldn’t figure out what to do with the troublesome child, so they deserted her for a time. It seemed as if they were gawking at her. There was nothing left for her save the empty words of a worthless promise and a solitary piece of candy that provided little comfort.

Even after all these years, Leyla still remembered the color of that candy. A glossy blue luster of confectionery that glistened much like crystal.

A few days later, on the day when there was nothing else left to eat, Leyla ended up eating the last candy. When she nibbled on it hard, some of the shattered candy shards scraped her fragile gum and the tender skin of her taste buds.

Her mouth was bleeding, but Leyla went on munching on the crunchy candy. Tears streamed down her eyes as she ate it. Her sadness tasted so sweet, like biting into a luscious candy but with a fishy aftertaste.

There was a shower of blooms outside the window, ornamenting the scene with spots of dappled sunlight. It was an afternoon in early spring when the wafting pale pink flower petals in the breeze looked like falling flakes of snow on a fresh layer of grass.

*

“… Uncle?!”

Leyla’s eyes went wide with surprise on her walk along Platanus Road.

“Uncle!”

A dazzling smile flourished over her face.

“Uncle! Uncle Bill!”

Leyla ran toward Bill Remmer, who was crossing the road from the opposite side.

At the same time when a black limousine transporting the duke entered the Platanus roadway.








Chapter 25




The Color of My Sadness




By a mere chance, Matthias saw Leyla through the other side of the car window.

Leyla was running across the road with a beaming smile on her face that he had never seen before. She let her long, loose blonde hair whip around by the wind following her springing footsteps.

Matthias clenched his hand slightly. He was about to tell the driver to slow down the car, but eventually, he changed his mind and merely scoped a glance at her running towards a middle-aged man who was none other than Bill Remmer.

Leyla leapt with light steps into the gardener’s arms like a winged bird, and the gardener caught her in a bear hug. She appeared like a little girl in his big arms and smiled so widely as if it were the brightest smile in the world and seeing that the gardener burst into laughter.

At that moment, the car whizzed past them. Matthias left his gaze from the window and peered down onto his hands. From that slightly raised hand, he still could feel her touch and the lingering smell of her body on that day.

The engagement was soon, around the corner.

By the time Matthias felt alleviated by that verity, the car had passed through the gate of the Arvis mansion.







Leyla’s wish came true.

Everything was back to being fine after Uncle Bill’s return.



Her adolescent sadness, the unpleasant memories of her horrible first kiss, all of her bewilderment and despair wound down as she was no longer alone.

In the meantime, the morning and evening weather grew chillier. The days wore down, and the Arvis manor began to have a more stately jubilant atmosphere than it ever had in the past.

“Oh, don’t even mention it, I’ll serve all the greatest cuisine in the world.” Madam Mona, who had barely made it to the forest, kicked up a rumpus with a straight face. She leaned leisurely on a chair next to Bill Remmer and began to bleat in earnest. “I’m already scared to think how grand their wedding would be if their engagement ceremony is so ritzy like this.”

Leyla had just returned from milking the goats and greeted her with a cheerful smile.

“Wait a little longer, Leyla. Tomorrow I will make your mouth water until you’re sick of it. Regardless of how many guests are invited, they won’t be able to finish half of the food I will cook.”

Leyla unconsciously clutched the tip of her blouse at Madam Mona’s hearty laugh. The hickeys sowed by the duke on her neck were still painfully obvious even after a few days. The red marks which showed in the mirror every time she looked in it made her feel ashamed and disgusted.

“Is the engagement ceremony already tomorrow?”

“Please, don’t use the word ‘already’ Leyla. I hope that…..no, I’m simply hoping for a quick ending to this

engagement ceremony.”

“It’s tomorrow…” Leyla muttered quietly, then smiled again. “Yes, auntie. I will wait for it.”

She sought to grin more brightly as if to erase her nightmare-like memory. Ever since that day, the duke had never once set his foot in the forest. Pleased to state, it was a glee for Leyla to know that.

“I like chocolate cookies. And raspberry cake too!”

“I’ll bring you a bulk of chocolate or raspberries.”

“How can I repay you?” asked Leyla.

“Repay? Just eat a lot and grow up well.”

“Do I have to grow up to be as big as Uncle Bill?”



“Oh my God, Leyla. You’ll be single for life if you grow up to his size.”

Madam Mona giggled as she rose from her seat and waved goodbye. Bill Remmer furrowed his brows, but later he tardily joined in the mirth.

Not long after she left, the usual night dawned at the cottage.

After having supper with her uncle, Leyla tidied the house and reopened the textbook she had overlooked till now. She opted to sleep for a little while as drowsiness engulfed her. But by the time she awoke, the sunup had already begun to appear; and the Duke’s engagement day was already here.

Leyla put on her glasses from the desk and rubbed her sleepy eyes before strolling up to the window.

She flung the window wide, letting the cold morning air flood in.

The wee hours of the morning drew near and the sky was dyed with a clear, transparent tint of blue. Leyla reared up her eyes-the hue of the azure sky today reminded her of the colour of her last piece of candy.

The duke’s eyes were also blue, similar to the shade of that candy’s.








Claudine picked a pastel pink dress for her red-letter day. Donned in a gown garlanded with chiffon on top of the silk, her figure was so graceful and stunning as the event’s protagonist.

“You’re so gorgeous, Claudine!” Countess Brandt cheered in jollies as she watched her daughter. Her face was etched with awed looks, akin to those of the Brandt’s maid, who stood in the rear of the room.

Claudine smiled sweetly to show her gratitude for the honeyed flattery that had been bestowed upon her. Even at this moment, the spark of pride and satisfaction in her eyes didn’t wear off after seeing her reflection in the mirror.

It was Claudine’s idea, holding the engagement ceremony at the Arvis manor. Aside from wanting to show respect for the Herhardt family, Claudine wanted to assure through dint of her presence that she was gonna be the Arvis’s next duchess.

“Marie, is she still not here?” Claudine turned slightly and asked the maid as she wondered.

“She should have arrived by this time… Oh, look over there! She’s coming from the garden!”

The maid hurriedly exclaimed and Countess Brandt creased her brows as she looked out of the window.

Leyla Lewellin was seen ascending the marble staircase bridging the rose garden to the mansion, carrying a basket of flowers in her hands.

“Goodness me, Claudine! Did you bring her in again?”

“It’s okay, Mom.” Claudine calmly lulled her mother. “I merely need flower ornaments in my hair to make them look nice.”

“Is there a reason why it had to be her?”

“Well, there is no specific reason.”

Claudine shrugged her shoulders, then stepped in front of the mirror once again. Her face reflected in the mirror was no longer smiling.

“It’s a good thing to get flowers and congrats from an old friend.”








The Arvis house was wrapped up in a festive excitement as the Duke Herhardt’s residence readied to greet the guests who would be in attendance for the engagement party later in the afternoon.

Leyla plodded the passageway behind the mansion designed for servants to enter. Her feet shook nervously numerous times as she was treading on a floor that sparkled like a clear mirror.

Claudine had sent a maid to the cottage to call her in. Leyla immediately knew the moment she was told to pick roses to decorate her hair.

It wasn’t a matter of flowers that Lady Brandt wanted to meet her for.

Leyla began to slow her pace down as she neared the east side of the fourth floor. It was a guest bedroom where Claudine was staying in. Her hand, which was holding the basket, stood out pallid. Her heart felt as if it would pound out of her chest and her lips were feeling parched.

‘No.’

Leyla mumbled, convincing herself.

‘It’s merely an unfortunate accident. The duke would also think the same. So it’s fine. There’s nothing to be scared of.’


While she was hesitating, trying to make up her mind, Leyla had already set her foot in front of Claudine’s bedroom. She knocked on the door and it began to slide open slowly.

“Hello, miss. I’ve brought you the roses you had asked for.”

Leyla greeted her with politeness like she usually did. She had brought Claudine a bouquet of roses in the colour pink, which matched the shade of the dress she was attiring for today’s occasion.

Claudine approached Leyla with a wide smile. “How do I look? Do I look good?”

“Yes, miss. You look beautiful.”

Leyla answered wholeheartedly. She would be lying if she said she wasn’t. Claudine’s beauty today was undeniably as beautiful as a blooming rose.

“Before, I was very anxious, but now that you have said so, I feel relieved. Do you think Duke Herhardt will think the same too ?”

“…Yes.”

The duke’s name that came out suddenly from Claudine’s mouth made her flinch..

“I’m sure, he will.”

A faint tremor was noticeable in her voice.

Leyla felt woefully pathetic, as if she were a child who had done something wrong. Their kiss was an unpleasant incident, but she couldn’t rule out her feeling of guilt as if she had become a shameless thief who stole Claudine’s fiance.

Leyla he could see that her pride she had puffed up and toiled for in front of Claudine for so many years had been shattered, making her look shabby at this given time.

Claudine gave a sideways glimpse at a maid to accept the rose basket. And, as if it were a natural thing, she gave out a handful of gold coins to Leyla. The amount of money she gifted to her today was more than usual. Unknowing it just served to wound Leyla’s heart even more gravely.

“What are you doing? Why aren’t you showing your gratitude?”

The frowning maid rebuked her.

Leyla quickly bowed her head while tightly gripping the money in her hand. She didn’t feel insulted bowing down to Claudine as she had repeated this stance countless times since she was a child and had been used to it.

“Thank you, miss.”


Thankfully, Leyla was able to convey her thanks calmly. Claudine, who had been staring at her with a deadpan face, soon regained her bright smile. “No problem. Instead, I should be the one to say thanks, Leyla. Thanks to you, this engagement ceremony will turn out to be perfect.”

Claudine turned around as she was done with the talk.

Leyla gasped a big sigh and rushed out of the room in a headlong dash. What was buzzing around inside her head right now was the urge to get out of this uncomfortable and unfamiliar place as quickly as possible but she couldn’t act in a reckless manner inside the mansion.

She neatened her clothes and organized her flower basket first before walking down the corridor meant for workers at the quickest possible speed.

She was about to walk through the passageway’s entry door when a surprise caught her. Just as she was about to turn the corner, she crossed the path with the duke who had come up the stairs.

“It looks like you’ve been doing Lady Brandt’s errands, Leyla.”

Butler Hessen, who stood behind the duke, spoke with a gracious smile.

Leyla greeted him back politely and scurried back to the side of the corridor. She only wanted to go ahead, but the duke stopped still and lowered his gaze on her.

Her cheek blushed. She bent her head even deeper as she dared not to make eye contact with him. It was just eye contact, but her heart was erratically pounding. While the duke looked fine, as if he couldn’t care any less. It seemed he had forgotten everything that had happened between them.

‘How foolish of me. How could my heart throb in snatches of a man like him?’

The duke walked past her just as she wanted to run away unmannerly. Only after she could no longer hear the stomping of his shoe-steps did Leyla dare to move her feet and leave the mansion.

After completing her errands, Leyla returned to her daily routine.

As the evening drew near, the guests invited to the engagement party began to flock to manor. In contrast with the rollicking mansion, the little cottage loomed peacefully deep in the forest as if it had been sojourned in another world.

There, Leyla lived her life diligently.

She weeded the garden and cleaned the goat pen. Continued by cooking a stew for dinner and folded up the sun-dried laundry stocked in the hamper.

After all of her house chores were finished, Leyla took a leisurely walk in the forest to get a thrill of nature. She was enjoying her stroll before long she realized she had arrived at the riverside.


Leyla clambered her favourite beautiful tree to watch the evening scenery laid bare on a windless summer day. The awe-inspiring view surrounded her; birds were soaring above the sky, the red-tinged Schulter river drenched in light by the setting sun, and a white swan-like annex floating on it, all of which led to greater beauty of the scene.

It was a millions worth sight to see. Her eyes were drawn to all of those beautiful things.

As the sun set, a few thin strips of the cloud on the horizon turned shimmering gold. The clear darkness of early nightfall settled over the sky like the blue candy she remembered from her childhood.

The thought came to her.

The Duke’s eyes were likewise the same as those colours.

“Your blue eyes are the same as the color of my sadness.”

Leyla laughed a little as she somehow was feeling dejected. Then suddenly, she sensed someone’s presence approaching her.

“Kyle!”

Leyla shouted with delight when a familiar face standing underneath the tree.

“How did you know I was here?”

“You like taking a stroll on a summer evening, when you go out for evening walks you always go to this river.”

Kyle’s playfulness had disappeared, and his eyes were deeper and gentler than they had ever been.

Leyla observed him quietly, his gaze towards her felt a little strange.

The wind was sighing through the river. The sound of the leaves rustling in the treetops and the boughs moaning breached the silence that had been created between them.

“Leyla.”

Kyle opened his lips after a while.

Leyla replied by tilting her head a little as she waited for him to speak.

“Let’s get married.”

Those overly unrealistic words were torn asunder on a gentle evening breeze. Leyla was dreamingly dazed in disbelief, but now Kyle said it once again. This time with a more serious tone.

“Let’s get married, Leyla.”



Chapter 26







Let’s Get Married







The spring season came a little earlier in Ratz, the capital of the Berg Empire, which was located in the southernmost province of Carlsbar. Arvis estate was starting to bear buds as May came, but the whole city of Ratz was already awash with the sweet scent of roses.

Matthias had a sudden glimpse of thought over the changing of the season while passing through the gardens of the Crown Prince’s Palace. He suddenly halted in his steps, and the other officers who were trailing from behind stopped as well.

“What’s up?”

“No.” Matthias answered short, “Nothing.” He smiled a little, the tip of his lips lifting.

The brief silence broke after Matthias got his stride back. The young aristocratic guard officers continued to converse playfully. Their faces and voices glowed with excitement while discussing how to spend this fine spring weekend and roughly met with a very similar conclusion altogether.

Party. Horse racing. Alternatively, having a spring date with a lover.

“Our Captain will leave his fianceé and spend a lonely spring.”

The horde of officers giggled in a bunch when one of their peers cracked a joke. Matthias just casually grinned and gave a faint chuckle in response to his men’s jesting.

The engagement ceremony between Duke Herhardt and Lady Brandt, which was hosted at the end of last summer, took place successfully. Over several weeks, the couple who had been officially betrothed had become a hot topic of buzz within the society.

However, Matthias didn’t feel much of a change from his everyday life. A week after his engagement, he was assigned to the Berg’s army garrison and had to leave for the capital the day after. Meanwhile, Claudine, who had been staying in Arvis estate, returned to the Brandt’s estate, which was situated in the center of Carlsbar, a metropolis that was a long distance away from the capital city of Ratz.


So, nothing had changed from their previous mode of living, except for the fact that their engagement had been made public. During the social season, Claudine stayed at the mansion the Brandt’s had in Ratz for a while. It was nothing new for her, however, since she had been a regular visitor to the estate on a seasonal basis for quite some time before then. Aside from that, they also attended the social events together, as they always did in the past.

Everything else basically remained the same, except that they now had a definite official status as each other’s fiancées, which was the only thing that had altered in their life.



“I’m about to finish my military service soon. What about you, Matthias?”

A fellow officer who was strolling alongside him posed a question that drew everyone’s attention to Matthias.

“Currently, I’m thinking about extending it for another year.”

As soon as he said that, those around him seemed to be taken aback by his surprising answer.

“Aren’t you going to get married and focus on the family business?”

“The wedding? Maybe next year.”

“Is it because the hot dish over Duke Herhardt’s marriage has eased in social circles? So you want to postpone the wedding?”

Matthias flicked his chin instead of answering. Rather than calling it a postponement, things went that way naturally like it was supposed to. He intended to stay in the capital for another year. At the same time, the Brandt’s wished for their daughter to spend her honeymoon in Arvis with her husband.

When the Brandt’s first requested for the engagement to be tabled for one more year, the Herhardt family consented without hesitation.

Given her young age, there was no pressing need for Claudine to get betrothed so soon. And more than anything else, both families yearned for this marriage to be perfect from the beginning.

After leaving the Imperial Palace, Matthias didn’t waste any time returning to his home.

In terms of age, the old brick mansion, which was located in the heart of Ratz, was the second-oldest building among the Herhardt family’s properties after the Arvis mansion on their estate. That mansion served as the family’s headquarters for generations, during the time they were responsible for the capital’s work. The architecture of the house was more modest and classic compared to the Arvis manor, which epitomized the aesthetic tastes of the hostesses.

“The two madams are here,” reported the servant as he approached Matthias, who had just got out of the car.

“My mother and grandmother?”

“Yes, the madams arrived this morning. They said, “they came here to attend the forthcoming wedding of Her Majesty the Crown Princess.”



Matthias nodded his head and slowly entered the mansion.

The princess, whose pride had been crushed after being pushed out and losing the seat of the Duchess Herhardt’s, was eager to find another running mate so that she could proceed with the wedding ceremony as she planned. Thereafter, the title of her spouse fell to the Grand Duke of a nearby duchy with the same social standing as the Herhardt’s.

“It’s been a while, Matthias!”

Catharina von Herhardt, waiting for Matthias to enter the foyer, greeted him with a bright smile and wide opened arms.

“Son, we can see your face only when we come here like this.”

While his mother Elysee, stayed the same as always; her approach towards her only son was more straightforward.

Matthias approached the two with a warm smile on his face. It was another Saturday afternoon, as much as every other day. Just like the brimming garden of blossoming roses during the early season of spring.







“The weather this evening is so nice, Leyla.”

Kyle walked up to her with a jolly face after parking his bike. Leyla, who was busy helping Bill clean his cart in the garden, quickly turned her head towards the voice, so did Bill, who was holding a shovel.

“Let’s get married.”

Kyle shouted.

After hearing it over and over again, his marriage proposal no longer came as a surprise and it sounded more like a daily morning greeting these days. After having taken a slight pause for a moment, Leyla and Bill nonchalantly returned to their work.

“Hello, Kyle.”

Leyla greeted him brightly as she carried whatever was leftover of the planted seedlings.

“I’m not getting married.”

Leyla spoke in a friendly tone afterward, emphasizing her firm rejection of his proposal.

Sigh.

Bill heaved a sigh. He seemed to be feeling the pain of Kyle’s broken heart. But in contrast, Kyle appeared unfazed by Leyla’s constant rejection. He just smiled gently and volunteered to help her without being asked.

“Fine, I’ll accept your rejection today. I’ll ask you again tomorrow, then.”

“Enough. Don’t ask anymore.”

“No, I will keep asking. A person’s minds is bound to change.”

With the way he was behaving, it wasn’t an exaggeration to say that Kyle’s shameless and stubborn spirit was maybe the toughest in the whole Berg empire.

Bill tried to maintain a straight face as he looked at Kyle and Leyla while struggling to stifle his laughter.

***

Kyle Etman began to propose in the late summer, and stuck to his guns until the seasons changed several times.

When Bill first found out that Kyle had proposed to Leyla, he believed it was most likely due to one of the two possible causes. Either that kid was drunk, considering he couldn’t drink well, or he was insane. That’s why Bill didn’t smack him in the head with the shovel after all. But the following day, Kyle showed up again with a very sane face and repeated the same thing.

‘How many times has it been since then?’

Kyle stopped by the cottage without missing a day throughout fall, winter, and even this spring, saying the same thing every time. Only to be rejected on every one of those visits.

At first, Bill was cheering for Leyla since she was so staunch, but he began to feel sorry for Kyle and his plight as time went on. If it weren’t for his father, Bill would have been excessively vocal with Kyle to get him to stop his doing. Bill, however, opted not to speak more since Dr. Etman had granted his son a green-light.

‘How about sending Leyla off to college?’

Said Dr. Etman when he paid a visit to Bill at his cottage last fall.


Bill’s heart suddenly slumped like a dreary chimney pot. Even if he wished Leyla could pursue her study to a higher level, his current circumstances, in which he was forced to live from hand to mouth, prevented him from doing so. When he replied hesitatingly, ‘I can’t afford it.’ Dr. Etman’s face was lit up with a smile. He continued.

‘If our children have feelings for each other and want to become a couple, it would be good to get them married and send them to college together.’

Bill stared blankly at the doctor in stupefaction. He couldn’t believe what he had heard, though he was thrilled with the offer.

To him, Leyla was the most wonderful child in the world. Yet, he soon realized that the rest of the world had its own set of standards that he couldn’t grasp. One of those was regarding the Etman family’s social standing in Carlsbar society, something about which he had been entirely clueless up until today.

Dr. Etman seemed to understand his befuddlement, so therefore, he spoke first.

‘Kyle said that Leyla is the one person who could bring out the best in him, so he wants to live by her side as a decent person for her.’

Bill was reasonably surprised, as he learned that the young boy who spent most of his time lounging lazily in his cottage and stuffing his stomach with free food had said something like that to his father.

‘It was a very sincere thought that came from youngsters who are still in their adolescence.’

‘But Doctor, Leyla is….’

Bill clammed up, but Dr. Etman’s expression grew kinder.

‘I don’t require his future bride to come from a wealthy family or have a perfect upbringing, because I know that Leyla is a good child even if she doesn’t have such privileges.’

He said so with a smiling face that resembled that of his son.

‘If Kyle doesn’t change his mind till he decides on his career path next year, I’d like to allow them to be together. How about you, Mr. Remmer?’

Deep down in his heart, Bill Remmer was on a cloud nine and felt grateful that he was willing to carry Dr. Etman-whom he regarded to be an angel in human form- on his back and run across the Carlsbar or even the whole Berg Empire. It didn’t matter how tired his physical state was; Bill would be able to endure it every time he pictured Leyla’s happy face in front of him.

Those were his true feelings.

Kyle’s stupid proposal may have ended up being a blessing in disguise for Leyla.


Bill tossed the shovel into the warehouse as he had made up his mind to do something about this matter.



“Oh, Matthias. You know Dr. Etman’s son, don’t you?

Elysee von Herhardt lowered her voice a smidgeon amid a boring talk on the princess’s nuptials. It was just the two of them at the spacious dining table, savoring their blue-plate dinner since Catharina had gone to bed early that night.

“Yes, mother.” Matthias nodded calmly, putting down the glass of water from which he had taken a sip on the table. “Kyle Etman. Dr. Etman’s only son.”

“You’re right. That kid, Kyle, he’s getting married.”

Her voice sounded keen. It was a hint that the woman who became Kyle’s Etman’s companion was an unwelcome figure. But Matthias remained quiet, patiently waiting for his mother to finish her story.

“She’s an orphan raised by our gardener, if I’m not mistaken, her name is Leyla.”

‘Leyla.’

Matthias muttered, with no sound flowing from his lips.

“It doesn’t seem to me that she will satisfy the criteria of the Etmans as their prospective daughter-in-law.”

His throat felt a little tight when he heard his mother mention her name.

“It’s amusing, don’t you think?” Matthias then came up with a bland retort. “Sadly, all of Grandmother’s efforts to find him a good mate have been in vain.”

His voice was a bit taut for some reason.

Matthias didn’t give a further response, but Elysee enthusiastically recounted Kyle Etman’s marriage story, which had been garnering a lot of snooping in the Arvis estate these days.

Mrs. Etman was teed off with Kyle’s decision to marry Leyla since she had been striving for years to get a title from her in-law’s family, which now she was unable to get because of her son’s choice. However, it seemed that she was actually put on the spot in the face of her husband and son’s wishes.

If all went according to plan, rumors said that Leyla would marry the doctor’s son and continue her education. After they went for their honeymoon in Ratz, they would attend college together.

After the upcoming summer passed. Shortly after the season of roses.

“Grandmother must be heartbroken. She eally adores Dr. Etman’s son.”


“Yeah. She must be.” Matthias put down his cutlery and grabbed a napery on the table with his alabaster hand.

“I feel so sorry for Mrs. Etman. She was a respectable doctor’s wife, much more so than them, who were nobles in status. But she lost her hard-earned social standing because of a ridiculous daughter-in-law.” Elysee took a sip of wine to moisten her lips. “What kind of noble would want to befriend a wife who takes a lowlife orphan as her daughter-in-law?”

“The situation may change.”

Matthias straightened his posture and turned to face his mother.

“Because they’re not married yet.”

“Well, Matthias, if things could be changed, Mrs. Etman wouldn’t have been so depressed like this. As you know, Dr. Etman is a persistent person and above all, Kyle is completely smitten with that orphan child.”

Elysee flicked her tongue, expressing her sympathies for the doctor’s wife, who was about to-be-shunned by society as of now.

“She’s a remarkably pretty girl. It was a troublesome reason why her son couldn’t get away from her.”

When she rang the bell, the waiting maids started to serve the dessert on the table.

“I can’t believe that girl was able to take over Mrs. Etman’s position in such a blatant way. She’s a real freak. No, should I say she’s smart?” Elysee shrugged her shoulders lightly and slid her dessert fork into her mouth. “Actually, it’s absurd to place the blame on her alone. The most foolish is Mrs. Etman’s son, who got blinded by a girl and brought disgrace upon his whole family.”

After she was satisfied with schmoozing and reaching her desired conclusion, Elysee von Herhardt finally changed the topic of her talk.

Now, she was back to bring up the topic of her social life, which included a slew of well-known and uninteresting names.

Matthias, on the other hand, stayed deafeningly quiet while listening to her drone on.

‘Leyla.’

That name lingered on the tip of his tongue, like the sip’s taste of wine that had left a sweet mark on him.

Leyla.

Leyla Lewellin.


Chapter 27




Season of Roses Without You







The night had fallen outside when Matthias stepped out of the bathroom after finishing his shower.

With the strap of his robe loosened, he leaned against the windowsill which overlooked the garden below.

Compared to the Arvis manor, a sprawling estate renowned for its beautiful gardens and forests, the garden of the Ratz mansion was considerably more homely.

Its garden wasn’t that big as the manor was located in the center of town.

Neither the previous Dukes of Herhardt nor Matthias himself had even the slightest interest in landscaping or floriculture. For that reason, the Ratz garden was landscaped modestly to add-on to the mansion’s austere style of architecture.

Once the spring season arrived and the roses of different varieties imported from Arvis were in full bloom, the flower beds transformed the drab gardens into a site that was well worth seeing.

When the scent of flowers began to linger in the blowing wind, Matthias had a passing thought about returning to the estate for the summer break.

Before suddenly, the shadow of a girl who had been diligently wandering about the garden, helping the gardener, snapped him out of his reverie.

Leyla.

Matthias unwittingly frowned.

That girl smelled like a rose.



A gardener with a natural aptitude for growing roses had painstakingly succeeded in blossoming one of the most beautiful roses in the world.

But he never thought the precious rose the gardener raised in the woods would soon become his misfortune.

Leyla, the nobody girl.

That was the name that had been embedded in her.

Matthias closed the window and turned around. Droplets of water from his wet hair sprinkled over his feet.

‘Still, didn’t fortune favour her now?’

Someone like Leyla Lewellin could only dream of having a companion like a doctor’s son.

She was blessed with once-in-a-lifetime great luck. Thanks to Kyle Etman’s foolish naivety, she could become the future Mrs Etman and attend college in the nation’s capital.

“…Leyla.”

Matthias made a hushed mention of her name beneath his breath. He mused for a beat.

Perhaps, if that beautiful thing disappeared from his sight, things might turn out better for him as well.

Assuming this was true, he should give her a bigger round of applause for the marriage more than anyone else.

Even when he closed the window, the smell of roses still lingered on the tip of his nose.

Matthias spotted a vase of roses that had been put on the console table. Someone seemed to have plucked the roses that had bloomed in the garden and placed them in his bedroom.

After passing by the vase, his gaze was rested on the golden cage he had brought along with him to Ratz and then turned towards the vase again.



“Leyla.”

Her name sounded even sweeter when he said it with more clarity.

“The roses have bloomed but you’re not here.”

Meanwhile, he was lost in his musings; Matthias suddenly snatched the coveted roses from the vase and clasped them firmly with his hand.

The memories of Leyla, who had tears pouring down her face, flooded back into his mind. The pale pink roses reminded him of her sobbing cheeks, which were dripping wet with tears.

Matthias’ grip on the rose gradually became tighter and tighter until the flower was crushed to a jumble of petals in his palms.

‘It’s a good thing.’

He conscientiously believed so.

‘But…’

Matthias’ eyes narrowed slowly.

‘Can there be a season where the roses bloom without you there?’

‘The flowers will blossom, and I will return, but why aren’t you there with me?’

In those questions, Matthias revived a memory that he wasn’t even aware he had.

That the child was always there.

In the rose-filled summer garden, as if she had become an inseparable part of Arvis itself.

Which means she was also a part of him.

His little yellow bird chirped when it couldn’t fly after he cut its wing off. Matthias now felt a strong urge to kill a person for the first time in his life at this point.

It was unclear which one of them, whether it was the doctor’s son?

….or that woman.

It wasn’t until the night had gotten dim when Matthias released the petals that became a hard lump. His rose-scented hand reached out and took one of the papers on the table and tore it into shreds.

It was a document required to be submitted by the end of the following week.

An eligibility document to extent one year service as a military officer.



“I wholeheartedly give my approval.”

Bill strenuously broached his long hesitated words.

Sitting across the table, Leyla was gazing at him with a perplexed face.

“That glutton, Kyle. I agree. You have my blessing.”

“Hey, uncle…”

Leyla frowned. But Bill kept running his mouth off.

“Stop rejecting him now. Marry him and go to college. I really want you to do that, Leyla.” “I can’t do that.”

“Don’t you like Kyle, too?”

“I do, it doesn’t make sense for me to marry him.”

“What do you mean by it makes no sense? What’s so strange about two people liking each other and getting married.”

Bill choked up, but Leyla’s eyes were fixed on him and didn’t budge.

“Kyle and his family will become everybody’s fool because of me.”

“Dr. Etman has allowed it, too.”

“But ….”

“Leyla, stop thinking about this and that and just look into your heart.” Bill raised the tone of his voice. “If you like Kyle, get married, but if you don’t like him, then don’t. You don’t need to think about anything else.”

Leyla blinked her eyes shut at his words and took a big gulp of the beer before her.

Bill quietly watched her. The child he had nurtured had now grown into a great drinker. Now, they were each other’s best drinking buddies. Ones who could share their woes while sipping a pint of beer together.

“I like Kyle. There’s no other friend in the world who is as comfortable, warm and kind as him.”

Leyla wiped the beer’s froth from the corner of her lips as she eyed Bill even more sternly.

“So, I don’t want to bring shame on him.”

“No, what’s wrong with you, Leyla? Why are you looking down on yourself?”

“It’s not like that. Uncle, I like the person I’ve become. No matter what other people think of me, I’ve never been embarrassed of who I am. All I want to do is be a good and responsible adult, much like you wish for.”

Leyla knitted her brows. Her eyes clouded over with somberness beyond her glasses.

“But, uncle, I’m completely clueless when it comes to marriage. If I were to get married right now, it would mean that all of my efforts have been in vain.”

“Ha. I hope you’re not possibly thinking of spending all your life stuck in this cabin old widower for the rest of your life, Leyla.”

“I’d love to. I don’t want to leave this Arvis forest, uncle. And neither do you.”

“That’s a terrible thing to say.”


“Now that I have a teaching certification, I’m going to get a job at a school nearby. And I want to live like this forever. Living here, together with you, uncle. Maybe I can help you, too.”

“Is this forest going to run? It’s going nowhere. And I’m always going to be here in this forest. Well, maybe someday when I’m getting older and don’t have the stamina to continue working as a gardener, I’ll resign and leave this place. However, I’m still healthy, and I’ll still be in good shape for the next ten years as well.”

Bill gulped down his beer.

“Leyla, whether you leave here, go to college, get married, wherever you are, whatever you do, you will always be my little Leyla.”

Bill reached out and gently squeezed Leyla’s tiny hand on the table.

The college entrance exam was just around the corner, but Leyla still had no signs of changing her mind.

Bill was so frustrated, that he had decided to arrange this talk with her today.

“If you get married to the Etman household, you’ll be living in the neighborhood, there’s nothing better than that.”

“Uncle.”

“Leyla, there’s a very rare kind of man in the world. A man who assured me that he would be a good husband and a good father. And Kyle is the kind of man who fits that bill.”

As he smiled, Bill patted the back of Leyla’s hand with his palm.

“Think about this. I hope you get married to a nice guy and build a real family. Make your home a hive of life, filled with the sound of children laughing. I believe Kyle will never let you be lonely.”

“…… We’re an actual family too.”

Leyla, who was fiddling with Bill’s fingers, raised her head.

The corners of her eyes were red

“Uncle, we are also a family. A real one.”

“… What’s that… … ?”

Since she came from Lovita, this hapless child had carried tear sacs full of sadness with her. Bill’s eyes would sometimes heat up and get teary when he looked at her.

“If you think we’re a real family, you should listen to me even more!”

Bill yelled and dropped an envelope he had prepared in advance in front of Leyla.


Immediately upon receiving and opening the envelope, Leyla’s eyes widened. Inside the envelope was a train ticket to Ratz with a sum of money to cover travel costs.

“The test is next week. Study hard from tomorrow. You always work hard, but you still have to work harder to pass. If you don’t go to Latz, then I’ll consider us as a fake family.”

“Uncle!”

“If you don’t take the entrance exam, I won’t see you again, Leyla.”

Bill had let go of her hand and sat with his shoulders straight. He stared down at her with a severe look.

Albeit, his eyes were endlessly warm, with no hint of a threatening expression in them at all.

Leyla was lost in thought with the envelope in her hand.

Bill looked at her deeply, wholeheartedly, at the figure of a bright and lovely child before his eyes, things that for him hadn’t changed and had remained the same since she was a little kid.

After contemplating for quite some time, Leyla ultimately made a difficult choice.

She stuck her sparkling glass of beer in front of Bill with a still severe expression on her face.

As she had done in the old days, drawing on her pupilage when she tried tried to bump her glass of apple juice into Bill’s glass of beer.

Bill gladly bumped his glass against hers.

Leyla downed the beer all in one go and drained the glass entirely of its contents. Her cheeks quickly began to flush, but she remained steadfast in her pretence of being a good drinker.

“Even though we’re apart, we’re still a real family, right?”

That smothering question came close to bringing tears to Bill’s eyes all over again.

“Don’t be worried about that.”

Unlike his blunt way of speaking, Bill smiled so warmly at her.

Leyla smiled as she watched him still.

They were like a genuine family.



“You will definitely like it the most. The museum of natural history.”

Kyle once again spoke excitedly.

“It’ll probably be like heaven for you.”


He was listing out the must-see places in Ratz and was most excited when he began to talk about the Natural History Museum.

Outside the window of the rattling train they were riding, a breathtakingly beautiful sight of springtime landscapes with flowers in full bloom greeted them everywhere.

This was Leyla’s first visit to Ratz, and she couldn’t have been thrilled.

But for Kyle, it was the umpteenth time since he often visited his relatives in the capital and thus was quite familiar with the city.

Kyle had meant for Leyla to stay at his relative’s house, but she politely refused his offer and opted to stay at a small hotel nearby.

“You must be tired right now. Shall we go tomorrow?”

“I have to study for the exam.”

“When it comes to studying, what is the difference between studying now and studying later before the exam day? You just need to make sure you memorize what you’ve learned.”

“Wow. You look very confident, Mr. Etman.”

“Of course I am, Miss Lewellin.”

“Well, that’s great.”

“So then, let’s get married.”

Instead of hurling her rejection at him like in the past, Leyla set her gaze intensely on Kyle’s face. Her sudden shift in reaction made Kyle startled a bit.

“W-why, what’s wrong?”

“You know, Kyle. Can you imagine it?”

“Imagine what?”

“We are married to each other and become husband and wife.”

The moment Leyla stated it with a serious expression, Kyle’s cheeks began to burn crimson.

“Of course! You can imagine it! Go ahead, do whatever you want!”

“I don’t know. It strikes me as a bit weird. Us getting married, having children… You know, getting into that type of relationship.”

“What are you saying now? It’s not weird at all.”


“Really? We’ve learned about the act of reproduction, haven’t we? How to make and give birth to a baby, are we really going to do that?”

“Make… Birth, what?”

Kyle doubted his ears. He felt like he had misheard something improper, but Leyla, the person who threw the bomb words, precisely had an innocent face with not a trace of shamelessness on it.

“Act of reproduction.”

Leyla hurled a bomb for the second time without even batting an eye.

“There’s nothing to be ashamed of, Kyle. Birds, flowers, and all other living things do it to preserve their species.”

“Do you know what you’re saying right now?

“Yeah. I’m only a little weak in geometry, but I am pretty good at other subjects.”

Kyle’s throat tightened, and he turned head sideways to avoid staring straight ahead. He was embarrassed when Leyla seemed so proud of herself after uttering all that saucy stuff.

“Isn’t it a bit weird for us that we’re going to do that, and…….”

“uh… … Leyla, come on, eat this.” Kyle quickly slipped a slice of sandwich between Leyla’s talkative lips to cease her babbling.

Though it wasn’t yet summer, the temperature within the train, for some reason, was as scorching as if he were inside a kiln.

Leyla munched on the sandwich with relish. In between bites of the sandwich, she mumbled and opened her lips again.

“Eat this too.”

Before she could say anything, Kyle had already shoved another cookie into her mouth, clamming her up from speaking further.

‘Please, don’t say that stuff anymore.’

Kyle sucked in everything he wanted to say and just shook his head.

( ‘When you start thinking of shit, think about my shovel.’ )

Uncle Bill’s voice suddenly rang out in his ears.

He greeted Kyle with a very kind and creepy smile when he came to the cottage to pick up Leyla this morning.

‘Yes, shovel.’

Kyle’s thoughts wandered back to Uncle Bill’s giant dirt shovel, which looked close to a weapon.

“So Kyle, I mean…..”

Leyla’s lips began to twitch open once again as soon as she finished all the cookies. Her look was a mess yet lovely, with cookie crumbs smeared all over her dainty red lips.

“Leyla, if you say one more word.”

Kyle sighed and scratched the back of his head.

“Huh?”

“If you say one more word…”

He gulped.

After digesting his feelings that had been stifled by the shovel, Kyle made a tragic confession.

“I’m going to jump off the train.”


Chapter 28




Fly in The Spring Like A Bird







“I respect your decision, but I can’t help feeling disappointed.”

Colonel Farrell, the commanding officer of the Military Forces, looked at Matthias with a faint smile.

Matthias remained still. His countenance was quite ample.

“I feel like I’m losing a capable officer. Well, it would be a greater loss for this Empire if Duke Herhardt were to continue serving in the army with his competencies. However, speaking from the standpoint of a soldier, I’m a little upset.”

He said. The sense of disappointment and loss in his eyes was earnest, given that they were in a formal military relationship as superior and subordinate.

Captain Herhardt, his most trusted underling, who was due to remain in the service for another year, had unexpectedly changed his mind. Imagined his surprise when a paper was delivered to his desk. Instead of the document to extend his service period, a letter of resignation was sent to him. It was his wish that Matthias would stay, but Colonel Farrell had no reason to detain him since the grounds for his appeal, as stated in the letter, was none other than his grandmother, the Duchess of Herhardt.

“Thank you for all this time.”

Matthias thanked him politely.

He always showed due respect for his superiors even though the Duke of Herhardt was a considerably higher-ranking nobleman based on social status.

His attitude was markedly different from that of other aristocratic officials, who were often unable to differentiate between public and private affairs.

Colonel Farrell admired Matthias for that.

Secondly, if considering his meritorious service to the empire, his first task by selecting the frontline, a problematic area of the outpost, was noteworthy.




“Make sure to visit me when you come to Ratz.”

Matthias was more than glad to comply with the colonel’s request for a farewell handshake.

“Yes, Colonel.”

He shook his superior’s hand firmly and exited through the colonel’s office door, having been entirely freed of his duties.

The outpouring of the spring sunshine drifted across a clear blue sky welcoming his steps once he walked out onto the street.

Matthias got into his car and drove toward Ratz’s downtown. He had to go to several places to meet with some of his other superiors. It was only after then, the farewell activities for his retirement, which had been rolling on for several days, were finally brought to an end.

When he was about to walk up to his waiting vehicle, something went by and halted him in his tracks. Matthias turned his eyes towards the end of the road across the street. Over there, came to his sight a figure he used to know.

Leyla.

A woman who turned out to be none other than Leyla Lewellin was walking the road leisurely along the promenade at the downtown area.

“Master.”

The driver approached him as he stood still and didn’t get into the car.

“Go back first.”

Matthias ordered him while keeping his gaze fixed on the opposite side of the road.

‘It’s Leyla. No way, she couldn’t possibly be here. ‘

Straightaway, with broad strides, he got across the road.





The museum she visited was huge.

Leyla looked around in amazement at the magnificent building of the Berg Empire Natural History Museum, the same way she did on her first day setting foot in this place.

The day after arriving at Ratz city, Kyle took Leyla on her first visit to this place. The Art History Museum and the Natural History Museum, which sat across the street, opposite to each other, and were said to be places of Ratz’s greatest pride.


Leyla had grown used to the grandeur of Carlsbar city, which was reputed to be on par with the splendor of the capital. But she remained so mesmerized by the architectural wonders that lined the streets of Ratz every time she passed through them.

The girls at her school who toured the capital often gushed about how beautiful the Art History Museum was. Still, Leyla unhesitatingly chose the Natural History Museum to be named the owner of the most beautiful architecture.

As Kyle described it, the museum was like a piece of heaven on earth for her. All she could think about was how vast the museum was and how impossible it seemed to be for her to explore every corner of the building in just a single day.

Leyla was eager to devote her entire day exploring this place to the fullest extent possible. She also had planned to empty her schedule on the last day to come here once again before leaving Ratz city. Hopefully, she would be able to view the whole of the museum’s collection and accomplish her mission.

Having finally made up her mind, Leyla was raring to go and walked into the museum foyer with a spring in her step.

Literally, Kyle wished to accompany her today, but Leyla shunned his goodwill. Unlike her, who had completed her exam the day before, he was just getting started with his exam tomorrow morning.

Though Kyle was full of confidence in his brains and had studied in advance, Leyla didn’t want to bring him here for sightseeing just one day before the exam.

Before entering the exhibition hall, Leyla once again double-checked her outfit, making sure there was not a single hair out of place.

‘Comfortable shoes, checked.’

‘Notebook and pen, checked.’

‘Stamina in full, I’m ready to go.’

After drawing out a notebook and pen from her bag, Leyla stepped into the viewing gallery, which she hadn’t had a chance to see on the first day of her arrival.

***

Leyla Lewellin today was just like a child at a picnic.

Matthias stood at a safe distance away, quietly watching her as she strode through several spacious exhibit galleries without a trace of tiredness devouring her.

Matthias was already convinced that the woman’s back he saw going inside the Natural History Museum belonged to Leyla, so he quietly followed her while keeping his distance.

Curiosity got the better of him, leaving him wondering what the hell she was up to.?

But soon after seeing what she was doing, Matthias was willing to wait and keep a closer eye on her.

As he waited, Matthias suddenly remainded about the college entrance exam that took place in the capital around this time. Seeing that she had traveled to the capital city to take the test, Matthias concluded that she had decided to continue her study at the college. So was her marriage to Kyle Etman as well.

Leyla was standing in front of a glass display case containing various plant specimens, diligently penning things down in her notebook. Sometimes, her lips were tinged with a smile, and her face took on a jolly beam as if she was looking at a precious jewel. Matthias was hard to believe that a mere plant sample could elicit such a giggle from her face.

In the end, Matthias decided to stalk her a bit further, but he didn’t go any closer since he knew her joy would perish whenever she saw him.

Matthias folded his hands behind his back and slowly trailed in her footsteps at the same pace.

He hadn’t seen her since last summer, and Leyla didn’t seem to have changed much since then. Even yet, there was only a slight changeover in her delicate appearance from before.

Her face had become slimmer, her expression looked more gentle, and every movement of her body appeared more graceful as time went on. Donning a lace-embellished white dress, Leyla seemed more mature than she was before.

After she had been there long enough, Leyla left the herbarium exhibition room and abruptly stopped for a while in front of the passage leading to the next gallery.

Matthias was able to figure out what had piqued her attention.

The passageway that ran between the two exhibition rooms was conjured up in such a way and incarnated like a heavenly place. The branches, painted with silvery hue, were decorated with white feathers and garland hanging like leaves.

As the light trickled in through the window glass, the colorful bird-shaped crystal ornaments draping all over the branches reflected its rays. They created a dreamlike atmosphere to the eye, reminiscent of a fairy tale realm, enhancing the magical beauty of the space even more.

“Gosh—.”

Leyla’s naive admiration came to his attention.

Matthias couldn’t keep a smile off his face as he watched her run about with such abandon. Her wavy blonde hair and the hem of her dress bounced with her as she sprinted excitedly inside the area like a little girl at a playground.

In the middle of that beautiful passage, Leyla halted her steps.

She stretched out her hand towards the branches, but her fingertips were unable to grasp the bird-shaped ornament.

Leyla was still staring up at the ceiling gazing in awe, when Matthias sauntered and walked straight off to her side.

Before she had a chance to realize his presence, Matthias already grabbed her by the waist and lifted her body off the ground.

Leyla jolted in surprise when she floated into the air. She turned her head, and a crystal bird, which had previously been beyond her reach, was now right in front of her eyes.

She felt like she could fly like a bird in the spring and go anywhere. As if she were dreaming with her eyes open.

It was strange, but breathaking moment.

Matthias dropped her down to the floor and acted as if nothing had happened.

The hem of her voluminous, puffy white dress slid down her calves and caressed her skin softly on the inside.

Leyla raised her head and hid her hand that had touched the crystal bird behind her back.

Matthias slowly took off his officer’s hat. His pairs of blue eyes, bluer than the sky at the end of the summer, were fixed on her with a dazzling vividity.

***

Below the museum’s dome was a little cafe selling refreshments where visitors could rest and refuel their stomachs. Leyla and Kyle had already had lunch at that place when they came on the first day of their visit.

Matthias took the lead in heading there. Knowing the meaning, Leyla stood still, a scowl on her face.

“It was nice to meet you, duke. I’m going to take my leave now.”

At her words, Matthias turned around. Leyla steeled herself, bowed her head in greeting, and began to walk to the other way.

“There.”

He commanded.

She refused to comply and took a few more steps, but at the end she failed to escape.

Matthias had passed by her and blocked her way.

“What’s wrong with you?”

Leyla looked around her and asked sharply. Some passersby narrowed their eyes, staring at them in a bit of wonder.

“I hate it.”

“What?!”

“… Someone like you, I hate it.”

Matthias’ arrogant attitude suddenly drove her up a wall.

“You can’t be like this to me.” Leyla clasped the straps of her bag, which she was carrying over her shoulders. Her hands trembling nervously,

“I-I mean…”

“Do you want to do something that we shouldn’t do?”

A smile teased the corner of his lips as he stated it in a somewhat sarcastic tone. For a short moment, a maddening rush swept through Leyla’s body and knitted her brows in disbelief.

“No!”

Both of her hands began to shake fiercely after Matthias made such offensive remarks,

“Never!”

A sharp feeling of heat seared Leyla’s cheeks. Her face became blazing red as she seethed with rage. The humiliation Matthias piled on her had trodden on her toes. Mainly because how aloof and arrogant he was when he said so.

After a few moments of looking around his surroundings, Matthias returned his gaze to her.

“I want to buy a cup of tea for an orphan who lives on my estate I happened to meet while in the capital city. What’s wrong with me being kindness?”

His attitude consistently unabashed even when he said something disrespectful.

“There’s nothing wrong with that.”

Matthias spoke coldly. His face lost its grin.

“Isn’t that right, Leyla?”

Ending his question that he had answered himself, Matthias slithered his way to the cafe.

Leyla let out a long, weak sigh as she looked at his back.

Though she didn’t know Duke Herhard very well, she now knew one crucial aspect about him:

achieving everything he desired at whatever cost. The more challenging something was to get, the more valuable it was to own.

That man always had to get what he wanted.

Giving up, Leyla walked behind the duke with heaviness in her stride.

***

They were sitting across from each other.

Shortly after the take-out order was made, the waiter brought two cups of steaming hot coffee to their table. The teacup billowed a cloud of white smoke, which rose into the air; had been laid between the two people who were appearing to be silent.

“I never thought I’d meet you by coincidence in a place like this.”

Layla opened the conversation with some trepidation. She was feeling awkward with the stillness between them, so she decided to speak up first.

“In the natural history museum…do you….”

“I’m not interested.”

Matthias cut her words, taking a sip of his coffee.

“You already know it, Leyla.”

A smirk hung on the corner of his lips. “I have absolutely no interest in these kinds of things.”

“Then why you….”

“You already know it’s not a coincidence.”

“No.”

Leyla replied reflexively. Her whole body grew tense, and her heart began to beat in a blue funk. She would rather be an impoverished orphan who would get pity from him. She didn’t want to be seen as ‘something’ else by this man in any way.

“All I know is…”

The sound of her voice was a bundle in nerves, and Leyla gulped back her agitation for a moment.

“All I know is just that, you hate me.”


Leyla closed her eyes as if she were trying to erase the horrifying memories of their first kiss that suddenly dawned on her. But it was to no avail. Once she blinked her eyes to see, Matthias’ blue eyes were still fixed on her, and those memories flooded back in, anchoring her to the nightmare once again.

“Right, I hate you.”

Matthias assented her words with ease. A smile bloomed on his face.

“Now, I terribly hate you, Leyla.”


Chapter 29




A Failed Wish







The smile formed on Matthias’s face faded in a jiffy. When he looked at her with a cold glint in his eyes, Leyla felt her heart leap into her mouth.

“I’ll leave then.”

As she spoke, Leyla dipped her gaze into the teacup in front of her, utterly disregarding his presence.

“… Pardon?”

“I won’t be staying there anymore. I’ll leave and won’t be a bother in your estate.”

“Where are you going?”

“Anywhere.”

She clenched her fist which began to shiver, together with the chill she felt. Don’t be scared– Leyla reassured herself, though she knew it was a fool’s errand.

“Arvis isn’t the only place in this world where I can make a home for myself.”

Her words lost none of their venoms, spewing a thorn as sharp as the blow he spat to her. But Matthias simply gave her the cold shoulder, taking her grumbling as a passing whim.

Leyla wanted to flee from her seat and get out of there as soon as possible, but what happened last summer—the day she lost her hat and fell into a freezing river because she refused to eat what he offered her, had presented itself in her mind and pinned her feet firmly in place.



She didn’t want to go through that trauma all over again.

As she set her sight on the teacup, Leyla sipped her hot coffee in a hurry. She almost choked, but Leyla managed to finish it in one gulp, until the teacup revealed its bottom. Then, she sucked in a long breath to calm herself.

“Leyla.” sibilated Matthias, pointing at her.

Lelya stiffened and hurriedly took out the money from her purse and put it on the table’s edge.

Matthias scoffed, “What’s this?”

“It’s money to pay for the coffee I drank.” Leyla opened her lips and struggled to get the words out. Her gaze remained affixed on his finger.

“Do you think I’m the kind of person who needs someone like you to pay for a cup of coffee?”

“I don’t know about that, but I don’t want to receive anything from you.”

With that phrase, Leyla felt a chill run down her spine. The trembling began anew as her hands became soaked with cold sweat, and her fingers turned a paler hue. Still, her inquisitiveness won against her, in the end.

Because this place wasn’t Arvis, where Leyla Lewellin used to live the life of a poor orphan under his world.

“Lift your head.”

“I don’t want to.”

“Lift your head, Leyla.”

“Stop bossing me around.”

The mounting exasperation tightened her throat. She looked daggers at Matthias with a blaze of indignation burning furiously in her eyes.



“I am not your maid.”

A sudden rush of reckless courage had obliterated the ripples of dread that had been roiling within her for some time, heating her response.

“Maid?”

“I was obviously raised by Uncle Bill in Arvis, but that doesn’t mean that I’m your maid.”

“Is that so? What are you, then?”

“… I’m a nobody.”

The corner of her eyes faintly flushed

“I have been and will always be.”


A sharp pain seared through her feelings right at the moment. Her emerald eyes were moist with tears as she glowered at Matthias. But even so, she still got a hold of him and even ventured to confront him.

Matthias just held his coffee cup’s handle wordlessly. He mused about the day he wished to strangle Leyla Lewellin, and he longed to do so again right now.

The sweltering heat of a late summer day afternoon; when he felt as filthy as his messed-up clothes after rolling around on the dirt ground. When he went ballistic at the acts of a mere worthless woman.

‘What if I had strangled you then…’

In his mind, Matthias concluded that what he felt at the time wasn’t quite as bad as what he was presently feeling. Right now, he felt like a freak. The feeling of being carried away by an inexplicable desire and compulsive obsession over a no-name woman disgusted him the most.

Matthias took the money that she had left on the table and rose from his seat. Then, he dropped it one by one onto her lap.

“Take it.”

Leyla glowered at him. Taking in her eyes, which turned a livid red, Matthias threw some of his gold coins down her skirt. “And this, too.”

“W-what are you…”

“Thank-you; is what you should say, Leyla.”

Matthias scoffed in ridicule.

“Similar to how you receive Claudine’s money. With gratitude. With courtesy.”

Leyla’s eyes blurred as he snickered, but she wouldn’t let her tears fall. She twitched her lips to counter his severity, yet words slinked and slid off her tongue.

“I’ve taken away your time, even though you’re not my maid, so I’ll pay you your labor fee.”

A great tremor now overtook her. Leyla gritted her teeth, but hot torrents of grief already coursed down her face.

“If you don’t like it, simply think of it as my sympathy for the poor orphan.”

Tears began to tickle her cheek. Deep emotions stirred with no other outlet but through her long-lasting sobs dripping down like a piece of jewelry.

“You bootlick a guy who wants to marry you out of pity, yet you wish to sustain your pride for a few coins. How amusing.”


Matthias’ sneer was like an invisible thread that pulled her over. Leyla gallantly scowled at him, but her total disgruntlement had already converted into tears that continued to rain down her cheeks like a river leaving a dam.

Matthias walked out of the cafe with a satisfied smile plastered on his face.

Leyla Lewellin was a woman who never once smiled in his presence, but she was also the woman who, whenever he came into contact with her, would break down and cry uncontrollably.

‘If I can’t make you smile, then I will make you cry.’

Her laughter or tears, Matthias loved her in all of her manifestations. If he only could give her pain, he would hurt her as deeply as he could.

‘At the very least, you wouldn’t see me as a tiny blot in your life.’

Before leaving the cafe, Matthias turned around and gave her face a good stare. Leyla wiped her cheek every few second as she cried; her glasses laid on the table’s edge.

Matthias made a wish as his long strides slowly brought him to leave the Natural History Museum.

‘May Leyla soon marry the doctor’s son, and disappear from my world.’

‘And may the tears and wounds I had sculpted, last forever in her memory.’



The sun had already drowned itself on the west skysill, but Leyla hadn’t returned to her hotel yet.

Kyle, looking for Leyla at her hotel to have dinner with her, exited the lobby with a worried face. Though she was a little kid no longer, this city was a stranger to her; bad people might be clustered everywhere.

“Well, she has no fear, but still…..”

Kyle took a hesitant stride along the street. His mind was racing faster than his feet. He had assumed she would be at the museum, but it had already closed by the time he had arrived. The search for her had taken him all across town, but Leyla was nowhere to be seen.

‘Is she lost?’

Kyle darted past people, buildings, and trees.

‘If not, has she met a bad guy?’

Kyle wanted to bury all of the negative thoughts that had crossed his head; he didn’t even want to consider the possibility.

It was then that he found her.


Leyla stood before a fountain in the park square at the end of the museum street and dubiously threw a coin towards the statue of the water fountain.

“Leyla!”

Her eyes naturally moved towards the direction of the voice that was calling her name.

“Uh, Kyle?”

Leyla seemed befuddled as if she had no idea that she had scared someone out of his wits.

“What are you doing here?”

Kyle approached her, brushing the sweat-drenched hair from his forehead.

“Kyle, why are you here? How about your exam preparations?”

“Does it matter right now? You really… Seriously, you….”

Kyle grabbed her shoulder. He slowly drew a breath and let it back out with a loud sigh. It wasn’t long before his daunting gasps calmed down a little.

“Are you alright? Would you like to have a seat?” Leyla asked; her eyes were drawn to his face with worry.

‘Who cares about who now?’

Kyle clasped his heated palms over Leyla’s face and heaved a long sigh that sounded more like a mournful laugh. It was then that he noticed that her eyes had swelled and reddened a bit.

“Leyla, are you crying?”

“No, I’m not.”

Leyla answered his question in such a hurry as if she had run out of words, which only made Kyle even more sure that she had been crying.

“Why did you cry?”

“I didn’t.”

“Who made you cry?”

“No one, it’s nothing like that,” Leyla smiled and gently pushed his hand away. “I just, uh, looked around the museum. Took a walk in the park and made a wish.”

“Wish?”

“Yeah. I saw everyone doing it.”


Leyla gestured with her finger toward the fountain in the middle of the park. People with bright smiles on their faces were throwing their coins into the fountain and making wishes.

“I also made a wish for you to get into medical school.”

“Are you sure you threw it accurately?”

Kyle began to chuckle as he pointed to the water bowl the statue was holding. The disappointed moans of those who failed to throw their coins into the pot resounded across the throng.

“Of course I made it,” said Leyla with a proud smile on her face, “I’m really good at this thing.”

“I know, I can already imagine it.”

“It is already dinner time. Are you hungry? Let’s make one more wish before we go.”

Leyla made a beeline for the fountain, holding a shiny gold coin in her hand. Kyle, to her surprise, obediently trod on his heels from behind.

“Leyla! Do you seriously want to throw your gold coins there? To that fountain? A penny-pincher like you?”

In lieu of responding, Leyla pitched the coin with all her might. Unluckily for her, the gold coin hit the edge of the bowl and bounced off towards another side. She gasped and frowned, dismay enveloping her face.

“Leyla, are you really good at this?”

“Why don’t you believe me? I successfully threw all of my coins in one fell swoop just now!”

“Just how many gold coins did you throw, huh?” Kyle asked in a giggle at her slipshod feat that wasn’t like her at all.

“Okay. Since I’ve already given a big donation to the Ratz’s fountain today, I’ll toss in one more coin.”

“Are you going to throw another one? That’s enough! Don’t do it!”

Kyle snatched the coin from Leyla’s grasp, leaving her to scowl and lunge for his hand in annoyance. “It must be spent!”

“You may say that, but how many gold coins have you already thrown in there?”

“It’s the value of money.”

“Is there money that needs to be wasted for nothing like this?”

“There is!” Layla shrieked.


“Enough! Don’t throw any more money. It’s a waste. If you want to squander money, let’s go and get some ice cream.”

“You really do look like Leyla Lewellin when you say that.”

“Whatever.” Kyle shrugged his shoulders and put the coin back into his pocket. “Let’s go.”

He knew Leyla would reject his hand, but Kyle still extended his to her. Leyla lightly clapped his hand and seized the lead by taking a small step ahead of him.

Kyle was moving quickly to catch up with her

“Hey, what did you wish for?”

“I wished for Uncle Bill’s well-being and happiness. Then for you to get into college and become a good doctor. And I wished to be a decent grownup. That’s all of the wishes I had for us.”

“Then what’s the last one?”

“Hmm?”

“The last wish of your failed attempt.”

“That’s…”

Leyla’s face suddenly grew sour.

“It’s a secret.” She abruptly shook her head in disgust and widened her stride.

Kyle just chuckled cheerfully, his face lighted up with interest.

“Let’s get something delicious to eat, shall we? I’ve been frantically running around searching for you, and now I’m starving to death.”



Dr. Etman heaved a sigh before he opened the bedroom door.

When he switched on the light, he saw that his wife was already lying on the bed. She had been like this ever since Kyle and Leyla had left for Ratz to take their exams.

“Dear, dinner is ready. Let’s go.”

“Don’t mind me.”

Her voice sounded icy, which contrasted with her lackluster appearance.

“I understand how you feel, but….”

“No. You don’t. The generous and benevolent Dr. Etman would never understand.”

Her eyes were ablaze with anger.

“But dear, you also like Leyla, don’t you?”

“Yes. I know. Leyla is a good girl. If it weren’t for you and Kyle, I would have continued to like her.”

“Marrying Kyle won’t change Leyla, dear. It’s just that Kyle will marry that good girl that he truly loves.”

“You might think of me as an exorbitant snob, but marriage is a reality. This marriage is degrading our son, and you’re allowing it to happen!”

“Dear, the world will keep changing. Someone’s social status will soon become an outmoded value.”

Mrs. Etman arranged her long, flowing hair into a bun and pulled it up neatly before getting out of bed. She stared at her husband with an upset face; she didn’t exactly look like someone who had been starving for days.

“In a world where people live, social status won’t disappear. Even if the title is no longer in use, something else will separate society’s social classes in the future.”

“Dear…”

“And whatever the standards are, the fact that Leyla is not a good fit for our Kyle will never change. Ever.”

Rounding off the talk with those bitter words, Mrs. Etman walked past her husband.

Dr. Etman watched his wife’s back, who had left towards the garden, and smiled faintly to the maid, who was standing there looking confused.

“I’m sorry, Mrs. Becker. Please clean the dinner table.”

With a sigh, Dr. Etman followed his wife into the unlit garden at this hour of the night.


Chapter 30







I’ll Do My Best







After a satisfying dinner, Leyla and Kyle shuffled down the night street, enjoying the ice cream in their hands. Kyle was keen on staying with her though she had told him to hurry back and prepare for tomorrow’s exam.

“I need to digest the food first so I can properly prepare for tomorrow’s test.”

Leyla belted up, unable to come up with a retort to his confident reasoning.

“Let’s walk for a bit then,” she said, “but Kyle…”

“Hmm?”

“Why do you want to marry me?”

Leyla asked cautiously. The aftertaste of cold, sweet ice cream smeared on her lips.

“If you’re just doing it out of pity….”

“Leyla Lewellin.”

Kyle cut her off, calling her name firmly, and stepped in front of Leyla, who was a little startled by his frigid voice.

“Do you see me as the kind of crazy guy who marries someone out of sympathy?”



His unfamiliar expression made Leyla freeze in her tracks, and she fell silent.

“Well, the world is wide. There might be a lot of crazy people who marry for such reasons, but I’m not one of them.”

Kyle eased the air out of his lungs slowly, letting his temper settle.

“Do you know why? It’s because I love you.”

“Kyle…”

“That’s my only reason. Because I love Leyla Lewellin.”

As he looked down at Leyla’s cocked eyebrow, Kyle sighed and then chuckled. “Who do you think is more pitiful? Me, who’s been rejected hundreds of times or you? I’m the sadder one, Leyla.”

Kyle said as he began to ruffle Leyla’s hair and moved a step ahead. He didn’t want Leyla to see what expression he was making right now, which must have been pretty silly.

As if she knew what he was going through, Leyla followed him from behind, creating some distance between them.

After travelling home shackled in deafening silence, the two finally arrived in front of the hotel.

“Go in,” Kyle told her. With a smile on his face, he added, “Oh, I forgot, I haven’t done it today.”

He slowly lifted his eyes after staring down at the cup of melting ice cream in his hand. He had remembered something.

“Leyla, let’s get married.”

The turndown was already flashing before his very eyes, though. Yet Kyle felt a little weird skipping it now since Leyla’s rejection had become something of a daily routine for him.

For some reason, today, Leyla, who was accustomed to rejecting his proposal with a nonchalant shrug, was unusually quiet.




Kyle looked at her with his eyes narrowed as he studied her attentively. “I’m not getting married,” He readied to hear such a sweet but heartless response that was supposed to come from her slowly parted lips. But instead, her response was something beyond his wildest dreams.

“Mm.”

“…Leyla?”

Kyle jolted in surprise. The ice cream cup he was holding fell to the ground, soiling the tip of his shoe.

The words failed him. He was in a conundrum at her straightforward reply.

“Eh…… So, do you agree to marry me?”

As he made sure, Leyla lowered her head and nodded.

“You want to marry, right? Me?”


He repeated the question in a shaky voice. Leyla glimpsed at him sheepishly and nodded her head slightly once more.

She was momentarily at a loss for words. But Kyle was already screaming in delight as he held her by the shoulders.

“Woohooooooo!”

Their shindig floored guests at the hotel who happened to pass by stared at them. Kyle didn’t seem to care even though Leyla let out her scream when he spun her around.

It was a beautiful spring night.

A gentle wind was lulling the city back to its slumber.



That night Kyle had a dream.

He dreamed of marrying Leyla and living their everyday life in complete bliss as an Etman couple.

Leyla once said to him; having her own house with a small flower bed was her long-held dream. She smiled shyly and voiced her happiness. She wished the roses she had planted in the garden were all blooming beautifully.

In his dream, he saw Leyla diligently tending to that very flower garden. The little child who was running alongside her was more lovely than a blossoming rose.

The sun shone brilliantly, and the child’s laughter was brimming with glee.

‘Daddy—!’

The child who saw him quickly came running. She was a pretty little girl who looked a lot like Leyla with her blonde hair. The child, still a toddler, jumped on his feet and welcomed him with her eyes sparkling.

The whiff of air caressed him as he walked to her with their lovely daughter in his arms. The scent of sweet roses borne by the fluttering wind faintly tickled the tip of his nose in a pleasant way.

Leyla laughed as her eyes held his a moment longer. Her smile was so beautiful, perhaps even more beautiful than his beautiful dream had been.

In the fading remnants of his dream, Kyle awakened with the phosphenes still in his eyes. Thanks to that feeling of happiness, he performed much better than he expected on the exam.

He couldn’t believe it.

Will his dream soon come true?

Is there such a thing as a beautiful blessing in this world greater than that?

Once he stepped out of the exam hall, Kyle had the feeling that he could leap to great heights in the sky.

His footfall seemed to have wings, he felt free like a bird just leaving its nest the moment he spotted

Leyla sitting on a bench outside, waiting for him.

“Leyla!”

Leyla raised her head at his shout. She folded the small notebook she was reading and put it back into her sling bag.

“How was the test?” She approached him blithely. “Was it hard? Did you do well?”

“You’re always worried about everything.” Kyle tucked his chin up as though he were flaunting. “I’m Kyle Etman. I don’t know how to get second place in studies.”

“Oh, hahaha. You did great, then.”

Leyla hooted with laughter.

“I forgot how smart Mr. Etman was for a moment.”

“Wow. That makes me very sad to hear. Make sure you keep it in your mind from now on.”

Kyle suddenly grabbed her hand. Leyla didn’t wave his hand away though his touch took her by surprise.

While she was looking at him, the late afternoon spring sunlight in dazzling crimson gold glowed on the corner of his lips as he gave a gentle smile back to her.

“Are you sure you did well on the exam?” asked Leyla carefully, as she looked like she couldn’t shake off her trepidation.

Kyle grinned at her after seeing how adorable she was. “Don’t worry. I won’t fail the exam, so there won’t be anything bad that may prevent us from attending college together.”

“That’s not what I meant….”

Leyla’s cheeks were flushed with rosy pink. The moment he caught the sight of her adorable, sweet ripe-peach face, Kyle’s heart began to skip a beat erratically. He regretted that they were at the exam location presently. If they had been on an empty street, Kyle would have mustered up his guts to kiss her right at this moment.

‘No.’

‘If I do that for no reason, Leyla will get scared, so I’d better wait for a little bit longer.’

One of his thoughts wandered back to the shovel, which he had forgotten about. The giant shovel full of dirt, and Uncle Bill’s alarming smile.


The two slowly hiked around the campus, with hands intertwined tightly. Walking from the medical facility where Kyle would study as a doctor, then to the biology hall where Leyla would be enrolling in the future. They laughed and chatted excitedly and had a great time along the way.

“You will definitely pass, but it may be a bit difficult for me.”

Leyla muttered with a serious face as she reached the biology faculty building.

“Why are you worried about that? Didn’t you do well on your exams?”

“That’s true, but only a few female students took the exam earlier.”

Her countenance became more gloomy as the talk continued.

Kyle nodded his head, “Ah… that’s right.” He momentarily sighed a little.

It had only been a few years ago since women were allowed to pursue higher education at the same level as the men in the Empire’s universities. Due to the rigorous selection process, only a few students could pass since the threshold for college admission test scores was much higher for female students.

“Still, I’m sure you will pass.”

Kyle spoke with confidence.

“If you don’t pass, who else will?”

“Don’t you think you’re being overconfident?”

“Not in the least. This is my opinion based on your grades during your eight years of school.”

“Eight years… So much time has passed already.”

Leyla could still vividly remember the road she had ridden to Arvis by a mail wagon. Time had passed by in a flash. The well-grown Kyle who was standing before her eyes suddenly felt like a new person.

“What’s wrong?”

Kyle, who was a little embarrassed from the deep gaze fixated on him, asked awkwardly.

“You have grown so much.”

Amazement reigned in Leyla’s eyes as she stared at him for a moment. Stunned, Kyle was utterly at a loss for what to do as though fluffy feathers were popping from his chest. Leyla Lewellin’s attractiveness didn’t appear to diminish even when she uttered such ridiculous things, leaving him speechless.

“Uh-huh.”

Kyle gave a false smile. He took a deep breath and continued,

“Yeah, I’ve grown up well to be a decent husband. Do you like it?”

“That’s… I don’t know.”

Leyla stiffly hastened her stride. Kyle couldn’t stop himself from grinning from ear to ear when he saw her face was daubed with shyness.

On their way back, Kyle talked about his pleasant dreams, which would soon become a reality.

About the house—how they would live together. Their daily life as husband and wife. And also, their soon-to-be-born, beautiful child in the future.

He was keen to write a fresh chapter in the history of the Etman family, along with their offspring.

Kyle cherished the look of cautious eagerness that graced her face when he talked about that dream. He was ecstatic to see those hopes and dreams were on the cusp of becoming a reality.

It was a rather funny and sentimental thought. But he believed it was the reason why he was born into this world—to make her expectation come true.

“How many children do you want to have?” Kyle asked her, “I wish I had a daughter and a son.”

“Well… maybe five?” she answered.

‘Fi…Five?’ Kyle stood gaping. The number she said was in contrast to her timid attitude.

“We won’t be lonely if we have so many kids,” Leyla chuckled and continued, “We can depend on one another. I think it would be great if the house were full of people who resembled one another.”

For some reason, Kyle felt bitter when he saw Leyla say those things with a radiant look. He could tell by gazing at Leyla’s bittersweet smile how long she had lived in loneliness.

“Five… okay, Leyla. I’ll do my best!”

“Huh?”

Leyla’s eyes grew round at Kyle’s loud pledge. They looked at each other with blank expressions for a spilt second, then their cheeks blushed nearly at the exact moment.

“Hey, that’s not what I meant!”

Kyle took a step back, he had a redder complexion than hers.

“I’m not thinking only about that.”

“Neither am I!” Leyla snapped back, ashamed by his words.

The two quickly released their grip and walked a step apart, not daring to make eye contact. Kyle gave Leyla a sideways look, and the peals of laughter he’d been holding in eventually burst from deep within.

“By the way, Leyla, did you feel ashamed after deciding to have five children?”

Gasp. Leyla turned away. Her brows knitted.

“You didn’t think a stork would give you five babies, did you? Our Miss Lewellin, who is well-versed in all subjects except geometry.”

Leyla kept walking, a scowl on her face, disregarding his mischievous teasing. Kyle’s jolly laughter grew louder along with the clacking of her heeled shoes.

“Oh wait for me, Mrs Etman!”

His jovial cry reverberated across the campus on a sunny spring day.

Leyla started to run. Her braided ponytail on the back of her head swung in rhythm with her stomping shoes on the asphalt.

Kyle was smitten with the look of her back. Her statuette gave him the feeling of returning to that pleasant dream once again.

And he didn’t want to ever wake up.

Forever.


Chapter 31




The Kind Yet Heartless Man







‘Was it because the coin missed?’

That was the very first thing she thought of at the news about Duke Herhardt’s homecoming.

The Duke, who had announced the postponement of his service in the military post by another year, would return home and reside at the Arvis estate for good after settling all of his business affairs in the capital.

The grand Duchess wished for her grandson to stay close by her side and take care of the 20,000-hectare Estate they owned. The Duke seemed to take it into account as he couldn’t rule out his grandmother’s request.

Oh, whatever.

Leyla stretched her apron and laced it tightly around her waist. The matter had nothing to do with her, though. She merely lamented that her bouncing gold coin had hindered her wish from coming true.

‘Please don’t let me run into Duke Herhardt again.’

Leyla fervently prayed as she threw the last gold coin he had given her onto the fountain.

Since last summer, after he left Arvis Estate, Matthias hadn’t returned for a single day visit till the end of the year. Leyla thought her prayer had been granted by all means; the peaceful days of her life would last until his military service was over, and she would have already left Arvis by the time he returned home.

Leyla fell into a daze for a moment, but soon, she shook her head and walked out towards the backyard. Besides, her wish would likely come true since she would have already left the Arvis forest by the time the Duke arrived back from his trip.



With a lighter heart, Leyla started caring for the livestock and tended to the garden diligently. The moment her morning routine was winding down, Phoebe, the mountain pigeon, returned from the Etmans’ house, bringing a letter from Kyle that was attached to its ankle.

‘My mom wants to invite you to dinner tonight.’

‘See, Leyla. I was right, huh?’

She could hear Kyle’s voice in the letter.

After seeing her anxiety, Kyle had reassured her a million times that his mother would like her and that she would be accepted in his family.

‘Everything will be fine.’ He soothed her. When the autumn dawned, they would become a campus couple and enjoy their college years together happily, very happily.

“Uncle, I’ll have dinner at Etmans’ house tonight.” Leyla approached Uncle Bill, who had just gotten home from work. “Mrs. Etman invited me.”

“Look, what did I say before,” said Bill in a raspy voice, reiterating the same thing Kyle had said in the letter. “Didn’t I tell you that everything would be all right?”

Looking upon his gleeful face, Leyla also gave a soft smile of her own. Her heart was pounding. She put her faith in his words and was looking forward for tonight’s dinner.



The evening sun had cast long shadows on the ground when Matthias arrived in Arvis manor. The tension didn’t escape the faces of the waiting staff in line when the car transporting him appeared in front of the lobby.

Everything was in the groove. He was welcomed with loving arms with courtesies and was given some joyful smiles from the two Duchesses, who were standing next to him.

Every time he passed in front of the gardener, Matthias tended to lower his gaze. A little girl in neat brown shoes always stood in line next to the gardener’s big feet, ready to greet him whenever he came home. But Leyla Lewellin, who had always been by Bill Remmer’s side, would no longer be here after the summer season ended.

Matthias walked past the gardener without even bothering to look at him. His sight turned back towards the front entrance, where he could see the stairwell in the lobby leading to the manor’s main hall.

“Oh my, that bird also returned with you.”




Elysee von Herhardt chuckled the moment she gazed upon the gilded cage that a servant was holding. Inside the cage, there was a little canary that Matthias had brought with him when he departed the Estate last summer.


“What a very strange thing. How could Matthias, who has never even had a pet dog, take care of a bird?”

“If you have a hobby with birds, why don’t you expand the greenhouse a bit more and bring in different kinds of birds?” suggested Norma with a smile on her face.

“It’s fine, Grandma.” Matthias grinned as he said. “One is enough.”

After giving a prudent answer, Matthias entered the mansion.

Before going up the stairwell, Matthias reared his head and gazed at the huge chandelier for a long, thoughtful moment. Right above it, the insignia of the Herhardt family was emblazoned on its distantly high ceiling.

He was born under that crest. He lived beneath that crest, and he would close his eyes under that crest.

It was a natural cycle—just as breathing in, just as easy as he was living.

Matthias lowered his gaze and started ascending a flight of steps.



“If he had retired this year, why would he still want to put it off another year?”

Countess Brandt grumbled beneath her breath. Her voice was laced with annoyance that she couldn’t keep hidden.

The reason she had agreed in the first place to extend her daughter’s engagement period for another year was solely out of respect for Duke Herhard’s choice to serve the Empire. Nonetheless, if she had known what was going to happen, she would have insisted on having the wedding by the end of this summer, no matter what.

“I had no idea Matthias was such a fickle guy.”

“Our wedding has been postponed,” Claudine passively said, “but I think it would be better if Duke Herhardt returned to the Estate earlier, mother.” Nothing on her face indicated that she was upset.

“You seem so relaxed. This mother of yours is very worried to see her daughter unable to marry this year.”

“Is there any reason to be concerned? It is better to take the time to properly prepare rather than have a wedding that is less than perfect due to hastiness.”

“One year is a long period of time, Claudine. How do you know what might happen within a year?”

“Think about last year, mother. A year passed in a flash—and peacefully. We just have to wait one more year. Wedding preparations will also be easier if Duke Herhardt stays on the estate.”

“Claudine, men aren’t to be trusted, and engagement isn’t a binding commitment like marriage.”

“He’s Matthias von Herhardt, mother.” With a nonchalant face, Claudine added “He is Duke Herhardt, a man who will never love anyone but himself.”

Claudine might as well have been feeling uneasy about her wedding if she hadn’t heard the news that Leyla and the doctor’s son were getting married. But now that Leyla Lewellin was a fly in the ointment no longer, her mother’s worries were nothing more than the elderly’s fuddy-duddy fears.

“For him, this engagement is also a symbol of pride for the Herhardts. There’s no one who can get in the way.”

Claudine spoke her thoughts with confidence as she cut and neatened the embroidery thread.

The kind yet heartless man.

Since childhood, that’s how Matthias was nicknamed. While her other cousins often made fun of Claudine with their snarky jokes, only Matthias remained polite and kind to her. Whereas, his good samaritan attitude also built a barrier between them and made him a difficult man to attract.

‘Does he even have feelings?’

Claudine sometimes wondered about it.

It was difficult for her to envision Matthias being angry, sad, or happy.

From the beginning of his life to this day, he seemed to look down on the world with his arrogant yet elegant smile. And this Matthias von Herhardt was something Claudine wanted to own.

“I should visit Arvis sometime next week.”

Claudine rose from the sofa, her mood became a bit lighter.

“I want to meet Duke Herhardt and congratulate my friend who is getting married soon. It’s for both of these reasons.”

“A friend who’s getting married? Oh my goodness. By ‘friend’ did you mean the gardener’s orphan?”

Countess Brandt gave a fretful moue. Claudine smiled without a hitch to her mother and said,

“Leyla is my friend. Of course, I have to give my old friend a wedding present.”



Leyla wrapped herself in a white dress she had bought in Ratz after so much consideration when she travelled there to take the exam. Her golden hair was nicely braided, and she adorned the end of her hair with her favourite ribbon.


This was not her first visit to the Etman household, but Leyla felt uneasy for some reason. Her insides felt queasy as if this was her first.

The thought of her upcoming marriage to Kyle exacerbated her nerves, and the fact that the person who personally invited her was Kyle’s mother further added to her concerns.

“Uncle, how do I look?”

Leyla walked out of her room. She stood in front of Bill and asked with a solemn expression. Bill, who was mellowing out by the opened window with his mouth smoking his cigarette, looked at Leyla and grinned widely.

“Wooho… Since you’re going to get married soon, it seems you’re going all-out in dressing up unlike before.”

“It’s not like that, I’m just really nervous about meeting Mrs. Etman.”

“Goodness me! Haven’t you already met Mrs. Etman once or twice before?”

“But today is a special event.”

“There’s nothing to worry about. It won’t be a problem.” Bill gave a gentle smile as he stubbed out his cigarette and got up from his seat. “You just have to be yourself, Leyla. That’s enough.”

Bill gently patted Leyla’s shoulder. His smiling face felt warm, so did his hand.

Leyla smiled. She willingly nodded, even though she knew it was simply his subjective point of view. After a whole day of fretting, she was finally able to relax a little bit. Kyle arrived in the cottage at that moment.

“Kyle, I….”

“Perfect.”

Kyle lauded her before Leyla could raise a question.

“Just be yourself.” He cracked a smile. His gaze was warm, identical to Uncle Bill’s. “That’s all you need, Leyla.” Kyle reassured her.

“Well. Someone else had said precisely the same thing as you did.” Leyla giggled as she witnessed two people with the same expression and said say very similar the exact same things.

“What? Who? What kind of person?”

“Don’t talk crap and get going, you little prick.” Bill smacked Kyle on the back with all his might. Kyle staggered back and turned around, his face scrunched up.

“But, uncle, some jerk is hitting on her….”

“That jerk is me!”

“So… uh, what!?”

“You spoiled gluttonous brat, you! I’ll seriously consider whether or not I can entrust Leyla to you.”

Contrary to his scathing tone, Bill Remmer kindly patted Kyle on the shoulder. Leyla stood aside and quietly watched the pair’s bickering.

Her two most beloved people in the world. Her two precious people. Two people she wanted to protect by all means.

Her heart began to warm, a smile blossomed on her face. Uncle Bill and Kyle were her everything, and Leyla couldn’t fathom living her life without those two by her side.

That’s why Leyla decided to get married after a long shilly-shallying.

As Kyle proposed to her and she turned him down, the strain in their relationship grew bigger. If she couldn’t accept his feelings, it would be right for her to walk away. Kyle tried hard to narrow the distance between them, but since he had already revealed his feelings, they were faced with two choices.

Get married or become strangers.

It would crush her innermost hope for them to stick as dear friends forever if they grew up by keeping their distance from one another.

Leyla could feel her heart breaking every time she thought of them, from the fall through the winter, and into the spring living as strangers.

For Leyla, the marriage and the future that Kyle had proffered to her, was a vague picture in the distance. She was cowed into indulging her avarice to a line that was beyond her reach. But if it was the only way for her not to lose Kyle,

Leyla wanted to be brave.

It was late spring; after Duke Herhardt had insulted her until she cried her eyes out, Leyla finally made up her mind. On that night, she dumped his gold coins into a fountain because she didn’t desire anything he had given to her, then she saw Kyle’s face, who had come searching for her soon after that.

The moment she met Kyle, all of the sadness and grief in her heart were wholly forgotten. He stood out like a beacon of light amidst a dark forest. Like the warm light from Uncle Bill’s cottage, which always awaited her return, and belighted her voyage through the dark forest trail. That glint of light became her solace and comforted all of her wounds that the world beyond the forest had given to her.

Wontedly, Kyle and Bill’s futile argument ended with a jolly laugh. With a lingering peal of a smile still hardened on his face, Kyle walked up to her.

“Let’s go, Leyla.”

Kyle reached out his hand to her. With some reluctance, Leyla grabbed the tip of his. Kyle held his gaze at her for a long moment. He grinned and then gently took her hand. So intimate and in such a tight hold.

Though the changing of their relationship was still very awkward and embarrassing, Leyla didn’t brush-off his hand.

Because he was Kyle.

The person she didn’t want to lose.


Chapter 32




Happy Days







Mrs. Etman welcomed her guests with a table loaded with delectable dishes and lavishly garnished with exquisite decorations. Leyla, as well as Dr. Etman and Kyle, were dazed by the warm hospitality presented by the Lady of the House, which was something above their expectation.

“Thank you for the invitation, Mrs. Etman.”

Leyla delivered a greeting which she had rehearsed dozens of times during the day and politely handed over the gift she had prepared: a bouquet of roses and pickled peaches parcelled nicely in a beautiful mason jar.

“Thank you.”

Mrs. Etman gladly accepted the gift. As a heave of sigh washed over her, Leyla’s face lit up and Kyle’s lips twitched like a grin. Mrs. Etman’s eyes grew icily cold as she watched her son, yet she deftly set her expression like a Mother who was full of tenderness.

Dr. Etman alluded that they’d tie the knot after the College’s enrollment announcement was released. However, since Kyle and Leyla were both unquestionably accepted, it could be said that their marriage had been officially confirmed.

‘My son is together with such a girl.’

Mrs Etman slowly clenched her hand beneath the table. She was disenchanted, yet she had stalled voicing her disapproval. She clearly knew what kind of people her son and husband were. Her intransigent opposition had only served to backfire back on her in the end.

“Eat a lot, Leyla.” Mrs. Etman’s expression softened after taking a deep breath. “I specially prepared the food to your taste.” She looked at Leyla with a more pleasant countenance.

Leyla blinked her eyes in surprise and smiled back at Mrs Etman, though she felt strange slits of fury flickered on her beautiful face.

‘Bitch, you must have seduced my son with that face and smile.’

Mrs. Etman quickly snatched a glass of water from the table. She could feel the slightest drip of ice-cold water drained down her esophagus.



“Thank you very much, Ma’am.” Dimples appeared on Leyla’s cheeks as she said, expressing her heartfelt gratitude.

‘Leyla was a good girl, a really nice girl. ‘

Mrs. Etman acknowledged that fact. And it was for that reason, above all others, why she never wanted Leyla to become her daughter-in-law.

It’s probably a lot better if she was a troublesome child. That way, she could loathe her for the proper reason instead of hating her because she was poor.. At the very least, she wouldn’t be ashamed of herself for being such an terrible mother.

But now,

She hated everything about Leyla Lewellin.

She detested all of her: her kindness, her brilliance, and her impoverishment.

“Leyla, do you know? Dr. Lorentz, a professor at Ratz University is an avian biologist?”

Dr. Etman abruptly changed the topic after witnessing his wife’s unpleasant expression.

“Once you enter, be sure to take Dr. Lorentz’s classes. It would be very beneficial to you if you can get direct lessons from an expert such as him.”

“Dear, you’re talking as if Leyla has already entered college.”

Mrs. Etman, who had been quietly watching Leyla for some time, sprang into reaction with an unexpected retort. Dr. Etman and Kyle both had their eyes on her. Their expressions were befuddled.

“There’s no way she’ll fail, dear.”

“Right, Mother, there’s no way Leyla will fail.”

They were ready to debate her with identical facial expressions and tone of speech. Both of her husband and son were like two peas in the pod whenever they paid attention to Leyla.



Mrs. Etman was compelled to swallow back the words that had been pushed to her throat. “…..That’s

true…… Leyla is such a smart girl.” She curved the corners of her lips upwards with slight coercion.

Sitting across from her, Leyla was a little embarrassed and slightly blushed at her praise.


Whenever Leyla’s past story at Lovita came up, Bill Remmer always kept his lips shut. Everyone at Arvis manor knew about Leyla: she had lost her parents overnight and had travelled to Berg after moving from one relative’s household to another.

And Linda Etman detested this truth of Leyla Lewellin beyond all else. A child with no proper relatives to care for and nurture her. A child who had travelled across the border, and was repeatedly kicked out. She was on the verge of getting chills whenever thinking about how lousy her foundation for starting a family would be.

‘Wouldn’t she be getting something too big?’

Even if Leyla came from a ordinary well-off family, she would still hinder that girl from being together with her son. Linda Etman believed: a girl who grew up without a good background won’t become an excellent spouse. Moreover, seeing a ‘skint’ girl like her who was so eager to study at College, was very irksome to see.

Despite her lesser means, watching how Leyla had lofty ambitions that were out of her league, and considering her poor circumstances led Linda Etman to label her as a greedy person. She thought for sure: Kyle would never be able to live happily if such a child would become his wife.

‘That’s why I have to stop it.’

Mrs. Etman tightened her grip under the table.

She had to stop this marriage by all means possible.



Leyla Lewellin’s acceptance note to university arrived in the mail from the very same postman who had delivered little Leyla to Arvis in the past.

Bill Remmer, who received the letter while Leyla was out and in the forest, stood still for a long while.

“Mr. Remmer?”

The Mailman glanced at him with a worried face after Bill didn’t give a response after he said his congratulations. His expression that was carefree a moment ago, suddenly became a blazing bright crimson.

“Are you okay, Mr. Remmer?”

“…Well, there’s nothing to fuss about.” Bill rubbed his eyes with his rough hand. “I was just thinking for a moment.”

He raised his voice as he spoke. His eyes glistened. The postman, who had known the gardener of Arvis was ‘The bruiser with a soft center’, nodded quietly, pretending not to notice a tear which was forming on the corner of his eyes.


“Anyway, congratulations. I’m thrilled to know that Leyla is going to be a student at the best university in the Empire.”

After congratulating Bill for a second time, the postman departed from the cottage.

Bill glided back to the terrace holding the acceptance letter and sat on his chair. He reread the letter many times and softly stroked the letter typing with his fingers. After taking a deep breath, his face gradually returned to normal, which was getting redder with compassion. That was when Leyla came back.

“Uncle!”

Leyla waved her arms up in the air while running as she saw Bill sitting on the terrace. Her old leather bag that was draped over her shoulder swung slightly in rhythm with her running steps.

“That damned bag.”

Bill chortled as he hissed faintly. It was his tool bag that he had given to her when she first arrived at Arvis over the summer. Leyla had a few nicer bags than that one, but still, she relied on that old, battered bag every time she went for a stroll in the forest.

“When are you going to throw away that trash bag?”

Bill began to ask Leyla, who was sitting next to him.

“Throw it?” She yapped. “Why?! It’s still usable.”

“Now, please throw that bag into the trash! That grody thing could bring you bad luck!”

“I’ll use it a little more.” Leyla giggled softly as her finger fiddled with the tattered leather bag strap. “I’m feeling a little empty without it.”

‘Well, I know it sounds like a fool’s talk. But….’

She murmured. Without saying a word, Bill quietly held out the letter in front of her eyes.

“Uncle, what’s this?”

“You’ll know when you read it.”

Leyla blinked at the letter with her eye-popping. Bill thought that she would burst out into cheers of joy, but Leyla’s face just grew more composed as she continued reading the letter of acceptance.

“…Leyla?”

Bill spoke first, and he did so with some trepidation after he saw her overly muted reaction. Only then did Leyla lift her head and turned to face him. A faint smile appeared on her lips.

‘It would be nice if you were jolly like a little girl in a moment like this.’

Bill scratched the back of his neck at her silent slant, which was mature enough to make him feel ill at ease. Leyla momentarily smirked at him, who was standing still for a brief moment.

Suddenly, she hugged him tightly.

“Hey, it’s stuffy!”

At odds with his prickly words, Bill tepidly patted her back.

“Thank you.” Leyla raised her head and whispered in a hushed tone. “Thank you so much, Uncle.”

With every glance he gave her, Leyla’s eyes welled up with tears and her lips melted into a wide grin.

“It’s all thanks to you.”

“You’re saying nonsense.”

Bill gulped for air and started counting in his head. He reflected on the chores he needed to do one by one before the sunset, but the heat in his eyes showed no signs of abating.

Now Bill was sure: ‘This little child must have brought her tear bag from Lovita.’

“You were the one who studied hard and earned a passing grade on the exam. What did I do, huh?”

“No. No, Uncle.” Leyla shook her head and reached out to take Bill’s hand in hers. Her tiny hands had a tough time holding his.

“I…”

She stuttered. The hand she was grasping had flowed a warm feeling that was akin to the tepidness she had after sipping a shot of vodka.

“Uncle, if it weren’t for you, I’d have been….”

On this happy day, Leyla looked like she’s about to cry. Bill didn’t like it, and he dreaded the sight of her sobbing face the most. He didn’t want to witness Leyla’s tears, even if they were tears of happiness.

His fondness for this child was far greater beyond all the love and care he had devoted to the flowers and trees that he had planted throughout his life. Bill was perplexed knowing he cherished this child more than his precious flowers and trees.

It just happened naturally before he knew it and he was more than happy to accept that fact.

“Shall we go to the Capital together next weekend?” asked Bill in a cheerful tone after coughing a little bit to calm his emotions.

“Both of us?” Leyla’s pupils dilated. “Going to the Ratz?” it left her bewildered.


“I have to pay your tuition fee since you’ve been accepted into college. Besides, I haven’t brought you to any place yet, so let’s go sightseeing around the capital city.”

“Really?” Leyla’s tear-stained face glowed with zest. “Uncle, are you serious? We’re going on a vacation together?”

“What vacation?” He jested. “I’m just going to pay your tuition.”

“Ah, whatever it is. All that matters is we’re going together.”

A tinge of regret lingered in his eyes when he looked at Leyla, who was such a happy camper at the moment.

He wanted to take her for a walk to a nearby place, show her something interesting, and buy something delicious to eat.

But why?

Bill questioned himself, lamenting. Why did all of these thoughts occur to him only now? As the day when he would have to let her go from, his arms drew nearer?

“That’s a lot of money, even though the two of you are going to get married, I’m still worried about letting you go alone with Kyle carrying that much money, so I can’t help it, but…..”

The babbling Bill eventually hooted with laughter. Leyla flung herself once again onto his hug.

“Look, Leyla.” Bill gave her a lovely smile. “ Am I right?” He gently combed her hair with his fingers. “Didn’t you say you’ll be a good adult?”

In the end, he couldn’t put it into words, and Bill was at a loss for what to say as well, so he just stroked Leyla’s head again, over and over again.

Bill Remmer needed to count more than ever before to keep his ugly crying face on hold.



Chapter 33




Eden of Arvis







Remmer’s Leyla had been accepted at Ratz University.

Within a few moments, the news spread among the people in the Arvis manor. Since it had been widely expected, nobody was surprised to hear that Dr. Etman’s lone son had been accepted into a prestigious medical school with outstanding grades.

It was Leyla who topped the talk. In these past few days, she had become the talk of the town wherever people gathered. Even the Duke’s greenhouse listened regarding this kind of talk.

“I just can’t believe it,” Norma gasped. “Bill Remmer made a great choice by sending an orphan, and moreover, a girl, to a College.”

Norma Catharina von Herhardt, who wouldn’t usually say anything on the street about low-income youngsters, tuned in on today’s chatter about Leyla with great interest, just like others.

“I supposed she was born under a lucky star.” Elysee von Herhardt added a pinch of salt to the table talk. “She met her daddy-long-legs and was even now engaged to Dr. Etman’s son.”

Claudine was quietly sipping her tea next to the Duchess, nodding graciously in accordance, then a radiant smirk appeared on her face, “I’m so glad that a poor kid like her has such good luck.”

She praised Leyla more sincerely than she had previously done. As luck would have it, the maid who had gone to pick up the kid on Norma’s orders returned to the greenhouse just in time. She was with Leyla who was neatly dressed.

“Come here and sit down.”

Duchess Norma calmly instructed her to take a seat. Elysee and Claudine both stared at her, their brows slanted, so as Leyla’s.

“There’s nothing wrong with serving this special child a cup of tea, isn’t it?” Norma flashed a smile as she said.


Like many of Herhardt’s, Catharina von Herhardt was noble to the bone to say that the blood coursing through her veins must have had a deep blue tint on it. Hence, everyone was astonished with wonder by her willingness to share a tea table with the orphaned child raised by her gardener.

Ushered by the maid, Leyla sat on her chair, her cheeks flushed with nervousness.

“I’ve heard that getting into Imperial University is very hard, even for the sons of the most illustrious families.”

Duchess Norma opened the conversation first after the maid placed the cup of tea in front of Leyla.

“It was all thanks to Uncle Bill,” Leyla responded, as she politely lowered her gaze.

“Yes. You must not forget the kindness of your benefactor, Bill Remmer.”

“Yes, Ma’am.”

“Are you from Lovita?”

“My mother was from Lovita, but my father was a Berg.”

“Same as me.”

Elysee and Claudine both dilated their eyes simultaneously in response to Norma’s peculiar words that sounded like a veiled innuendo.

People knew Duchess Norma von Herhardt was a Marquise of repute and the sole cousin of Emperor Berg. Her mother was a progeniture of Lovita’s aristocratic line; no one would dare to draw a parallel line between her to an orphan who was raised from a humble background.

“Tell me what you want.”

The abrupt request from the elderly Duchess, who just laid her teacup down, caught Leyla jerking her head up, startled.

“Bill Remmer is my favourite employee.” She stated it quietly, “And you’re a child he raised like his own daughter, so I should give you a congratulatory gift.”



Embarrassment immediately rose up to Leyla’s cheeks. Just in time, she stared at the Duchess; instead of concealing her eyes, the greenhouse received the arrival of another visitor. Claudine spotted him as he neared them and blurted out,

“Duke Herhardt!”

Claudine’s cheery voice got everyone’s attention, and their eyes fled to a distinguished man.


Leyla swiftly turned her head and saw Matthias von Herhardt standing haughtily near the table. Their eyes met, faces frowned on one another for a host of reasons. The tension persisted between them until Leyla averted her gaze from him.

“This child had been successfully accepted into Ratz University. So we took her out for tea together because it was something to celebrate,” Elysee explained in a voice laced with hilarity.

After a brief nod, Matthias sat down on a chair beside Claudine, which happened to be the seat facing Leyla.

“You’re back early today.” Claudine gave a warm welcome to her fiancé.

Matthias always departed the mansion right after the clock hit the dawn of the day and would always return late at night after he had taken charge of the family’s business for good. It had already been a week since Claudine stayed at Arvis, but this was the first time she had seen Matthias come home before gloam.

“The meeting came to a close earlier than planned, My Lady.”

“What a relief. I was worried you might be overdoing it these days.”

“Claudine’s right, Matthias,” Elysee added. “Take your time and avoid rushing. If you end up ruining your health, it would be a real concern.”

Following that, the conversation drifted to Matthias’s current situation, with the family-run business and Leyla Lewellin’s presence seemed to have been wiped out in a blink of an eye.

But thanks to it, Leyla had a moment to catch her breath and take a sip of her already cooled tea. She wished she could escape this unpleasant situation, but she knew it would be rude to do so in front of the two Duchesses who were keeping a keen eye on her every move.

Leyla put her teacup down onto the saucer, cautious not to create any noise within her gestures.

When she elevated her sight, she flinched slightly, and her back banged against the chair.

Matthias sat quietly between his chattering fiancée and his mother; his callous eyes fixed on her in the same gaze he had on the day he ruthlessly trampled her heart and abandoned her behind.

Leyla, who was trying to grab the teacup again, hurriedly slid her hands beneath the table. Matthias was seen speaking to Claudine for a while before turning his attention to his Mother and then back to her.

She lowered her head, daring not to look at him in the eyes, but Leyla could still feel his menacing glare piercing through her body.

That gaze served as a constant reminder of her last summer’s memories. In the face of Claudine, those memories grew even more humiliating, and Leyla had enough of it. Although the Duke committed wrongdoings, it was always her who felt guilty.

“So, have you thought about what you want?”

Norma’s questions brought the table’s spotlight back to Leyla Lewellin.

Leyla clenched her jaw hearing Norma and bit her lip involuntarily as she witnessed Matthias’ blue eyes remain glued on her. She immediately switched her look to Norma, attempting to conceal her reddened face.

“You’ve already given me a wonderful gift, Ma’am. That was more than enough.”

“You already got it?”

“Yes. Just allowing me to stay here in Arvis, in Uncle Bill’s cottage, is already a gift I cannot repay. It was the biggest and most precious gift I’ve ever received and I’ll be forever grateful for it my whole life.”

“We just granted Bill Remmer’s request.”

“That permission was a gift that changed my life,” said Leyla, her lips curved in a faint smile. “I am also very grateful to you, Ma’am,” she also didn’t forget to express her polite gratitude towards Elysee.”…. Also to the Duke and Lady Claudine.”

Somehow, Leyla was more than delighted to express her gratitude to everyone, including those she disliked, rather than asking for permission to leave the place.

“I won’t forget the kindness you have given me, even when the time comes for me to leave Arvis.” With a deep bow, she took Norma’s question into appreciation.

Duchess Norma scrutinized her thoroughly before giving a slight nod. It would be impolite to turn down Herhardt’s favour; nevertheless, Leyla’s courteous attitude seemed to astound her, which she found to be quite commendable for a plebeian young girl.

“Have you already said goodbye?”

Claudine asked sadly.

“You must be sad, Leyla.” She kept a silent gaze on her and offered something to her, “I understand how you feel, but I still want to give you a present. Oh, how about if I pay for your college tuition?”

“No, Miss. The kindness you have shown me has already made me feel very grateful.”

Leyla looked at Claudine; a smile tightened on her face.

“Uncle Bill has already saved the tuition money aside. He wants to cover the cost of my first semester of college.”

“Really? I’ll have to think of something else to give as a present then,” she declared, “I can’t let my old friend leave empty-handed who had been accepted into College and is about to marry. . Isn’t that right,


Duke Herhardt?” Claudine said. Her lips curving into a brilliant grin, and her voice calling his name sounded as sweet as a honey.

Matthias took a moment glancing at Leyla before he gently gestured his head in agreement with his fiancée.

Leyla was eventually allowed to leave that unsettling tea table after many more formal talks and niceties.

She was standing with her back to the Herhardt family at the time when her eyes were drawn to the scenic view of the greenhouse.

Eden of Arvis.

That’s what everyone called it.

The opulent greenhouse, where people say lavished grandiose praises on one another, left her feeling uneasy and out of breath.

The stifling feeling that engulfed her was analogous to the one she had when she saw lovely crippled winged bird or mixed flowers of colours, its scents stinging her nose. From the gurgling water that was flowing from the marble fountain to the sunshine that was cast in through the surrounding glass windows, the whole nine yards echoed that sentiment precisely.

Leyla strode out of the greenhouse without giving a second glance behind. Only when she clapped her eyes on the glimmer of light outside and smelt the wind blowing over her body did she expel her sigh.

Long shadows trailed her footsteps beneath the twilight gloom as she walked into the heart of the forest.



“Sister, do you know what you are talking about?”

Daniel Rayner was stunned and therefore asked in disbelief. The crepuscular light cascading in through the uncurtained window blinded him and his cousin, Linda Etman, who sat calmly opposite from him.

“Sister!”

“Tone down your voice, Daniel!”

Mrs. Etman sternly chastised him as she cast a quick peek through the closed door. Daniel heaved in shock.

Daniel Rayner, who had just regained his business’s impetus after the failure of his overseas mining venture, had frequently sought help from Linda Etman, his cousin’s-sister and his wealthiest relative.


She, who had consistently rebuffed his appeals graciously yet heartlessly, this time came to visit him first.

It went without saying that the promised help won’t be returned back. However, Daniel’s excitement for taking her helping hand soon turned to hesitation upon hearing Mrs. Etman’s improper words.

“It’s stealing, Sister. How….”

“No.” Mrs. Etman abruptly cut-off his words and narrowed her eyes onto crinkled slits. “It’s just a matter of hiding it for a while and returning it.”

“But…”

“Don’t you care about Kyle too?”

“I do.”

“And you, too, need my help,” Mrs. Etman said as she lifted her hand from her lap and caressed her heated temple. As foreseen, Daniel Rayner was unable to counter and could only bend his head in shame.

“I’m going to keep the money for a while and return it at the right time”, she reasoned. “If you can do that simple task, you will be able to safeguard your family, and I will be able to protect my son.”

Mrs. Etman straightened her sitting posture and looked at Daniel Rayner with a satisfied expression on her face.

“I don’t think this is a bad deal. What do you think?”


Chapter 34




An Excuse for Breaking Her Heart







Like the light of the dusk, a warm smile tinged on his face the minute he found Leyla strolling down the forestry trail.

“Leyla!”

Kyle yelled her name aloud. Leyla, who was walking with her gaze down staring at the ground, promptly lifted her head in eyes widened.

Kyle couldn’t keep the grin off his face from adoring that moment. The moment Leyla quickened her stride whenever she got a hold of his presence was always very adorable.

Leyla flashed a beaming smile as she neared closer to him.

“When did you get here?”

“I went to your cottage a while ago and they told me that you had been summoned to the Duke’s manor, so I was on my way to save you.”

“Save me?”

“Isn’t it obvious why Lady Brandt called you?”

“Not today,” said Leyla as she took a step forward. Kyle trailed behind, his stride was perfectly timed with her.

“It was Grand Duchess Norma, not Lady Brandt.”



“Grand Duchess? She did?”

“Yeah, she congratulated me on passing the exam and asked if there was anything I wanted as a gift.”

“And what did you say?”

“I said nothing. I just conveyed my gratitude for letting me stay here.”

“Wow, it was so Leyla Lewellin-Esque answer.”

Kyle just smirked at what he had guessed. He gently scooped her hand, and Leyla seemed to be less nervous compared to the past. This small change brought his level of happiness climbed by one or two notches.

They strolled along the familiar road, hand in hand, as they shared stories. It began by their everyday routines, mystery novels published in today’s newspapers, and their meagre summer plans for this year. As always, the intimate atmosphere snippet mingled with their rhythmic footfall, who was walking alongside one another.

Before long, the afternoon sky was broken, and jolted the twilight from its light slumber.

When the nightfall dawned, the sea of trees was soon blanketed in its beauty. Kyle yanked Leyla’s hand and dragged her into the darkness with him.

He leaned her body against the tall tree on the side of the road as she reeled, then stepped in front of her. Everything happened in the blink of an eye, yet Kyle felt as if time had halted still for eternity throughout that moment.

Leyla glanced at him, bewildered.

“Kyle?”

Her voice was trembling a tad as she spoke. Her bonnie pink delicate lips glowed attractively even in the pitch blackness of the nite.

Kyle summoned all his courage and bent his head towards her; his eyes slammed shut. The warm skin soon reached his lips, but he wasn’t pleased with the touch he was getting.

Kyle opened his eyes and laughed out loud. He found out that his lips had kissed Leyla’s hand rather than what he planned.




“I felt weird doing this, Kyle.” Leyla was gazing at him with her blushing face while her other hand was firmly covering her lips.

As Kyle slowly raised his head, once again she spoke,

“It seems like we’re doing something bad if we do this, and I….”

Leyla dropped her gaze quietly, unable to bring herself to finish her words. Her pale, long eyelashes were likewise heading down.

‘Don’t you think this is wrong?’


When Leyla struggled to swallow the words she so wished to talk, Kyle flashed a grin. The hue of his cheeks now had matched hers in colour.

“Hey, Miss Lewellin. An innocent person who doesn’t know how to kiss like you knows what?”

“Huh?”

“Though you were chattering really loudly in the train back then as if you were an expert.”

“What do you mean…Oh, gosh!” Leyla hunched over to look shorter after recalling the day Kyle wanted to leap off a speeding train after she gave him a lecture about the act of reproduction.

“T-that’s….” Leyla’s eyes rolled skyward, and she gulped, finding she lacked the right words to debate

him. “I-I’m also not sure about that…..” she softly whispered.

Her habit of muttering low when she was in a position of disadvantage had remained unaltered since their childhood, to which Kyle let out a faint sigh.

His heartbeat went loose; it was pathetic that he couldn’t kiss the woman he would marry, but Kyle didn’t abhor it either. His deepest wish was to win Leyla’s heart, so he refused to shatter her heart merely because of his fleeting lust.

Softly, Kyle fondled her cheeks, wrapping his hands around them. And then, he kissed her. His heated lips found their way to her forehead. He tried his best not to be greedy anymore, and with that, Kyle had kept his promise.

As he drew in a steadying breath, the pleasing scent littered his lungs.

The sweet scent of roses.

It was the scent of Leyla.



Matthias gingerly walked towards the window on the west side of his bedroom after taking a shower.

His routine went on wontedly. Though he slept off after midnight, he would usually be awake pretty early in the morning. He made his way to the bathroom without losing a beat and took a quick shower before getting ready for the day ahead. It had already evolved into a sort of habit, which he could do effortlessly since it had been ingrained into his bones.

Maybe, even right now.

Like it had become a habit, Matthias looked over the open window. In his garden surrounded by blossoming rose fields, Leyla was there, hard at work.


Perhaps as the day of her departure drew nearer, she had been seen following the gardener much more often recently. The two of them didn’t separate for a single second and kept conversing without the slightest pause.

He once described Leyla Lewellin as a ‘very reticent child’ who seldom opened her padlocked lips in front of Claudine.

“Master, this is Hessen.”

He heard the familiar sound of a door-knocking at the scheduled hour.

“Come on in.”

Standing with his back against the windows, Matthias gave a succinct response. The chiffon drapes were rattling in the wind that wafted through the open stile.

While reading the newspaper Hessen had brought, Matthias overheard the reports about his to-do list for the day. He seemed to be having a laid-back schedule before the luncheon.

“It seems that Arvis was completely filled upon the return of its Master,” Hessen added a word rather than retreating silently as he usually did.

Matthias turned to face him, setting down his teacup on the table. “My grandmother and mother would probably be sad if they heard that.”

“Pardon? Oh no, master. I didn’t mean that ….”

“I know.” A smile crept across Matthias’s lips. “I know what you meant.”

His momentary grin soon melted away, but his eyes stayed riveted on the middle-aged butler calmly; it was placid like a windless night. Hessen hurried off the room, after noticing the look of displeasure in his master’s eyes.

Even after the bedroom door was closed, Matthias continued reading the newspaper while leaning on the windowsill. His bluish eyes, exposed through the loose strands of his hair, sparkled even brighter when the sunlight hit them.

After thoroughly reading the article about Count Klein’s business-someone he would have luncheon with, Matthias put down the newspaper.

He slowly turned his head and saw Leyla walking into the flowerbed near the manor. Her braided hair beneath the straw hat was swinging as she hopped around.

The gardener appeared to be shouting something at her, and Leyla answered excitedly. She burst out laughing. Even with the hat shade obscuring her face, Matthias nonetheless could tell she was laughing with a bubbly voice.

Matthias’ brows furrowed in a scowl. He ruffled his hair and slowly swept it back.

‘Maybe I shouldn’t have come back….”

The thought was running rampant in his head from the second he set foot on the manor ground.

His entire life had been meticulously orchestrated. It was analogous to the stairwell leading to a perfect life and he needed just to tread on it.

But, the stairwell was twisted, which muddled his steps.

And Matthias still couldn’t understand why he had taken a choice that broke his perfect life cycle.

‘No.‘

He may have already broken it long before the night when he tore up the letter extending his military service.

It all began from the day he decided to serve an additional year in the military and postponed his wedding— the day when petty desires blindsided him.

The day when he approached her, after she fell from her bicycle.

Or maybe from the day, he didn’t even remember.

He still desired her…

Matthias was keenly aware of the amplitude of his feelings.

As such, he desired that she would disappear from his life. And he believed that his desire was something right.

His state of shambles was sparked by the inner conflict between his raging emotions and guileless desires. Matthias was unable to provide a definitive answer, but he trusted the passage of time would eventually remedy the matter.

The window was slammed shut, and Matthias changed his outfit into a different one. The trellis shade slid over his face as he strode along the colonnade.

Luring by his discernment, Matthias left the manor alone and followed the forest trail leading to the river. On the underside of the dazzling moonlight, the dancing shadows loomed sombrer.

Matthias stalled for quite a while beneath the thick shadow cast by the surrounding trees to get sucked up onto reverie.

His world had no concept of longing since he had never had a desire of his own. There was a raw feeling that he had discovered when he was unable to get what he desired.

It was a pretty odd frisson that had seized possession of his body.



Daniel Rayner’s countenance grew paler as a ghost as he got closer to the gardener’s cottage. The sun wasn’t yet scorching, but the sweat was already dampening his forehead.

“This is nuts.”

Daniel mumbled frantic words as the cottage’s roof had shown itself from the distance. Mrs. Etman told him that she wanted to temporarily withhold the tuition money the gardener had prepared,—which amounted to nothing more than a stealing act if her discourse was condensed.

‘The noble and graceful Linda Etman beguiled her cousin into committing a sin in the hope of severing the poor girl’s relationship with her son.’

Daniel Rayner heaved a sigh and entered the cottage’s front yard. He took out the handkerchief from his pocket and again wiped his face. His grip on the briefcase stretched tightly.

He also felt sorry for Kyle, who had fallen in love with and chosen to marry a girl who wasn’t a suitable fit for him. Despite their low social standing, everyone expected that the Etman family would have a daughter-in-law who was nonetheless a silk-stocking.

However, it was something Kyle sincerely wanted, and Dr. Etman supported it. He believed that Leyla Lewellin deserved to be their son’s companion. Mrs. Etman, too, acquiesced in her husband’s decision. But, who knows? A hidden dagger may be lurking behind her benign smile.

“Money is your foe.”

After a moment of despondence, and making up his mind, Daniel gallantly strode towards the cottage. Linda Etman said that the cottage would be vacant in the morning. So if Leyla happened to be there, Daniel only needed to reason that he had just returned from Etman’s home and dropped by to congratulate her on getting into college. It wasn’t a suspicious excuse, given that they had met and known each other before.

With cautious, Daniel knocked on the front door. Guilt seeped into his veins as he prayed Leyla was inside, and this scheme would fail. Yet, the thing that greeted him inside the house was all quietness.

Daniel then pulled on the doorknob, and feelings of despair and hopelessness started to blend into one.

As his sister had assured him, the door was unlocked.

‘But, sis, didn’t you mention that even if the money was stolen, someone would undoubtedly help her in paying her tuition? Even Dr. Etman was willing to pay for her tuition fees.’

Linda Etman stiffened her cheeks with a bitter smile when Daniel questioned her in bewilderment.

‘I know my husband better than you.’

‘But why….’

‘The missing tuition was just an excuse.’

‘Huh?’

‘An excuse to break her heart.’

‘….’

A sigh punctuated his silent reply.

Daniel refused to comment and could only blink slowly. He had no interest to become involved in their household matters and this shameful deed just made him feel more guilty and disappointed in himself. But he kept grasping at straws, although it made him feel like a despicable person.

He was only helping his cousin sister to keep the gardener’s money for the time being; Daniel recited that rationalization thought a thousand times in his head before summoning the courage to enter the house.

He completed the job quickly. Daniel breathed a sigh of relief after successfully leaving the cottage with a bag of money. He had rolled the dice and succeeded in his role on the game board. He just has to hand over the scruffy cash to Linda Etman and then go home, content in the knowledge that his laborious efforts to protect his family would be repaid in full in the near future.

Daniel opted for a loop along the riverside to avoid a situation where he might encounter the gardener. Worse luck, his prudent choice landed him in a pickle when he met paths with a young man near the river.

Seeing Daniel Rayner, the young man stopped his sluggish steps. Without even a speck of suspicion or surprise in his face, the young man stood still and regarded him stoically.

‘Is he one of Arvis’s employees?’

It was not long after his momentarily nonchalant attitude soothed him; Daniel’s complexion soon grew like a death warmed up.

Wearing a comfy shirt, that young man didn’t look like a servant as he strolled down the riverside at the busy time to start the day. Moreover, his princely face had all the hallmarks of the familiar figure he recognized.

The very face that was featured countless times in newspapers and which he could only see on many occasions from a distance.

The young owner of a heaven-like place called Arvis.

It was Duke Herhardt.


Chapter 35




What The Thief Stole







From the previous several days, Leyla Lewellin’s name was once again marching briskly through the tongues of Arvis’s workers. This time, with a radically different narrative.

Now, the outline was; ‘The gardener’s cottage had been burgled.’

The news traveled fast around the Manor like a wildfire. The incident was met with people’s doubts. Few believed a thief had the nerve to steal from Duke Herhardt’s estate. Only until they saw a half-dazed Bill Remmer looking for the culprit did they believe the robbery really happened.

Matthias departed the Mansion at the peak of the clamor. The scheduled time had come, and he must leave now to avoid being late for lunch.

He wasn’t the kind to chime in on gossipy talks, sensing something different upon passing the Arvis’s driveway flanked by Platanus trees.

From the opposite side of the road, police officers on horseback were making their way toward the scene. Matthias didn’t even have to make logical assumptions of where they were going since the route would lead them to the Arvis forest.

“They said a thief broke into the gardener’s house.”

The quick-witted aide answered first before Matthias could open his mouth to ask.

“At Bill Remmer’s house?”

“Yes, he was in a big pickle since the funds he’d set aside for his daughter’s College tuition were stolen.”

Thief.

Tuition.



Leyla.

Matthias tilted his head to one side, elatedly repeating those three syllables.


Just as his vehicle exited the Platanus’ shade, he recalled his unpleasant encounter with a strange man on the Schulter River this morning.

The guy introduced himself as Daniel Rayner, Mrs. Etman’s cousin. He was in the neighborhood paying a visit to Etman’s house and stopped by the Estate to congratulate Leyla.

His following few speeches were full of baloney; the investment firm he ran, the mining rights of overseas mines, the stock market, and other business-related matters. But most of them had been spilled and were now just a blot on Matthias’ mind.

Matthias did, nevertheless, remembered a few details about the event. His wristwatch read nine o’clock in the morning when he met a middle-aged man drenched in sweat by the riverside.

It seemed strange for a well-heeled middle-class businessman to bother coming just to congratulate his cousin’s future daughter-in-law at such an early hour.

Matthias, however, didn’t mind it since it was irrelevant to him. He treated the thought as a passing interest until he overheard a ludicrous report of a burglar sneaking into the gardener’s cottage.

But why?

As a civilized business person, sneaking into Arvis to steal the gardener’s money seemed so wrong no matter how dire his financial circumstance was. If he were him, Matthias would instead steal from the house of his wealthy cousin sister.

“Linda Etman.”

He was ready to quit on thinking such a nonsensical idea when he muttered that name without knowing.

After he inserted Linda Etman’s name between that guy and Leyla, Matthias was able to draw a very plausible relationship line between the three of them.

He was just guessing. Yet, it was fascinating, how perfectly fit the jigsaw pieces were in place together.

The car finally reached their stop in front of the Hotel, where his appointment for the luncheon will take place. Before stepping out, Matthias issued a short order to his assistant.



“Evers…”

“Yes, Master.”

“Find out about Daniel Rayner. ASAP.”




The food on the dinner table was left nearly untouched, but it was hard to get up from the table where Bill and Kyle used to dine together.

Leyla, who was well aware of the cause, quietly cleaned the table.

Leaving his half-eaten plate, Bill Remmer went straight to the porch and lit up a cigarette. Since the thief broke in, the mood in their cottage had lost its thrill.

“It’s all right, Leyla.”

Kyle spoke cautiously as he helped her. Leyla’s hardworking hands screeched to a pause, and she lifted her emerald eyes to meet his.

“That thief, I’m sure we can catch him.”

“…”

“Even if we are unable to arrest him, don’t fret about the tuition. My father said that he will also pay yours.”

“Kyle.”

“Don’t try to say no. My father wanted to pay for it from the very beginning. But Uncle Bill was so stubborn that my father caved.” Kyle firmly argued, “To get married means being family, Leyla. It’s not about being in debt, it’s about helping each other… Isn’t that how families should be?”

Leyla lowered her gaze, stood still and finally nodded her head slowly. Her face had grown so gaunt in a matter of days, fueling Kyle with hatred for the robber who had despoiled the woodland’s peacefulness.

“Anyway, just in case, let’s just think about how to catch the thief first.”

Kyle expressed his optimism by saying, even though he knew that the odds of catching the thief were very slim. Leyla gave a sliver smile.

“…Thanks, Kyle.”

“Thank you? What did I do?”

“For everything…”

Once again, a grin crept on her lips, yet her smiling face caused Kyle’s heart to feel heavy.

Kyle clearly remembered the tinge of happiness plastered on Leyla’s face at the idea of coming to the Capital with Uncle Bill. Though Uncle Bill downplayed his trip by claiming it was to pay for her tuition, in truth, it was their very first Family Vacation.


Uncle Bill couldn’t express his elation well, owing to his blunt personality, but undoubtedly, he was thrilled to go on a trip with Leyla, to the point that he teased her, and claimed that she would make an excellent guide for him since this would be her second visit to Ratz.

Places to visit, foods to try, and activities to do together were all must to do. Kyle almost got jealous at Uncle Bill witnessing how endearing was Leyla when she was talking with passion bad giddily with him.

But, the thief ruined everything.

Even if they could get the money back, Leyla and Uncle Bill couldn’t go on a trip with such pleasure, and Kyle couldn’t do anything about it.

Kyle shook off his boundless helplessness as he caught his breath and approached Bill who was sitting suddenly on the porch.

He cast a look at Kyle, who was seated next to him before he resumed heaving the cigar. Depression had been consuming him for the recent days. Inside him, a boiling hatred against the thief was brewing, to the point he devised hundreds of different methods to kill people.

After some silence, he spoke.

“It was all my fault.”

His voice was choking.

“I left a lot of money at home, but didn’t properly lock the door.”

“You weren’t at fault. Who would have thought someone would dare to steal in the Arvis Estate?”

“The payment deadline is next week, and I’m not sure if the thief will be caught before then.”

“Don’t worry about that. If there’s no progress in catching the thief before then, my father said that he would pay Leyla’s tuition as well. I’ve told Leyla about this.”

Kyle’s beaming face drove Bill Remmer’s eyes to sink beyond a deep well.

“I will call the Police tomorrow. I will ask our Officer acquaintance to properly investigate this case.”

“Thank you Kyle, I owe it all to your family.”

“I feel bad to hear that, I haven’t even paid half the price of the food I ate all this time.”

At his witty, Bill could smile a bit, albeit, it was a weak smile.

“Please convey my gratitude to your parents. Ah no, please tell them I will pay them a visit once this matter is settled?” He squeezed Kyle’s shoulder as he said so.


Kyle nodded, dissuading him from saying, ‘You shouldn’t.’ He couldn’t pinpoint why, but he had that unexplained feeling about Bill Remmer.

Kyle also didn’t want to offend him in any way.



The Duke’s manor had two study rooms.

The study on the second floor was a spacious, book-filled space that rivaled the scale of a public library. The second one, that was located at the end of the third floor next to the master bedroom, was less in size.

The library, that was loaded chiefly with history, politics, and economics books, had been used by Duke of Herhardt for generations as a place for receiving guests and conducting business meetings.

Similarly, Duke Matthias von Herhardt did.

Mark Evers, the Duke’s aide, rushed off his feet to the third-floor office. He seemed in demand.

He had been Matthias’s Assistant since he was fully fledged. But never once did the Duke give him orders in such haste like now.

All along, Matthias always presented him the image of an easy-going Master with an innately laid-back attitude. But soon, he realized. Perhaps, that was because nothing existed under the skies of the Berg Empire that could make Duke Herhardt chomp at the bit.* (To be very eager or impatient to do something)

Matthias von Herhardt was a man of influence.

He had it all.

And everything he did went as slick as a whistle.

Mark Evers deemed that his Master’s generosity and kindness stemmed from there.

His calm-wolfish-predator persona led him to feel the air move slowly whenever he was around Matthias. It was Duke Herhardt, whom he was familiar with.

Hence, when Matthias added the term ‘ASAP’ to his order, Mark Evers briefly questioned his ears. After his brain processed hard, he quickly grew impatient and frantically began investigating Daniel Rayner.

“Master, this is Evers.”

Mark Evers galloped to the Duke’s Office on the third floor and knocked on the door. A light source glinted through the door plate, but no answer came from behind the closed jamb.

In other words, it meant ‘Yes.’


He slowly threw open the door and entered the office. Matthias was sloping on the spacious leather sofa. It was a brisk night, yet he was still clad in formal attire from his previous meeting with a business partner.

“It’s about Daniel Rayner, as you asked.”

Mark Evers politely placed the file folder he was carrying on the table.

Matthias dropped his hand from his temple and took the document; he then started flipping the pages. His stance, attentively scanning the papers in his hands, was definitely that of the Duke Herhardt Mark Evers knew.

But the peace was short-lived, and Mark Evers was soon thrust into a direful scene.

Matthias busted a gut as he reached the last page of reading. He had no clue why misfortune was playing such a cruel joke on Daniel Rayner; enticed by foreign mining investment but duped, then detained and forced to give up his house as collateral, he invested a huge sum of money and ended up in Queer Street*. (T/N: In difficulty, typically by being in debt)

What a gut-wrenching loss!

“Daniel Rayner, it seems he has paid off all of his bank debt recently.”

Matthias folded the document in his hand. One of his lips curled upward. His expressionless face was quite gentle, but when he giggled like it was entertaining, he portrayed an image of himself as a cold-hearted person.

“Yes, Master. I’d like to report it to you. He didn’t pay off the whole balance, but it was big enough to save his house from being seized. It happened this afternoon, and therefore, I am unable to include it in the report.”

“The amount of cash must come from Etman.” said Matthias. He continued,

“Linda Etman.”

Matthias spoke the name slowly and gave a Bronx cheer.

“So, what should I … .”

“Good job. Call Hessen.”

Instead of responding, Matthias gave another command.

Although he looked puzzled, Mark Evers followed the call, and he didn’t ask anything.


Chapter 36




So, Then?







“Did you find it, Master?”

Hessen entered the office shortly after Mark Evers’s left.

“What happened to the thief who stole Bill Remmer’s money?” Queried Matthias in an undertone.

“The officers are already on the site, but they are having a difficult time finding evidence and eyewitnesses.”

“Then what about Leyla Lewellin’s tuition money?”

“If the thief is not caught, the Madam and Miss Brandt both said that they want to pay the tuition. And I think Dr. Etman was equally willing as well.”

Nothing in his report seemed surprising.

Jutting his chin, Matthias giggled and put down the file.

Linda Etman was the scheme’s brain.

Matthias fixed on based from information he got about the stupid stranger he had met that morning.

Mrs. Etman seemed to be pleased with his son’s marriage at first glance. But who would have expected that her revealing-true-stripes would be much more toxic and menacing?

Though it’s unrelated to him, but Matthias didn’t want to miss the spectacle of their household’s intriguing drama.



The look on Leyla’s face gave an impression that she was all-knowing. Yet, in reality, she was completely clueless about how the world went about its job.

Should he now refer to her as a fool?

As he took Matthias’ silence as a kind of opposition, Hessen braved to ask,

“Master, if the your will is different….”

“No.” Matthias cut him short. A sneer surfaced on his lips. “I respect grandmother’s wishes. I’m not against it.”

From the time he said it, Matthias was inwardly in no doubt. Linda Etman must have planned the plot wisely without a lapse in her forethought.

The chess piece she had bought with her cash was a kind of a moron, but not with her very precise and bold scheme. She wasn’t naïve enough to be ignorant that many people would gladly pay for Leyla Lewellin’s lost tuition. She must already be aware of it just by looking at her husband.

So what’s her true purpose?

Matthias touched the tip of his chin, having her inside his brain.

Why would Linda Etman create such a fuss when she knew it’s hardly possible to hinder Leyla from going to college with Kyle Etman even if her money was stolen?

Matthias pursed his lips as if faced with an enticing riddle.

“Put someone on Mrs. Etman.”

Announced Matthias as he elegantly crossed his legs. His unamused visage was gentler than the recent command that escaped from him.

“Mrs. Etman? Are we talking about Dr. Etman’s wife, our family doctor?”

“Yes. Linda Etman. The doctor’s wife.”



His plainspoken reply made Hessen stagger somehow.

“There’s just one thing you need to report.”

Matthias rested his tired back against the sofa, a grin was tightly plastered around his face.

He said,

“Does Mrs. Etman meet with Leyla Lewellin separately? And what she talks about if she does.”



The next day at dawn, the police officers returned to Arvis. They visited the Duke’s manor and came upon Matthias by chance when he was descending from the stairway to the grand lobby.

“Good morning, Duke.” A man with silver hair who was the commander of the police officers gallantly greeted him. “Well, I felt ashamed by the theft incident.”

Matthias paused his steps in the middle of the hall, followed by Claudine and his attendants.

Hessen made a subtle approach and said, “They want to ask permission to do another investigation to find eyewitnesses.”

Matthias nodded approvingly, “Sure, as much as you want.”

“Thank you, Duke.”

Upon the salute from their commander in the front row, the young officers at the rear dipped their heads quickly.

Matthias was about to continue his stride when the silver-haired officer lifted his head and suddenly addressed him.

“So, Duke.”

Matthias turned his gaze back, his face had a calm demeanor.

“Did you see anyone suspicious in the estate that morning?”

The hesitant officer posed the question cautiously. Matthias took a second then made his way slowly up to him.

‘I saw it.’

That was a simple answer he should have given, however, Matthias just smiled gracefully instead. He mulled his thoughts regarding Leyla Lewellin for a while;

‘What should I do?’

What if he exposed Mrs. Etman and her early-bankrupt cousin’s conspiracy to thwart her son’s marriage now?

Though the dire situation was on her hand, Linda Etman could still settle things as long as she wouldn’t show her real fangs in front of Leyla. There would likely be some uproar, but Matthias believed that it would be for a brief moment; Dr. Etman and his son would strive to make sure the marriage will happen.

However, Linda Etman was not the kind of person to give up.

‘Then.’

Matthias looked up to the ceiling, and his gaze was drawn to the chandelier’s light.

Leyla Lewellin had gained a once-in-a-lifetime windfall; she would live happily ever after.

Mrs. Etman wouldn’t be able to meddle after the two of them moved into their newlywed residence in Ratz. Kyle Etman would be a devoted husband who loved and cherished his wife. With the spillage of his


love, Leyla would be able to study as much as she wished and perhaps pursue her dream of becoming a scholar.

Matthias raised his gaze to the ornate inscription chiseled on the ceiling, high above the chandelier lampshade.

He surely could help Leyla if he were willing to trouble himself a bit. Before Linda Etman met her, Matthias had the privilege of meeting Kyle’s mother ahead. Linda Etman would likely withdraw quietly without fanfare if she knew Duke Herhardt had discovered all her schemes, and at least to save her face.

It seemed to be a viable way to lessen Leyla’s wounds.

Matthias gave the officer a once-over without a word being spoken. The senior officer stood in the state, interpreting that the Duke’s silence was a reprimand for his rudeness.

Matthias knew what makes Leyla happy And he could save her source of happiness just with a single flick of his fingers.

‘So then…?’

Matthias’s lips were drawn onto another smirk.

‘What pleasure can he gain from helping Leyla in finding her happiness?’

All that remained in him was the dreary roses season in the absence of her, which would be a fissure in his idyllic world.

“…I saw no one.”

Matthias replied curtly, as his eyes narrowed while staring at the officer. The faces of people watching them were a mixture of worry and soon-relief.

“Ah, yes. Well, thanks for your understanding, Duke. My apologies for all of my rudeness.”

Matthias accepted his apologies with a kind nod.

“Have you ever seen a stranger?”

The officer’s cooperative attitude had prompted him to pose the same question to Claudine, who stood behind Matthias.

“No.” Claudine answered without a moment’s pause. “Unfortunately, I don’t have any information that can help your investigation.” She gave Matthias a passing glimpse before turning to look at the officer with a smiling face.

After the case was closed, Matthias then resumed walking. The officers were left to question the employees, and Matthias got into the car which was parked outside the front door.

“You didn’t forget your promise, did you?”

Claudine kindly reminded him about their afternoon appointment; to join Riette for dinner after drinking tea together.

“Of course I remember, My Lady.”

Claudine’s face lit up at Matthias’ answer.

The car sped away from the Estate’s main gate, and soon departed the Estate. Matthias averted his gaze out of the window as the car drove down the road passing through the Doctor’s residence.



Linda Etman wished for an amount of fun beyond her wildest dreams as a reward for her wait-and-see hard work.

She donned a stylish lilac dress. Her face had some light y makeup, and her chosen hat was both classy and modest in style. Her appearance wasn’t supposed to be showy. However, her elegance barely made her appear shabby in her attire today.

Mrs. Etman admired her reflection in the mirror for the second before stepping out of the bedroom.

Today she chose to walk rather than take the carriage.

The place she was going to wasn’t a crowded one. She would go unnoticed from all eyes, so she purposely cherry-picked a location distant from the cottage as she needed a quiet place to meet Leyla.

Mrs. Etman was a million miles away as she waited for the carriage at the stop. She had started everything, and with no way to turn back, she was left with no choice but to go ahead.

For her son, Kyle.

The carriage came shortly when she sought to gather her wits. Mrs. Etman climbed into the carriage, and from her mouth came out a slight sigh within her breath.

She was willing to go to any length for Kyle even if she were to become a villainess.



The tea shop that Mrs. Etman told was located a couple of miles away from the downtown area. Leyla arrived earlier than their appointment time, so she sat at the table near the sunny window, waiting for Mrs. Etman’s arrival.

Rows of brick houses draped in ivy were lined the opposite side of the narrow road, it was barely wide enough for a wagon to pass. Stores with rustic and plain signage padded the left and right sides of the alley.


Likewise, the tea shop. The fading paint, worn furniture, and antique windows, as well as the tea-stained tablecloths, to name a few things. It was a place that didn’t seem to be to Mrs. Etman’s liking.

‘Why did she choose this place?’

Leyla decided not to be biased despite her cryptic feelings. The more she thought about it, the more anxious she became. She was averse to adding more to her already overburdened mind’s about the thievery.

So, Leyla didn’t want to continue assuming the worst that may happen. Mrs. Etman may need a private talk with her in a less crowded place. There was undoubtedly plenty of things to discuss, and…

Layla’s thoughts that were trapped by the paralysis of analysis, were shortly disturbed by the clatter of a chime. She sprang to her feet, thinking it was Mrs. Etman who was coming. Instead, a young man walked into the shop. He was dressed conservatively in a suit complete with a fedora hat. He took a seat at a corner table and then opened a newspaper.

Leyla slumped on her chair, her eyes were fixed on the tea stains on the tablecloth.

She went to the police station today, but the case made no significant progress thus far. The lack of witnesses and evidence made it difficult for them to catch the thief. A policeman who took pity on her kindly advised; it’s better not to cling to a shaky hope and find someone else to lend her money urgently.

‘Should I?’

Dr. Etman, together with Duchess Norma and Lady Claudine, said that they would instead pay for her tuition. This morning, Madam Mona also visited her. She sweetly consoled Leyla and Bill by telling them if the thief wasn’t caught, Arvis’s workers had committed to fundraising for her college.

Their kindness weighed heavily on her heart.

When her deep sorrow was expressing itself through a sigh, the bell sounded again. Leyla jumped up from her chair reflexively and turned around.

“Hello, Mrs. Etman.”

Leyla faintly smiled and bowed her head. The real Mrs. Etman was now standing in front of the opened door.


Chapter 37




I Really Hate You







Mrs. Etman froze and glared at Leyla before walking to the chair and sitting on it. She straightened her posture and put her hat on the other chair.

Different nuances presented by Mrs. Etman when she saw her today left Leyla feeling uneasy.

“You’ve probably just returned from the police station.” Mrs. Etman spoke first, “How’s the investigation going on?”

“They haven’t found any clues yet,” Leyla said. “But it’s not over yet, so I don’t want to give up.”

“Well, Leyla. I don’t think it is a wise choice.”

“Pardon?”

Taken aback, Leyla asked once again when the tea she had ordered came. An awkward silence prevailed between the two until the waiter left after carelessly dropping the cup on the table.

“May I ask what you mean, Ma’am?”

Leyla breached the stillness first.

“Your money, I have it.”

Mrs. Etman uttered those without a trace of guilt; her sight dipped to the clouded boiling steam of the teacup.

Leyla’s face was soon obscured by fluster. The words she had clearly heard sounded just like a delusion.



Mrs. Etman lifted her gaze to Leyla and again firmly said, “I was the one who stole your tuition.”

“No, that can’t be. How could someone like you do that?”

Her stiff lips tried to smile. Leyla was unable to understand how Mrs. Ethman could make such a bad joke. Yet, Mrs. Etman’s eyes were chilling.

“I hid it. I knew it was wrong, but I wanted to prevent you from going to college with Kyle.”

“No, that can’t be-….”

“Yes, it’s stealing—a pathetic and cruel theft. Nevertheless I did it. I want to keep you away from Kyle.”

Leyla’s mind went completely blank. The gruesomely obvious truth said by Mrs. Etman jolted her awake, and she decided that she could no longer keep on living in denial.

“Leyla, I hate you.”

Mrs. Etman stared at Leyla. Her disappointment and fatigue were epitomized in her greyish eyes.

“I really hate you to the point that I believe it would be better for me to be a criminal than to accept you as Kyle’s wife.”

“M-Mrs. Etman…”

“I thought you were a good girl who knew her place. I never thought that you were trying to use Kyle as a launching pad for your greed.”

“What do you mean, Ma’am?” Leyla fiercely shook her head. “No, I’m not like that. How could I think like that about Kyle? I-I could never…”

She got the shock of her life and failed to notice her hands trembling at the edge of the table as well as her entire body starting to shudder.

“Are you friends with Kyle for this purpose? Using Kyle to go to college and marrying Kyle to improve your humble status in life?”



Mrs. Etman chastised and cornered the wordless Leyla even more harshly. Though she knew that Leyla’s feelings for Kyle stayed within the bounds of brotherhood or friendship in the past.

Rather it was her son, Kyle, who fell head over heels in love with her, instead of Leyla. Leyla would not be caught up in this presumptuous affair if it weren’t for her bumbling son. It was always this truth that wounded her self-esteem, and now it became the reason why she loathed Leyla even more.

“My hatred for you has turned me into a thief. I resent you enough to do this, and that will never change. Do you think we can become a family like this?”

“What do you want to tell me, Ma’am?”

Leyla’s voice trembled, but she kept a straight face before Mrs. Etman.

“You must already know. You are a smart girl.” Mrs. Etman stated briefly. Her eyes shone as cold as the untouched cup of cheap tea, while looking at her.


“If you have something to say, just tell me,” said Leyla. Her glassy, round eyes glimmered in the rays of sunshine that fell upon her despondent face. The ugly face she wished to conceal at the moment.

“You can tell Kyle and the rest of the world that I did such despicable acts to stop you two from getting married.”

You’ll never be able to do that– Mrs. Etman looked confident through her words as she knew Leyla’s personality.

“Kyle will be very disappointed with me if you tell him regarding this,” She recited. “Our relationship will all but be broken, and maybe even our whole family’s harmony.”

Mrs. Etman’s expression became colder as she saw Leyla stiffening.

“Since all of this has happened, it makes no difference whether you keep this a secret or tell Kyle everything. You and Kyle won’t be able to get married. That’s all I want.”

“Do you hate me so much that you have to do this…?”

“Didn’t I already tell you? I really hate you.”

Mrs. Etman rose from her seat and walked away.

“I hate you terribly. You pushed me to take such an extreme choice; I really despise you, Leyla.”

Mrs. Etman stared at her with a steely gaze. Her eyes could not hide her contempt.

“I will refund your money after the registration date.”

She swallowed the curse words that were already on the tip of her tongue, knowing Leyla would have understood; that she should leave Kyle without wasting time or making a scene out of it.

Mrs. Etman was about to turn around when she groaned and lowered her eyes down.

“Today, I’m very resentful of Mr. Remmer.”

She said,

“Why did he have to take you in and create such a tragedy in Arvis ?”

Those last words……. hit Leyla the hardest.

Her eyes froze and then turned glassy in a blink.

Mrs. Etman strolled out of the tea parlor leisurely, leaving the poor little girl behind, who didn’t weep till the very end.

In her wake a tinge of pleasure and guilt was clinging like a shadow on the tips of her toes as she went.





He saw Leyla.

Her petite frame was crouched down beneath the blooming dry cottonwood tree on the roadside leading to the manor.

Matthias, who was peering out the car window, did recognize her figure. All he could see was her back, but he felt confident that it was her.

“Doesn’t that girl under that tree look like Leyla?”

The driver frowned as he kept an eye on a girl he seemed to know.

“Is she sick?”

Mark Evers, the Duke’s aide, wondered as well so his voice was filled with concern.

Meanwhile, their car edged closer to Leyla, who was curled up on the ground. Leyla quickly stumbled up and straightened stiffly when she sensed their upcoming approach. She bent her head so deep that they couldn’t see her swollen face, but it was noticeable that she wasn’t fine.

Following that, Mark Evers continued to look out the car window before turning his gaze to the rear seat. He was reluctant to ask his Master, but his eyes were filled with hope that they could stop the car for a moment and help Leyla.

The driver’s thinking seemed to be in tune and he steadily slowed down the car’s speed.

Matthias glanced outside the car window at the slow-moving scenery beyond. Leyla was leaning against the trunk of the tree with her head down.

She was crying.

Matthias was sure of what he had seen on her face. Nobody else in this world had a better understanding of Leyla Lewellin’s tears than he did.

Matthias clammed up. He turned his gaze away from the car window in place of his answer.

His assistant couldn’t add any more words, with only a sad expression on his face. The driver, likewise, accelerated the car’s speed to comply with his Master’s wishes.

Matthias immensely enjoyed Leyla’s tears, as he always did.

It entertained him. But, he wanted to monopolize her tears for his own pleasure.

The idea of someone else having to step in to create those kinds of entertainment wasn’t pleasurable.

The car fled the scene, leaving Leyla alone with her tears, and soon stopped at the Mansion’s entrance.

Matthias stepped out of the limousine, with a face that appeared more relaxed.

‘Linda Etman, has she taken action?’

That was the only explanation he could think of for Leyla to cry until her shoulders sagged. And his guess seemed to be right. It was proven by Hessen, who approached him with a concerned face.

“Master, I have something to report.”

He spoke secretly in a hushed voice as he walked beside Matthias.

“It is an unbelievable story; I’m at a loss for words…”

When the voice of his capable butler, who seldom panicked, shook a little, Matthias knew that Mrs.

Etman had lived up to his expectations.

“I’m going to the office.”

Matthias said so in matter-of-factly, gentle voice.



“Got cold during summer, huh? It’s all because of that damn thief that you’re sick like this.”

Bill who strutted around Leyla’s bed said.

He became concerned when Leyla said that she was ailing and after he saw her going to bed early last night.

Leyla said she had a cold and would recover with a bit of rest, but in Bill’s opinion, her condition did not seem to be getting any better.

“You can’t be like this. Mr. Etman….”

“No.”

Leyla struggled to rise from the bed when Bill was about to turn around. She was shivering even with her thick pajamas, even though the weather had been relatively warm since it was still the wee hours of the morning, she looked as if she had gotten ill overnight.

“No, Uncle. Don’t do that.”

“I just wanted to call the Doctor because you’re sick? Why? Did you have a fight with Kyle?”

“No.”

“Even though you fought with Kyle, but Dr. Etman…”


“Uncle, please.” Leyla’s clammy hand, drenched in a cold sweat, groped Bill’s clothes. “I just need a little rest. That’s it. Please let me be.”

“Leyla… … .”

“I think I’ll get better soon. Please?”

Bill could no longer stay stubborn in the face of her desperate begging. He had a hunch it had to be related to Kyle, but he wasn’t in a place to unearth it.

He grudgingly nodded, and Leyla seemed relieved just then. Bill could feel a searing pain in his heart when he saw her lying limp on the bed as if she’d fainted.

“Right, eat well! Sleep well! I should’ve said that!” Bill yelled aloud, “I’m going to sort it all out. I was on the verge of bursting within now!” He pulled up the blanket’s seam with careful gestures that contrasted with his rough hand and then put a wet towel on her feverish forehead.

“Don’t worry, sweetheart. Even if I can’t catch and kill the thief, I will pay your tuition in some way…”

“Uncle.”

Leyla’s frail voice blended with her heated breaths.

“Please stay here. Don’t leave me alone.”

“You are thinking negatively again.”

“I’m sorry, Uncle.”

“What gibberish are you talking about?”

“It was because of me.”

“If you keep saying that, I’ll get angry. I’ll come back for sure.”

Bill regarded Leyla as lying and babbling, and then heaved a deep sigh that silenced her. “First, take a rest, Leyla. I’ll be right back.”

Bill shut the window in Leyla’s room and draped the curtains to cover it.

“I’m stuffy… Please open it up a bit.”

Leyla, who was shivering from the cold, asked him once again to open it. Her stubbornness persisted even as she lay weak on the bed.

Bill had to yield to her pigheadedness for the nth time. Again he rolled up the curtains a bit and partly opened the window, and finally, Leyla closed her eyes.

“If your fever’s not coming down by the evening, whatever you say, I’ll call Mr. Etman. Got it?”

He threatened her, but Leyla stayed quiet as if she hadn’t heard him.

Bill then reluctantly left the house, leaving Leyla, who was already dozing off like a log.

He hastened off, determined to complete today’s job as soon as possible.








Chapter 38




The Time When I Loved You







Accurate predictions may sometimes be displeasing. Matthias suddenly realized that this morning, when he was gazing down at the rose garden without Leyla Lewellin.

He had his doubts if she would show herself up for now, after being such a downer. Matthias had guessed it at the moment he heard Hessen’s report in his office last night. Nevertheless, witnessing Leyla’s absence with his own two eyes had given him some annoyance.

‘She’s pretty damn stupid.’

While laughing, Matthias rolled down the thin curtain then turned around.

Linda Etman’s heist was a ruse.

Breaking Leyla Lewellin’s heart and tarnishing her pride was her true purpose. She devised another plan after her failure to stop his son; It would be Leyla who needed to be stopped.

Matthias delightedly applauded and gave a hats off to Mrs. Etman’s great approach. She had a superb hold on her opponent and stabbed her blade precisely on the target.

Her hostility towards Leyla bestowed him with a lot more entertainment than he had expected. Matthias couldn’t keep the laughter from escaping his lips as he listened to Hessen’s report yesterday night.


His leisurely weekend morning felt particularly lengthy and stodgy. After changing his clothes, Matthias was once again gazing out of his window while drinking his coffee. Only Bill Remmer and the garden’s employees were there, but Leyla was nowhere to be seen.

Was he too greedy in his desire for someone as pathetic as her?

Matthias took a little morning stroll while mocking her sorry state of affairs. Usually, he would stop by the annex to swim in his spare time. The servants who were well acquainted with their Master’s routines would flee as soon as they saw him approaching.

He wished to see Leyla cry so he could have some good time today.




As he was taking pleasure as the wind blew in, Matthias happened to arrive at the gardener’s cottage. The house without Leyla lounging on the porch while reading a book or doing chores diligently in the yard, was much too quiet.

Matthias’ annoyance rose a little. It was when a white pigeon suddenly flew into the house.

The bird flew straight towards the window at the back of the cottage as if it had a specified destination. Without a second’s hesitation Matthias made a beeline to where the bird had passed. It perched calmly in the half-opened window, and he noticed a note attached to the bird’s leg.

Beyond the window was Leyla’s room.

The pigeon didn’t flee as Matthias approached it.

‘Carrier pigeon?’

Matthias looked at the bird with a scowl before gently catching it.

Although being in human hands, the pigeon was very docile. Matthias stared carefully at the note the bird brought before a sudden cry from the window jarred him out from his muse.

Matthias lifted his head, and he found Leyla sniveling and laying in bed like a dead person in her room that he had previously thought was empty.



Leyla opened her eyes and laid still, her gaze was glued to the ceiling for some time.

The room was lathered in blinding light. The sound of birds chirping in the tree outside the window was clear and lively , like the summer sunshine in the morning.

As her dreamlike senses reawakened one by one, the bitter truth that she had forgotten due to her sickness slowly revived.

‘How strange…’

Leyla felt more at ease when the reality before her eyes grew clearer. The plethora of emotions that had filled a gap in her breath melted away in the guise of cold sweat and tears that broke out without her realizing it.



It had been about two… No, three days had passed.

Leyla was counting how much time she had spent laying on bed before slowly raising her body and sitting down. She momentarily felt a little bit groggy but soon regained her composure.

She took a look at her bed sheet and thought that it needed to be laundered. The window sills should be wiped as they have become dusty. The dish that Uncle Bill had washed before wasn’t clean enough, so she had to polish it again to get rid of any residual stains, and…

For a short spell, Leyla was stunned and closed her eyes, thinking of the many tasks she needed to do.

When she reopened her eyes, she calmly decided that one thing should take priority above all else.

She has to meet Kyle.



“You can’t go around like this yet, Leyla. You should rest!”

Kyle speeded up his steps when he spotted Leyla sitting by the stream.

Leyla was looking down at her reflection in the water, slowly raising her head to face him. She was pale-faced, with visible symptoms of sickness.

“Why did you come all the way here?” Kyle hurriedly walked over to her side.” I can meet you at home.”

With her knees clasped together, Leyla was sitting on a wide, flat rock by the river. Her wavy, silky golden hair, which draped naturally over her slender shoulders, was like a part of the gleaming afternoon sun.

“I have something to tell you.”

Leyla spoke as she stared at him solemnly, without her usual smile.

“So, what amazing thing are you going to say?”

Kyle laughed on behalf of her, who showed no sign of mirth. Leyla gazed at him without a word, turning up her nose to join in the laughter. Without the slightest hint of a bad feeling, Kyle broadened his grin.

“Meeting somewhere else like this is nice at times, but you’re still unwell. That’s what concerns me.”

“Kyle.”

“Anyway, I had something to convey as well. How fortunate we are to be able to talk here.”

“Kyle.”

“Don’t worry about the stolen money, Leyla. Tomorrow my father is going to Ratz. Your tuition will–”

“Kyle, I’m not going to college.”

Kyle’s words were cut off by Leyla.

“… What?”

Kyle, who was sitting beside her and watching the river flow, tilted his head. Both exchanged glances. A heavy silence rang between them in a moment as their trapped gazes were locked on each other.

“I’m not going to College.”

“What are you talking about? You passed that difficult exam! Don’t worry about the tuition fees. Leyla please, don’t be so stubborn like th-…”

“I won’t marry you either.”

Layla straightened her knees and re-wrapped her fallen scarf around her neck.

“I’m going to stay here with Uncle Bill, and live the life I’ve always dreamt of. I’m sorry, Kyle. I should have told you this from the beginning….but I… … I was blinded by greed for a moment.”

“Greed?”

“Yes, even though I always pretended I didn’t want to, deep down I really wanted to go to College and continue studying. So I decided to get married with the belief that it was possible. In simpler words, to use you on the way.”

“Do you think I’ll believe such a lie?”

Kyle scoffed coldly, but Leyla didn’t seem to be shaken.

It would be great if everything was a lie.

A bitter smile stole over her trembling lips. For a small span of time, Leyla believed it was just sympathy or pity, but she soon got an understanding otherwise.

Kyle Etman viewed Leyla Lewellin as a romantic partner.

He proposed to her with the heart of a lover. But she accepted him with the heart of a friend.


It was a pack of lies if she said that she was not greedy on the inside. It was precisely that fact which sank Leyla’s heart even deeper.

“I know you, Leyla. You’re not that kind of person.”

Kyle leaped to his feet, his towering shadow looming over her.

“You love me. Do I look like an idiot who doesn’t even know that?”

“I love you.”

Leyla said; she made no denials.

‘Is Kyle someone I love?’

‘Yes, she does love him.’ Leyla would nod her head repeatedly to answer that question. Even if she was asked 1,000 times, she was willing to nod every time with the same answer.

“As my best friend, as an older brother, or sometimes as a younger brother. I love you so much, Kyle.”

Leyla remained unflinching even as she beheld Kyle’s growing hardened face.

She had to.

“But I know this is not the kind of love you want. I’m sorry Kyle, but I can’t… I don’t think I can love you like that. I cannot marry you with this kind of heart.”

“… I don’t care.”

Kyle’s throat cramped as he swallowed his spit.

“Whatever kind of love it is, as long as it is love, I don’t care. It’s okay even if it isn’t the kind of love I’m looking for, Leyla.”

“No. I don’t want to do that.”

Leyla slowly lifted herself up. Their gazes were riveted between the howl of the forest wind. As she looked at the water that had been blown away by the wind, shaping small ripples on its surface, Leyla caught her breath.

Not far from the cottage, this wooded creek was the playground for little Kyle and Leyla. Amidst her fear of water, she was able to dip her feet in the stream that barely reached her knees. Rather than the Schulter River, Leyla enjoyed visiting this place more.

She used to read her book on a boulder shaded by a tree, and Kyle would explore the brook, catching crayfish or small fish. He would collect lovely freshwater clams or pebbles, both of which were her favorites.

They laughed a lot. Those were always fun and heartwarming moments.

The time when she loved him was like that.

There were so many pristine memories that were more glorious than playing in the water’s ripples. But still, that time of love was irreplaceable; it would stay within her forevermore.

‘Even so, I still have to lose you.’

“I can’t do it. I want to stop.” Leyla dropped her head to hide her reddened eyes. “I’m really sorry, Kyle. I should’ve told you from the beginning.”

“If that’s your only reason, don’t even say that. This world is teeming with people who marry without love. Still, you love me. That’s enough.”

Kyle approached her and wrapped her shoulders in his grip.

“You use me? Fine. Using me doesn’t matter either.”

“Don’t be like this.”

“As long as it’s you, I’m fine. If I can be of any help, feel free to use me.”

“Kyle!”

“I’m alright as long as you don’t desert me.” Kyle’s eyes began to flush.

Leyla clenched her fists, attempting to fortify her wounded heart.

“I hate that. I don’t want to do that.”

“If you really want to go to College. If you’re so desperate enough to use me, then you shouldn’t let me go.”

“Kyle… I want to marry someone I love as a man and a lover. The thought of marrying you and going to Ratz made me realize that.”

The vilest things she had been struggling to keep from saying eventually slipped out of her lips. Kyle’s pupils dilated at her reply.

“I want to marry such a person and live without shame. My dream to feel that, that kind of love outweighs my ambition to attend college with you.”

“Leyla.”

“I had thought about using you, and pretending it was alright until the end, but then I felt like I would be ashamed of this choice for the rest of my life. I’m afraid I’ll regret it. I’m not happy about living in a guilt fantasy.”

“Leyla Lewellin!”

“If I make such a choice, I fear it would taint my time and my heart, which loves you as a friend and a family member. I hate it the most and am scared of its occurrence.”

Her heartfelt voice was faintly shaking.

When the time came for her to become a grownup, she made the most childish decision she could imagine.

Leyla ballooned her dream of attending college together for fear of losing him. But, in the end, this marriage turned out to be a genuine mistake that garnered her much regret.

Mrs. Etman was entirely right. The moment she accepted Kyle’s proposal, her relationship with him had already crossed the line of no return.

Mrs. Etman’s resentment towards her was too much for her to endure. Leyla couldn’t separate Kyle from his beloved mother; moreover, she didn’t want Uncle Bill to get hurt.

The trigger had already been pulled; the only thing that can be gained by revealing the truth would be a gash in everyone’s heart. Leyla felt her body had been drained out of all the water after shedding so many tears, and there was no turning back at the end of the road.

So she had to turn around at this point, in silence.

It was the only way to save her last semblance of pride, Kyle’s family, and Uncle Bill’s heart.

“Let me have that dream, Kyle.”

Leyla whispered as she looked at Kyle.

“We… Let’s do that”.

‘So, let us bid farewell to those precious sparkling days and become adults.’

Leyla let out a quiet sigh against voicing what she intended to say. Her faintly heated breath flowed through her parched lips.

‘Don’t cry.’

Tears didn’t spring up in her eyes, fortunately. The spell she had learned along the way somehow had shown its worth.

“Don’t go.”

Kyle, who was standing still, grabbed Leyla by the wrist as she passed him. His big, hot hands were shaking.

No answer.

Leyla opened her tightly-closed eyes and pushed his hand away.

Kyle’s hand fell off so easily. His grip on her wrists had lost its strength.

Leyla walked away with weightless steps, leaving Kyle behind , who was standing stiffly staring at the stream.

Her misty-eyed gleamed a shade of red, but they were held back until the moment she arrived at the cottage.











Chapter 39







My Beloved Son







‘She’s a smart girl, as expected.’

Mrs. Etman felt a surge of relief washing over her as she saw her son’s bedroom door snugly closed.

After going out in the afternoon to meet Leyla a few days ago, Kyle returned home devastated like a bewitched person. Mrs. Etman could foresee the ending of the two of them based on her son’s condition, who was confined to his room with his lips clamped shut.

“Madam, the Young Master skipped lunch today as well.” With a worried face, the housekeeper reported to Mrs. Etman, who had just come down from the second floor.

“Leave him alone. He will also have a hard time swallowing food when having a breakdown.”

Mrs. Becker’s eyes widened at Mrs. Etman’s unexpected response regarding her son. She seemed overjoyed, even though her son had skipped every meal since yesterday. But Mrs. Becker decided not to


ask further, knowing that her milady would seldom reveal the actual reason, so she just bowed her head and walked away instead.

Mrs. Etman visited the garden after a long absence to tend to the flowerbed. The garden at Etman’s house was brimming with exquisite and different kinds of roses which were imported from Arvis’s shrubbery. She received several roses from Elysee von Herhardt, who exclusively gifted the flowers to her closest wives.

She was the only woman without a title in Carlsbar who had fellowship with the two Duchesses of the Herhardt household and several people didn’t know how proud she was of it. She believed that Kyle’s marriage to the lower-noble-lady that was introduced by Norma von Herhardt would enhance the Etman family’s social standing.

How hard she toiled to get here, now her husband and son tried to thwart her efforts, only for the sake of one girl named Leyla.

Linda Etman readily admitted that she had done a great wrong towards that poor girl. But she had no regrets. For Kyle’s sake, she could have performed far more gruesome acts than that. Leyla would be wise to seek a husband who was on par with her.

Mrs. Etman entered the living room, carrying a bouquet of roses that blended harmoniously in hues. She was delicately arranging the flowers in the vase when Dr. Etman came in.

“Kyle? Is he still doing that?”



“Yes. Sounds like he went through a lot of trouble.”

“I think something happened between him and Leyla.”

“I’m going to see Leyla.”

Mrs. Etman spoke calmly as she centered the vase on the table.

“You?”

“Did you forget? Kyle is my son as well.”

She smiled as she stood.

“He is the son I love much more than you.”




Leyla was sitting in the corner of the yard washing a big pot when Mrs. Etman visited her. Her appearance was soaked; the splashing jet of pump water drenched her apron, sleeves, and the crown of her head.

“Hello, Mrs. Etman.”

Leyla got up and greeted her without expressing surprise.

“Please come i-….”

“No. You don’t have to do that.” Mrs. Etman shook her head after thoroughly scrutinizing Leyla from head to toe and handing her the leather bag she had brought.

Leyla could tell what was within without even looking at it. She came close to expressing her gratitude, as she always did after receiving something. But Leyla decided to swallow her words and accept the money bag quietly.



Seeing Leyla shut her lips after receiving it, Mrs. Etman furrowed her brow in annoyance.

“Judging from the expression on your face, you seem to have a lot to say.”

“Yes.” Leyla answered her without a grain of hesitation. She refused to bow her head, which she did the last time at the teahouse.

Mrs. Etman erupted in laughter, “Well, go ahead. I’ll understand.” She flashed a kind smile through her lips which were stiff from the bitterness. “Looks like you’re done talking to Kyle.”

“You already know, and that is why you returned our money, right?”

“What did you say?” Mrs. Etman’s eyes fluttered at Leyla’s bold tone, which contrasted markedly with her usual self.

“Don’t worry; I made no mention of you.”

“Worry?”

“Yes. You appear worried that I will tell Kyle of what you really did that day.”

“Huh. I had no idea you were such a daring child.”

“My apologies if I sounded rude. I just wanted to tell you that Kyle doesn’t know what happened that day.”

Leyla bowed her head to express her apology.


“I didn’t tell Kyle,” she said. As her gaze returned to Mrs. Etman again, her eyes grew fiercer. “I won’t ever tell him in the future as well.”

Even mentioning Kyle’s name made Leyla’s heart ache. The memory of Kyle’s back, which she had abandoned by the river that day, would forever change her life. It would undoubtedly stay as a pain inside that will last for the remaining of her days.

“I’m going to do it for Kyle, not for anyone else.”

“For Kyle?”

Mrs. Etman was snide, but Leyla didn’t seem to mind.

“Yes. I know. I know that Kyle loves his mother very much. Whatever you do to me, you are Kyle’s precious mother. So I want to protect the mother he loves.”

“I can’t help but marvel how a brat like you has lived this long wearing the mask of a sweet and kind faced child.”

“I’m sorry if I offended you.”

Leyla again dipped her head politely. Mrs. Etman blanched in response to what she perceived to be a sign of ridicule.

“But, I meant that sincerely. I just wanted to let you know that you have nothing to worry about.”

“It’s a ballsy promise, so I’ll try to believe it.”

Mrs. Etman felt relieved but scrunched her eyes to disguise it.

“Since you said that you did it for Kyle, I’m hoping you’ll explain to Kyle why you called off the wedding in a way that doesn’t cause him undue pain.”

“Yes. I will do that. Instead, Mrs. Etman…”

Leyla looked down at her money bag, then slowly lifted her gaze.

“I want you to apologize for one thing.”

“… What? Apologize?”

“Yes. I can accept whatever you tell me, even if it’s false, I will still accept it. But I want you to apologize for what you said about Uncle Bill.”

Leyla raged. Her hand holding the bag became pallid, but she did not attempt to revert.

“You said that you hated Uncle Bill for bringing about such a tragedy into your life by raising me.”


Mrs. Etman snorted as if she couldn’t comprehend what she was saying. Again, Leyla badgered her into apologizing.

“Please apologize for that.”

Her voice was soft yet insistent, borne on the wind of a beautiful summer evening.



Matthias’s lips broke in a grin as he leaned against the wall, having to eavesdrop on their interesting conversation.

He just finished swimming when he suddenly stepped foot towards the gardener’s cottage while on his way back home, expecting to see Leyla crying there. And Matthias had no regrets about making such a snap choice after witnessing a spectacle that was even more enthralling than her tears.

He was eager to see what look Mrs. Etman would put on her face, but Matthias decided to be patient, knowing that his entrance would merely bring their fascinating play to an end.

Matthias took a seat on the window frame leaning against Leyla’s room window facing the backyard. He enjoyed watching the white pigeon pecking on its food as he awaited Linda Etman’s answer.

“What people say is true; One’s roots cannot be deceived”

After some silence, Linda Etman’s voice became strained with a maddening rush that she couldn’t hide.

“Apologize? I’d rather feel sorry for Mr. Remmer, that poor man who reared a child like you.”

‘Linda Etman, as one would expect.’

Pleased that his second prediction came true, Matthias petted the docile pigeon. He recalled seeing Leyla’s figure through the window of his car a few days ago. It was all still fresh in his mind; she sobbed piteously, and her body was soaked in a cold sweat. She had difficulty breathing properly, and her shaking body appeared scruffy.

“Very pathetic.”

Matthias gave a mocking smirk. His twitching lips gleamed in crimson red.

“If she has something to say, tell her, say it aloud. Don’t you think so?”

After he gently spoke to the pigeon, Matthias left the cabin, dumping the drudgery spectacle behind.

Then, he decided.

If Leyla couldn’t provide him with some fun, he would simply create his own.



The hearsay started from Mrs. Mona.

“Have you guys heard? The reason why Leyla and Kyle broke up.”

Whenever she encountered the other employees of the duchy, Mrs. Mona would return in her furious tone to tell the marvelous story she had overheard previously.

“It was Mrs. Etman who stole Leyla’s tuition from Mr. Remmer! The Postman just told me. She sent someone else to steal their money. She wanted to make Leyla drop out of College and cancel her marriage with Kyle!”

Mrs. Mona held her breath momentarily as she spoke to add a dramatic effect, just like a popping firecracker.

Everyone laughed in tandem, they were all blown away. Mrs. Mona was well-known as a chatterbox.

She eschewed idle gossip and never failed to give a solid grounding for every one of her storylines.

“I know. You can’t believe it. Because I was like that too at first. However, the police had arrested the person who acted as Mrs Etman’s lapdog in stealing the money. The Postman, Mr. Berger saw the thief in person when he was delivering the letter to the police station. He heard what had happened from the policemen. I bet you would all be shocked to know who he is.”

Mrs. Mona deliberately dropped her voice as she reached the story’s most intriguing part.

“Do you all know Mr. Rayner? The businessman, who is also Mrs. Etman’s cousin? Oh, my God, he was the thief!”

“What, Mr. Rayner? That Daniel Rayner?”

“Yes! That Mr. Rayner!”

Mrs. Mona’s tone grew more spiteful as they all noisily parroted the question in disbelief.

“And after she stole the money, Mrs. Etman asked for a face-to-face meeting with Leyla, at some point she confronted her and said, ‘How dare you marry my son?’ A stranger who happened to overhear their quarrel became suspicious and reported it to the police, which led to his arrest.”

Following that, the story rolled about like fireworks dotting upwards the night sky.

“Indeed, she was a wicked woman. How could she do such a cruel thing to that poor child?!”

The stunned looks on her audience’s faces grew wider when Mrs. Mona raised her voice as she struggled to suppress her emotions.

“I knew it! There is no way that Leyla would ever give up on college or marriage without doing anything.”

“How could she have done such a horrible act? That noble Mrs. Etman.”


The excited crowd flocked over to lend their voices. They all quickly developed into enthusiastic orators with the same veins as Mrs. Mona and began spreading the truth at the same speed.

The word quickly traveled throughout Arvis’s Mansion, needing less than half a day, to be precise.

It was late afternoon when Mrs. Mona, who seemed to have subdued her fury, saw Bill Remmer who was calmly working in the garden.

‘It seems, the dim-witted guy still doesn’t know.’

Regardless of how excited Mrs. Mona was about relaying the story, she was unhappy since this matter concerned someone close to her.

‘But Bill Remmer is like Leyla’s father. He is someone who needs to know this better than anyone else.’

In her inner battle, Mrs. Mona made up her mind,

“Yes. I have to tell him.”

Finalizing her decision, she began waddling towards the garden.








Chapter 40




Go Back To My Track







The uproar was pitched through the open windows and made its way into Kyle’s ears beyond his tightly sealed bedroom door.

“Hey, Mrs Etman! Come out now! Right now!”

Kyle slowly raised his tired body. The man’s thunderous yelling and whale-like voice was not a stranger to his ears.

“…Uncle Bill?”


Kyle sprang out of his bed in surprise. He hastily walked to the window and witnessed a quarrel between Bill Remmer and a housekeeper at the front door.

“What kind of commotion is this?” Mrs. Etman appeared with a haughty yell.

“Mrs. Etman, are you the damned thief? Is this an act that can be committed by someone who has been revered as a noble? No matter how much you hate Leyla, how could you do this?!”

Kyle, who was rushing towards them to break up the brawl, suddenly stopped like a dead person in his tracks.

Thief?

Why did Uncle Bill mention the thief?

To my mother?

Kyle stood frozen in a conundrum as Bill spewed forth an implausible gruesome story in a fit of anger.

His body suddenly became like a stiff board as he listened to those unbelievable utterances.



“No-Nonsense… How could he accuse my mother of such a heinous crime…”

Mumbling blankly, Kyle lurched out of the room. He made his way down the stairwell in stumbling steps.

He couldn’t take Uncle Bill’s persecution towards his mother, no matter how angry he was about the theft incident.

“Did Leyla say that?”

Mrs. Etman asked sharply after Bill stopped screaming.

“Good grief, how could she slander me like that…..”

“Does Leyla look like a child capable of telling such things?”

Bill shouted out in tears when Kyle was about to step out to the front door.

“If Leyla told me, my heart would not have been ripped asunder like this!”

“If you want to create a scene by uttering nonsense, go back now! Before I call the police!”

“Do you dare to call the police?! Do you think you can bring the police when the postman saw your cousin being taken to the police station?”

“… Wh-what?”

Mrs. Etman staggered. She took a step back.

‘Please, mother.’

Kyle prayed as he looked at his mother’s back.



‘Please say no, you’re not the culprit, say that it was just a slander’.

Mrs. Etman kept mum, but her breathing was labored. Due to fear, her grip on the railing started to tremble.

Kyle waddled towards his mother.

“Mother.”

Mrs. Etman was stupefied. Only after hearing his pained voice, she noticed her son’s presence standing behind her.

“That was not true, right?” Kyle grabbed her arm. “It was just a misunderstanding, right? Tell me. ?”

Kyle tried to laugh but failed. It was painfully obvious that this moment was real, yet a dense fog seemed to shroud his head.

For him, the last couple of days were hellish. He visited, coaxed, and begged many times, but Leyla refused to change her mind. In his profound sadness, time was slipping away.

Kyle had nonetheless pinned his vague hopes. His father, who went to Ratz, had already paid Leyla’s portion of the tuition. He believed everything would be fine as long as he could persuade Leyla and assure her. So he planned to visit Leyla this evening and cajole her once again;

‘If marriage was too much of a burden, then how about an engagement? Let’s go to college together while we’re engaged.’

Engaged…That was enough for him.

As time passed by, he believed that Leyla’s feelings would grow into that of a lover. Thus, they would live happily ever after.

But now….

“Mother!”

Kyle gasped as his voice was stymied by tears.

Mrs. Etman froze and gazed down at the railing. Her face was pale and her lips were zipped tightly.

That moment, Dr. Etman arrived at the scene. He got out of the car alongside two police officers. Mrs.

Etman’s legs buckled when she saw them and collapsed on the floor.


Dr. Etman begged the police to allow him to approach his wife alone. Strained expressions were plastered on his face.

“I’m really sorry, Mr. Remmer.” He went towards Bill Remmer first and took off his hat. “Even if I had ten mouths, I have nothing to say. I’m sorry.”

Kyle’s eyes welled up with despair as he watched his father apologizing repeatedly.

“As you can see, the situation is dire now, and it seems difficult to have a proper talk. Can I meet you and apologize again after things have calmed down?”

“… Let’s do that.”

Bill Remmer furiously wiped his tears and nodded his head. As he stepped back, the officers came forward.

“Why did you do that, dear?” Dr. Etman’s gaze fell coldly on her crouched wife.

“No. It’s not what you think…..”

“Daniel is at the police station. He confessed everything. You bribed him.”

As soon as that name escaped from her husband’s lips, Mrs. Etman’s lips clamped shut. She had nothing to say to defend herself.

“So don’t try to lie to me, Linda.”

“Dear!”

“Are you going to pretend that you accept Leyla and do things like that in the future? You are not just my wife, but also Kyle’s mother!”

Dr. Etman eventually lost his temper. An uncontrollable surge of fury he couldn’t suppress anymore distorted his face.

“It’s all your fault!”

Mrs. Etman lashed out irately as she cried.

“Why? Why the hell did you allow Leyla to wreak destruction on my life?!”

“What kind of rubbish are you spewing now that you’ve committed such a crime?”

“No. It was all your fault! As I had already said, I disliked her from the beginning! I would not have come this far if you had just listened to me back then! If it was not for you, I, I…….”

A loud sob escaped her mouth, and the hands covering her face soon became doused with tears.


With a sigh, Dr. Etman roused his sobbing wife. The officers showed their respect for the notable doctor by letting him bring his wife inside the car.

Kyle stood motionless, watching the nightmarish scene with his eyes wide open.

Before long, a thick layer of dusk began to cloak the blue yonder, and he had not yet awoken from that hellish dream.

Kyle shut his eyes in the dazzling dusk of the twilight.

He wished the entire world would be buried in a blanket of darkness.

It was his only hope at the moment.



“Uncle, please don’t cry.”

Leyla gently placed her handkerchief on the table. Bill, who had been staring at his beer glass sternly as if it was his enemy, lifted his head in bewilderment.

“Crying?! Who is crying?”

Although he vehemently denied it, Bill wiped the wet corners of his eyes with Leyla’s handkerchief.

His untouched food had cooled on the plate, but no one was urging him to have the meal. Both Bill and Leyla were mindful; they couldn’t eat.

While Bill gulped and emptied his glass, Leyla leaned her gaze at the table’s edge. Her face looked drained.

Leyla was unaware of what had occurred until she heard the words of comfort from Arvis’ employees, who came to the cottage. Mrs. Etman was unlikely to divulge the incident on her own, and she also kept her mouth sealed. Nevertheless, everything about that day was eventually disclosed.

Leyla had no clue who had informed the police about their private talks. That day, the old tea shop on the outskirts of town had no other visitor except for her, Mrs. Etman, and a stranger.

‘Who leaked the rumors then? Who the hell is he?’

Leyla could not even make a hazy guesstimate, no matter how hard she thought about it.

Whatever the case, one thing’s for sure; she had inflicted an irreversible wound on Kyle. She had broken his heart which she wanted to protect. Mrs. Etman was taken to the police station by several officers accompanied by Dr. Etman. And Kyle was there witnessing it all.

“Leyla, don’t cry.” Bill put down his glass and handed a handkerchief to her.

“Crying, who’s crying?”

As Bill did a while ago, Leyla stubbornly denied and wiped the corners of her reddened eyes.

“Sorry. I don’t know about the world out there, but I encouraged and pushed you till you suffered painful things like this.”

“If you say that, Uncle, you’re going to make me upset.”

“Marriage is… Yes. I’d rather not let you marry. Right, it’s better like this.”

Leyla stayed quiet, but she nodded her head deeply. Her lips glistened faintly as she smiled, dampened by her tears.

“But, I want you to attend College, Leyla. Dr. Etman had already paid for your tuition, and returning the money to them is the same as me paying for your tuition. College has nothing to do with Kyle.”

“No.”

“If you need something like a house or boarding house, I’ll give you more money. My finances might be a bit tight, but don’t worry, I’ll work harder to cover all of your living costs……”

“Uncle, I will go to college, ” said Leyla. “I am not giving up. But, not now.”

She reached out and held Bill’s hand. “I’m going to be a teacher.” she added. “I’m going to save money and retake the exam once I’m able to afford to study in the Capital. That was my original goal and dream. It was just that the shortcut blinded me for a while, but now I’m back on my track.”

“But you can’t just give up after what you’ve been through. You have already been accepted into College.”

“Don’t you believe me?” Leyla smiled peacefully, “Even if I take the exam again, I believe I will still pass it. At that time, I will be accepted with a higher grade to qualify for the scholarship. You will see.”

“Leyla, my dear….”

“Uncle, didn’t you tell me? I’ll become a good adult. So please trust me one more time.”

‘This good child, what should I do with her?’

Bill opined that it would have been better if she had cried, rather Leyla laughed merrily. She seemed to have no idea that her smile had ripped a hole in Bill Remmer’s heart.

‘And Kyle, what should I do with you?’

Bill’s shoulders began to shake as he couldn’t control his overwhelming mixed feelings. He hurriedly dropped his head, not wanting to show his pitiful state. His thick, hot tears streamed down his face and dropped over the table.

“It’s okay, Uncle.”

Leyla rose from her chair and approached him.

“I’m really fine.” She hugged him with her petite arms. “Really. I don’t want to punish Mrs. Etman. It’s fine now that we’ve got our money back.” Leyla comforted him with a gentle voice and patted him on the back.

‘What should I do with you?’

Tears threatened to spill from his eyes as his hard-strangled words seared from his throat.

Bill nodded as he wiped away the tears.

He judged what she did to be unpardonable. Bill, however, felt uneasy the whole time after he saw Mrs. Etman collapsing in front of him and Kyle looking so pale. Linda Etman was Kyle’s mother, regardless of how wicked she was. To Leyla, she was like a second mother, as she was the mother of Leyla’s precious Kyle.

“Let’s do that. If that’s how you feel, then I’m fine, Leyla.”


Chapter 41




How to Let Go of Beautiful Blues







“What a louche story.”

Duchess Norma gave a short yet bitterly cold riposte when Mrs. Etman’s story was brought up at the dinner table.

“I can’t believe her, the wife of such a prestigious doctor’s family, was arrested for stealing. I’m curious as to what kind of nonsense this is.”

After taking a sip of wine, she wiped her lips together in disgust at the vulgar story.

“I have to wrap up my relationship with Mrs. Etman.”

Elysee von Herhardt responded similarly to her mother-in-law.

Linda Etman was locked at the police station yesterday night and just got released this noon after Bill and Leyla visited the station, stating they didn’t want to prolong the case since they had already got their money back.

“It’s a shame that Dr. Etman was greatly disgraced by this event. He’s a good person, but should we change our doctor?”

“Since it’s not Dr. Etman’s fault, I suppose we don’t need to. This kind of scandal will quieten down after a while.” Duchess Norma resolutely voiced her unwavering faith in Dr. Etman.

“I hope Kyle doesn’t get hurt by this.”

She showed some sympathy while speaking about Kyle Etman.

“Now that things have turned into such a mess, I regret allowing the child to stay at Arvis.”



Elysee von Herhardt blurted out at the end of her meal.

“Leyla created this whole situation. .”

She looked at Claudine as if seeking an accord.


“Right, I think so too.” Claudine gladly nodded her head. “Although unintentionally, Leyla has ruined the Etman’s household.”

As she said it firmly, Claudine glanced across the table. Although he was a soft-spoken guy by nature, Matthias was unusually quiet during dinner tonight. Nevertheless, he showed no signs of being strange, rather he seemed to be as gentle as ever.

Like the dinner that came to an end, the scandal that had ensnared Arvis manor would soon be forgotten.

Mathias went right to his bedroom instead of going to his study.

He had instructed Hessen to send the spy who tailed Linda Etman to the police station that day. Matthias wanted him to testify against the theft when the postman was scheduled to deliver the documents to the station.

Given the postman’s closeness to Arvis’s employees, he expected the rumors were sure to spread like wildfire.

Everything went smoothly according to his plan.

And the Arvis’s Chef, a well-known newsmonger, played the last key part in helping the postman with his whistleblower tasks.

It was a cliché ending, but Matthias had great fun.

‘Did Linda Etman cry?’

Matthias’s thoughts rummaged for that idea as he turned on the lamp near the window.

‘Probably she did, like Leyla.’



That simple climax added another layer of excitement to his stage play.

The marriage of Leyla Lewellin and Kyle Etman had now crossed the line of no return. Even if there was such a thing as love, their marriage has undoubtedly been ruled out. To keep it short, Leyla Lewellin had forfeited whatever luck she may have had.

Matthias left the window and sauntered to the drink’s cabinet. All of the beverages stored there were still unopened as he wasn’t fond of alcohol.

He took out the bottle of wine closest to him and poured the clear amber-colored liquor into his crystal glass.

‘Leyla’s wings have been cut off.’

Matthias pondered calmly as he turned around, with a glass of wine in his hand.

‘So Leyla will stay inside the cage called Arvis.’

His satisfaction at knowing this fact had outweighed his rude awakening.

Matthias spent a long time staring at his sleeping canary, snoozing in ‘her’ comfy cage. His gaze then wandered to the garden outside the window before returning to the golden liquor in his hand.

His mood right now wasn’t as bad as the one he had on the late spring night when he heard of Leyla’s upcoming marriage to the doctor’s son.

That night was terrible as he remembered when the desire to kill someone took over his head for the first time in his life.

Leyla and Kyle’s love story had a better ending than the death of a person.

Matthias put the drink he hadn’t sipped on the table quietly.

Even without having to borrow the effects of liquor, he was already aware of the way to erase the lump in his heart and his beautiful blues.

He just needed to own her.



The case of stolen tuition, which made Arvis manor fall into a buzz, came to an end at the peak of summer.

The matter was flawlessly settled, with Bill Remmer getting his money and Mrs. Etman avoiding punishment thanks to his goodwill. Even so, it wasn’t enough to eradicate the consequences and her ruined afterimage from the public’s mind.

“Kyle.”

Dr. Etman slowly opened the door of his son’s room, who didn’t respond to his knocking.

Kyle was sitting quietly in front of the desk. He kept looking out the window even though his father approachied him.

“Kyle.” Dr. Etman called out his name for the second time and tapped him on the shoulder.

Surprised, Kyle turned around. His face was worn to a frazzle.

Dr. Etman slid his hand away from Kyle’s shoulder and leaned on the edge of his desk.

“Your mother is a little better now.” He said.

“…Yes.”

Kyle answered tersely.

Mrs. Etman, who was bedridden from shock after being taken to the police station, drank and ate almost nothing. He was worried as his mother had been suffering from a high fever for several days, but fortunately, her illness had not worsened to a critical stage.

“I’ve been looking for a house for you to stay in Ratz.”

Dr. Etman calmly informed him and Kyle looked stumped.

“What do you mean by…. house?”

“It’s a house that’s suitable for living alone, and it’s furnished…”

“Am I going to College alone?” Kyle asked with a peal of scornful laughter. “Without Leyla? After I hurt her like that… Am I going to College alone as if nothing happened?”

“I understand how you feel, Kyle, but your stubbornness on this matter will only hurt Leyla more.”

“Father!”

“Let’s accept it, Kyle, that your relationship with Leyla is over. This is the best option for you and Leyla and also for everyone else. Both of you must live your own lives.”

Dr. Etman sounded firm, even bordering on cold, ignoring Kyle’s heartbreaking gaze. The situation itself was suffocating for his son, but precisely for that reason, he needed to address his son level-headedly.

Nothing mattered more than protecting Kyle. He believed that Kyle’s wounds would gradually fade away after leaving Carlsbar, distancing himself from Leyla, and getting acquainted with a new environment at the university.

That was the sole hope Dr. Etman could have for the time being.

“Your mother was at fault, but it doesn’t relieve us of responsibility either. We chose to overlook the fact that your mother’s heart could never accept Leyla. You and I , we were the ones who drove her into that corner.”

“Because Leyla is an orphan and doesn’t have a glamorous background, she cannot satisfy mother’s snobbery, that was why Mother can’t accept her? Is that what you meant?”

“Kyle, enough! Even if she’s wrong, it’s unacceptable to talk badly about your mother!”

“I don’t know anymore. Is she my Mother that I’ve known and loved for so long? And I don’t know why I have to go to college…?”

“Are you going to give up your life because of your failed first love?”

“Leyla… Do you think she only means that much to me?”


“If that’s not the case, you should strive to be more level-headed. The more you act like an idiot, the more painful it gets for Leyla!”

“But, I’m unable to go alone without her.”

“You, and Leyla, are now past hope.”

“No!” Kyle howled. “There must be a way. Somehow… If I beg, if I apologize, if I convince her otherwise…”

“Wake up, Kyle Etman! Don’t you already know that’s impossible?!”

Dr. Etman violently quaked his son’s shoulder, his voice rose.

Kyle shook his head in denial. He yanked his father’s hand from his shoulder and fled from the room.

Dr. Etman, who knew where he was going, decided not to chase after him.

Even if it hurts him, he believed, that Kyle had to face reality beyond his hope.



The weather today was sweltering, but Leyla’s attire was orderly groomed, bordering on stuffy.

Her blouse’s collar was neatly ironed, the buttons clicked to the neck, and her skirt was faultless, without even a single pleat. Not to mention the pantyhose that cocooned her slender legs.

Her appearance didn’t seem to be unkempt at the slightest; even the afternoon sun was diligently bathing the road in its scorching heat.

Her cheeks were flushed crimson and out of breath due to the heat. However, Leyla walked gallantly, keeping her posture upright even after reaching a deserted street devoid of people.

Leyla Lewellin these days earned sympathy from everyone wherever she went. People openly consoled her and spoke ill of Mrs. Etman. They kicked their tongue in the spleen, and few shed tears after hearing her heart-wrenching story.

Similarly, today was no exception. The teacher at Gillis Girls’ High School, whom Leyla met when seeking a teaching job, was the first person to express her pity with a heavy sigh.

‘Indeed, Leyla. You have to cheer up and think realistically for the solution. It’s sad, but what else can you do? Everything had already happened.’

She grabbed Leyla’s hand and said words of comfort repeatedly. Likewise, the familiar faces she encountered in the city did the same.

Her gratitude for them was tempered with some shame. Leyla was at a loss for words and just greeted them cordially with a faint smile on her face.


Every time she did, Leyla tried not to assume things about the vague smiles that flickered on people’s lips. It was fortunate that she didn’t have to dwell on anything else since she was too busy maintaining her straight-grin mask.

‘I wish I could cut you off some slack, but this is the best thing I could do right now.’

Gillis’s teacher gave a sighing answer after consoling Leyla for a long time.

All teaching positions at Carlsbar Primary School had already been occupied. Her last remaining option was to work in a small town about an hour away by train.

Leyla eventually accepted the job after much deliberation. Given that commuting would be too exhausting, she needed to find a boarding house near the school. However, she would be able to return to Arvis on weekends. Perhaps after a year of teaching there, she would be offered the opportunity to relocate to a school in Carlsbar.

Leyla took off her hat for a moment to recover her breath after arriving in front of the Arvis Estate’s magnificent gateway.

She had a harder time dealing with Uncle Bill than anyone else. Uncle Bill always gave her a somber gaze whenever she smiled in front of him. Hence, she couldn’t shed a tear in his presence.

‘Well, this is good news, so I suppose it’s fine.’

Leyla strode along the path in a blue funk. Even if it didn’t mean like she would be saying goodbye to Uncle Bill for good, she felt upset whenever she thought about attending a school that was too far away from home.

As she walked, Leyla tried to make her smile a little brighter. She made her way to the garden, eager to tell Uncle Bill the news as quickly as possible.

The moment she passed under the arching arbor of the rose garden, Kyle was already standing there, waiting for her.

“… Kyle?”

Leyla’s pupils dilated. Kyle rushed up to her as if he were being chased by something and grabbed her wrist. He seemed to be a completely different person right now.

“Let’s go, Leyla.”

“Go where? Let go of my hand first and then we can talk!”

“Let’s run away from here, just the two of us.”

Kyle’s grip, holding Leila’s wrist, grew stronger.


Chapter 42







Nowhere In This World







Leyla stood gawking. Her eyes shook the moment she stared at Kyle’s peaky face with his tousled hair and wrinkly clothes.

“Don’t be like this, Kyle. We’re now…”

“Let’s go anywhere. Let’s go somewhere where just the two of us can become happy. Let’s do that.” Kyle harshly grabbed her hand and dragged her while mumbling like a lost person, closing his ears.

Leyla’s fierce resistance only made Kyle widen his stride ahead without budging.

“Mr. Remmer! Mr. Remmer! Look over there! Leyla is being dragged away!”

A gardener who happened to be nearby witnessed the scene and exclaimed. Bill shifted his gaze to the direction he pointed at.

Straightway, his face heated up.

Bill threw his pruning shears and frantically chased after Kyle. The baffled employees in tandem quickly joined the bandwagon.

“Kyle Etman! Let go of her hand right now!?”

Bill shouted, as anger rose to the crown of his head, struck a chord like thunder. He slammed a punch in Kyle’s face without delay. Kyle slumped and fell, but he dared not release his grip on Leyla’s wrist.

In the gusts of wind, Leyla’s body also hit the dirt of the rose bed.



“Leyla!”

Bill screamed in shock and hurried to assist Leyla in getting up. She had scratches on both of her cheeks and the back of her hands from thorny roses.


Kyle’s spaced-out eyes began to gradually regain their focus. He got to his feet, ghastly-faced, after seeing Leyla’s face smeared with blood in his sightline.

“Le-Leyla! Are you okay? Blood….”

“I’m fine.”

Leyla pushed Kyle’s hand away from her face.

“You look more hurt.”

“No. I’m not ….”

Kyle then looked at his shirt and bleeding hands. He felt a throbbing pain in his cheek and the back of his neck, but he ignored it.

“Uncle. Don’t worry, I’m fine.”

Leyla hurried to stop Bill before he approached Kyle again.

“Kyle.”

She carefully spoke. Her swollen, glassy eyes captured his face.

“There is no such place.”

Leyla’s smiling lips quivered slightly at the corners. Her soothing tone of voice concealed her crimson eyes and heated cheeks.




“There is no such place in the world, Kyle. There’s nowhere in this world where just the two of us can be happy.”

“Leyla…”

“It’s too hard for me if you insist like this. I don’t know how much longer I can stand it.”

“Please, Leyla….”

“So take care of yourself. Don’t worry about me, I’ll be fine too.”

“How could I be fine without you?”

“Go to college as planned…..study hard, and stay healthy. Then, become a good doctor.”

Leyla gave Kyle’s wounded eyes a good stare. Bitter tears that trickled down her cheeks had glistened her face in sadness.

“My Kyle. My good friend, Kyle Etman. I want to see you in that light.”

A single drop of grief welled up from the corner of his eyes. Kyle swallowed the sobbing with his teeth gritted and stared at her with reddened eyes.

“If you’re doing well, I will be fine too. We might be able to greet each other with a smile as time passes by.”

“…Sorry. I’m sorry, Leyla…”

Kyle’s gut-wrenching sobs that tore apart his chest escaped from between his lips.

“I, it was all my fault. Because of me, you… I’m so sorry.”

The sun’s piercing light descended on him like shards of broken glass. Kyle collapsed to his knees like crushed rose petals strewn over the ground.

Leyla shook her head and crouched before him.

“No, Kyle. Don’t say that. I don’t resent you. How can I hate you?”

“Leyla.”

“So, take care. You will, right?”

Kyle gasped as if he was being strangled and hugged her tightly.

His dread erupted in a torrent of uncontrolled sobs. Blood and tears dripping from his wounds marred Leyla’s white blouse.

Bill let out a long sigh. He withdrew his gaze, unable to bear the sight of the two youngsters hugging.

The workers a few feet away also did the same.

With resentful eyes, Bill glanced at the sun blazing down on him in the blistering heat. He longed more than ever fqor this bitter summer to elapse ere long.



Kyle Etman left for the capital sooner than scheduled.

The Etman household put forward a flimsy reason that they had to prepare for college entrance, but no one believed it.

On the morning of Kyle’s departure, Leyla woke up earlier than usual.

Kukukukuku….

A bird chirping could be heard from the outside. Leyla turned her head to follow the cries and saw Phoebe sitting on her window ledge.

She put her glasses on, ambled up to the window and flung it open.

The bird’s ankle was tied along with a scrap of paper. Phoebe was trained as a homey pigeon to fly between her window and Kyle’s room. Leyla didn’t have to candle who the letter was addressed to.

She hesitated a while before carefully opening the letter.

Leyla, I’m leaving for the capital today.

I’m travelling to where I was supposed to go with you. But like a coward I’m leaving alone.

I won’t say this is better for us by telling you a plausible lie. Eventually, I’m running away.

I’m turning a blind eye to the messed up reality and leaving you behind. I lack the courage to assure you that everything is fine.

I’m sorry.

I know very well that my apology can’t wash away your wounds. Still, I want to convey these words.

I’m sorry for all the pains my mother foisted on you and for my inability to stop her. I was too naive to think that everything could be sorted easily, deaf to your feelings, I ended up hurting you.

I’m sorry….I realized my mistake.

But Leyla, I’ll be back.

I won’t be too late. I’ll make sure to return to you soon.

You may be right when you said that there’s nowhere in this world where only the two of us can be happy.

But Leyla, if there is no such place, I’ll ensure that I create one on my own. And I’ll bring you there.

Until that day, I will be doing good, just like you’ve asked of me.

So take care of yourself too.

My beloved Leyla, Goodbye.

….

Leyla read through Kyle’s handwritten letter slowly. The dawning wind ruffled her bushy blonde hair, which draped politely over her cheeks.

After a long pause, Leyla turned away from the window. She stowed the letter inside her desk drawer and hurriedly started her morning rounds.

***


It was an insanely hectic day. Leyla meticulously cleaned the entire house as if a single speck of dust wouldn’t be tolerated to stay on the surface of any place. Her kitchen was brimming with delectable food that she had cooked herself.

Before long, Bill returned to work after lunchtime, and a couple of Arvis’ workers who were close to them came to the cottage.

“Leyla, are you alright?”

Mrs. Mona worriedly asked as she handed out a basket full of luscious cookies and pastries.

“Yes, I’m fine.” Leyla flashed a smile and gladly embraced the gift. “Thank you, ma’am. Kindly go in and have a cup of tea.”

“Tea? Oh.. there’s no need to bother really.”

Mrs. Mona shook her head. Other coworkers nodded in tandem with her.

“That’s right! We just wanted to know whether you’re fine.”

“Yes Leyla, don’t be sad. First love doesn’t always come true. I’m sure you’ll find a better man than Kyle…….”

“Hey, it’s almost time! Let’s go back soon. I have to prepare for the duchess’ tea time.”

Mrs. Mona swiftly cut her off as she glared at the maid whose words were about to cross the line.

Leyla saw them off and went back to the kitchen with a heavy basket. She carefully took out the cookies and cakes from the basket one by one and arranged them nicely on the table.

Suddenly her hand stopped. She momentarily froze upon seeing a toasted cracker with a peach jam filling.

It was Kyle’s favourite cake.

Leyla vacantly looked across the table to the chair where Kyle was usually seated. The day when the three of them dined together at this table would never return.

That lone chair evoked pleasant memories in her thoughts. The time of their delicious good feasts, warm dim lights and loud chatter on the table. All of it had now gradually perished into a gulf of silence.

Leyla blinked and rushed to tidy up the basket before leaving the cottage. She grabbed her well-used sling bag and the hat hanging in front of the rear door and made her way to the forest trail.

**

Fennel. Yorkshire Fog. Buddleia.

Katydid. Green Linnet. Swallowtail.

Layla went along the path, whispering the names of the flowers that were blooming. The clinking sound of the stuff in her bag chimed along with the mumbled names of mother earth as a cradle song.

After a long trek, Leyla stopped at the foot of an idyllic tree standing on the banks of the Schulter River. She immediately began climbing it to the summit and perched between the thick branches of the wooden trunks.

Leyla stared at the bend of the blue Schulter River through her empty gaze.

The sparkles of the water scales made her eyes feel cold.



“As you said, master, it has been handled well.”

Hessen, who turned back after a short phone call, said. Matthias gave the nod as he had grasped the meaning of the word without the butler’s explanation. His gaze remained patched on the river beyond the colossal window.

“They will notify us by telegram today.”

After concluding the report, Hessen moved on to the next agenda; the dinner scheduled for the following week and the guest list. The visit of Count Brandt. The issue of workforce expansion. Daily reports and Matthias’ pithy answers were sequentially layered on top of one another.

“Then sir, I’ll take my leave now.”

Hessen left the annex after everything was done.

Once alone, Matthias descended the stairs connecting to the bottom floor.

The pavilion was built in the shape of a floating house on stilts. Half of the ground level was devoted to a boat hangar, designed to be openly attached to the river. Matthias could simply cross the river anytime he pleased by untying their ropes and rowing over.

Matthias stripped off his clothes on the hangar’s floor and dived into the water. As he swam across the arched foyer, the dazzling sun soon devoured his nude body bathed under its light.

Matthias let the gentle stream of the river cling to his flesh. Through his flexible stroke, he looked like a part of the river at first glance.

The lingering attachment that he couldn’t have was bound to grow into a bigger and tougher desire beyond his control, even if he believed, he would soon become tired of it once he had it. And Leyla was no exception.


Breathing hard, Matthias reached that conclusion. He felt silly for getting carried away by the ephemeral hankering. Still, he graciously accepted the desire to have her.

And now, nothing could stand in his way.

He was free to do anything he pleased.

The male lead who failed to protect their puppy love had eventually left, and Leyla was abandoned in the forest at the end of their fairytale.

Everything in his world had been back to its proper place, in a perfect line, just as he wished.

By the time he turned around and began swimming back to the annex, the slanting rays of the setting sun had tinted the sky a warm orange.

Matthias’ eyes narrowed at the river’s edge when he saw the familiar, beautiful tree. Ridiculously, there was a woman present, where he casually cast his gaze.

Leyla Lewellin.

He chanted her name silently like a spell, sending ripples over the water’s surface.










Chapter 43







Beautiful Song







After swimming back to the hangar, Matthias changed his clothes and left the annex. The sky was darkening as the sunset descended from its zenith. But Leyla was still there, crying on top of the tree, oblivious of his arrival.

Matthias eased to his feet under the tree. The hose wasn’t long before Leyla turned her head and looked at him from the top.


She didn’t seem surprised, nor did she try to escape his gaze. She also exhibited no signs of fear or worry either.

‘why’

Matthias soon found the reason: she wasn’t exactly looking at him. Her dim eyes seemed to wander somewhere far away, probably toward the place where the doctor’s son had left.

By the time Matthias slanted his lips, Leyla’s eyes had returned to focus. Her green eyes soon filled with a sense of shame. Her shoulders sucked in, and her face became stiff. She was back to the Leyla Lewellin that he knew.

Matthias casually peered at her teary eyes with his arms folded. He had a leisurely evening and wasn’t bound by any schedule, so Matthias had plenty of time to wait for her to stop weeping.

He saw Leyla’s eyes flashed with contempt when he had no intention of leaving, but her scathing arrogance only made him giggle.

“You know, Leyla. That boy is not coming.”

Matthias took a step closer to the tree in which she was sitting.

“Kyle Etman. The boy you’re waiting for. Ah! Should I now call him the one who left you?”



His lips smiled up at her. His tone was gentle and calm, though the sting in his words hadn’t dimmed in the slightest.

Leyla teared up at hearing those words. The twilight sky above her revealed itself—devoid of the birds that had returned to their nests. Her vision of the gradually swelling landscape soon turned into steamy tears and flowed down her cheeks.

Leyla bit her lower lip, she kept silent until the darkness slowly snuffed out her surroundings. She patiently awaited his leave but the wicked Duke was still standing beneath the tree. So Leyla decided to climb down the back of the tree, which was unreachable from his sight. Her head was slightly dizzy from all the crying. It’s fortunate that she didn’t stumble and was able to step on the ground safely.

Leaning against the tree, Leyla wiped her tear-stained face with her apron. She spruced up her tangled hair and straightened her posture. Only after that, she looked back, and the duke was still blocking the path to the cottage.

After building up some nerve, Leyla approached him one step at a time. She couldn’t care less about her scruffy face as her untamed tears were still sticking on it. As she couldn’t keep her tears hidden, Leyla chose to show it off with confidence.

This time she was determined to never again be his plaything.

“I apologize for my disrespect. Goodbye then, Duke.”

Leyla bowed her back with the greatest politeness from a distance of two steps away. At this point, giving the nobility the courtesy they wanted, has become as easy to her as breathing.

“Leyla.”

Matthias called out her name the moment she was about to pass by him. Leyla flinched, but her stride went undisturbed.

“Leyla Lewellin.”

Matthias laughed and turned. But Leyla ignored him and continued ahead as if she were deaf.

His brows wrinkled into a scowl at her rudeness that had crossed the line. He was about to stop her when Leyla suddenly collapsed.

“Arghh..”

She sat slumped on the ground, unable to get up. Her tiny hunched shoulders and frail back trembled intermittently.



Matthias scoffed and slowly approached her. Leyla Lewellin, the upright girl whose eyes never lost their boldness despite her tears, was now wailing terribly after taking her nasty fall.

Matthias squatted in front of her, bending one knee and picked up her dropped glasses.

Still, Leyla didn’t raise her head.

The tears that had always entertained him this time no longer did. Matthias now learned what to name this feeling after seeing her crying over the boy named Kyle Etman.

Hate…

A feeling of emotion he never had.

“Don’t cry.”

Matthias grabbed her chin. Leyla tried to dodge but was unable to escape his grip.

“Let me go!”

“Don’t cry.”

Matthias overlooked her protests and repeated his demand. With just one hand, he was able to tame her fully.


“Shouldn’t you be happy to see me cry?” Layla threw a flout at him. The dewdrops in her eyes became thicker and hotter as she endured his grip’s humiliation.

“Since when did you take an interest in my pleasure?” Matthias sneered at her, who sniffled frantically in front of his nose. “Why? You don’t like me having fun?”

“No.”

Leyla shook her gripped face, stubbornly trying to contain her sobs.

“Whether or not the Duke likes it, it has nothing to do with me. My tears are not related to you.”

“What is that Leyla?” Matthias tilted his head. “It does have something to do with me.”

“….”

“So, don’t cry.”

Over again. Matthias’s gentle look held her a moment longer. Leyla was stunned, and she groused.

“Do I need your permission to cry?”

“Perhaps?”

“Why should I? You have no right to do so.”

“I have no right…?”

“You don’t own me just because you’re the owner of Arvis!”

“Really?”

After a quick frown, Matthias’ face soon lit up with excitement.

“Then….shall I have you now?”

Emotion fled his face when his smile disappeared. Leyla cowered at the sight of the face that reminded her of the water’s still, windless surface.

“So that I can be your owner.”

Matthias fondled her lips with the tip of his finger. Leyla shuddered with dread when his touch rekindled the memories of her odious last summer. Her burning heart, which had been aflutter in sorrow at losing Kyle, seemed to freeze suddenly.

“…N-no, I-I don’t want to.”

Leyla heaved her body with all her might. She was sick to her core at the sight of herself groveling at his feet. Matthias then let her go, much like a child who had become bored with his toy and threw it away.


Matthias rose first and stood there watching her crawl to her feet under his shadow. Soil dust and tears marred her shape, but not her eyes—the flame had not yet burned out in her irises.

“Duke, I really don’t understand you…You already have a fiancée but you always do such inexplicable acts… I hate all of this.”

“So what?”

Matthias asked back, fiddling with her loose glasses.

“What does your heart have to do with me?”

His tone was devoid of hostility.

“I just want to have you.”

He wanted it; then he had it. His principle was that simple.

Matthias von Herhardt wanted Leyla Lewellin. He wanted her, and he would have her. He believed; something could be thrown away only after having that ‘something.’ And he had to leave her after he had her so that his life would be complete again.

Matthias gently put the glasses on Leyla’s dejected face.

“Go on.”

He released his hand, and Leyla lost her balance and fell back on the spot.

Matthias stood peering down on her for a while before he left the riverside to continue his stroll.

Leyla stayed there alone for a long time, even after he was no longer seen.



“Leyla! Leyla! Come here and look at this!”

Bill Remmer greeted Leyla excitedly after she returned to the cabin.

Leyla approached Bill merrily as he sat on the porch. She knew she couldn’t deceive her uncle with such a sloppy laugh, but she didn’t want to show him her stupid weeping face.

“What’s going on, uncle?”

“A telegram arrived. It’s for you.”

“Telegram?”


Leyla was puzzled when Bill gave her the telegram. It was a letter of notice about job openings for teaching positions at a rural school not far from Arvis estate. Beginning from the next semester, she would be able to work at the school rather than commute to a neighboring city.

“It’s weird. They said that there were no more openings at Carlsbar…”

The good news left her confused. Bill raised his hands and softly patted her head.

“It’s so hard for me to send you far away, Leyla, but I’m glad this kind of luck came in.”

Looking at Bill’s relief-filled gaze, Leyla giggled as she nodded. She could come every weekend to visit her beloved uncle despite her work in a nearby city. However, her heart was uneasy whenever she left Uncle Bill at the cottage alone.

But…

Leyla was unable to savor her bliss once the Duke’s visage loomed in her thoughts. She was grateful she didn’t have to part from Uncle Bill. But on the other hand, she loathed living under the same roof as the Duke.

What a stupid thought.

“Leyla, what’s wrong?”

Bill seemed worried, and Leyla realized her face appeared glum.

“No. It’s nothing.”

A rim of brilliant moonlight shone over her smiling face.

“It’s like a fluke, so I’m a bit shocked.”

“Really?”

“Yes.”

She twinkled, and her smile lit up a little more.

“Uncle, aren’t you hungry? Let’s have a nice dinner.”



The draping curtains in the bedroom, which partially obscured the open window, swelled up in the night air before repeatedly sinking.

Inside the room, the tinkling piano tune played the transition of a music piece. The tapping chords flowed mellifluously, creating an extremely delicate and flashy symphony yet, to some extent, sounding depressed.


Matthias reclined on a chair near the window, tin scissors and a handkerchief in his hands. when he clicked his finger, the canary swooped down and perched on his hand. He learned that canaries, like people, could improve their singing by being trained often.

His lips rose into a smile when the bird was humming in tune with the piano being played. The canary wiggled its little body covered in soft feathers and cocked its head as if in deep study.

Matthias gently wrapped the bird with the handkerchief he had brought after the singing had stopped.

Knowing that the bird would be frightened of the person who cut its wings, the zookeeper always covered the birds’ eyes before trimming their wings. After entrusting the job to the zookeeper for so long, Matthias could now easily trim it overgrown feathers.

The first few times he cut its wing too short, the bird bled. It wasn’t severely injured, but seeing its golden wings splattered with blood wasn’t a pleasant sight. Matthias disliked it, so he grew more circumspect.

Matthias skillfully spread out and clasped the branches of the bird that trusted him. He grabbed the scissors from his lap after deciding which feathers were to be clipped. Strand by strand, the feathers were strewn along the slashed area. The plumages fluttered in accord and fell on his perfectly polished shoes.

Matthias then rolled up the handkerchief that had been shielding the bird’s eyes after he had done cutting off the last wings. The canary flapped its wings several times before sitting on his finger.

As if nothing had happened, the canary began to sing again

It was a beautiful song.


Chapter 44




The First Autumn







“Oh my goddess! Leyla! what are you doing up there!”

A high-pitched screech from below the tree nearly made Leyla drop her half-bitten apple.

She snatched the fruit before it fell. Mrs. Mona appeared in her sight as she lowered her gaze. She was glaring at Leyla with her arms firmly crossed.

“Hello, Mrs. Mona. Isn’t the weather really nice today?”.

After a simple greeting, Leyla hurriedly stuffed the apples and books into her bag. Mrs. Mona’s brow knitted as she watched Leyla fluidly glide down the tree trunk. At the same time, Bill Remmer returned to the cottage.

“It’s all because of you, Mr. Remmer!”

Mrs. Mona growled at Bill Remmer moments after he ditched his cart.

“I warned you to raise her like a modest lady! I’ve advised you many times, with my experience of raising three daughters, and yet you consistently ignore what I say! Take a look at her now!? A grown lady and a teacher who’s supposed to educate children, climbed a tree like that!”

“Is there a rule that school teachers can’t climb trees? A good teacher should be capable of doing everything!”

Bewildered by the matter, Bill raised his voice and was ready to debate her. Ever since Leyla’s stay in Arvis, the pair’s parenting styles had never been in agreement.

Leyla wanted to say that she was now a grownup, instead, she wittily approached her uncle.



“Look at her! It’s all your fault! You should’ve gotten rid of her bad tomboy habits by at least spanking her ass when she was a child!”

Mrs. Mona’s ghoulish grumble made Leyla gasp and impulsively caressed her bottom. Bill and Leyla both had their feet freeze in place, as if they were being punished for making a mistake.


After a few minutes of nagging, Mrs. Mona suddenly remembered her original reason for being there and handed a basket of food to them before leaving. Bill and Leyla met eyes and exchanged guffaws.

“I feel like her scold has smacked me in the butt.”

“I can’t handle this anymore, Leyla. You’ll have to climb trees secretly from now on. Don’t get caught by her. I’m afraid I’ll become deaf if I hear her blaring voice.”

“Okay uncle, I’ll do that for you.”

After nodding, Leyla picked up the heavy basket and sauntered into the home. The old sling bag on her shoulder shook, making a clattering sound as it moved in time with her steps.

“Anyway, that junk bag needs to be burned soon.”

Bill tutted as he gazed at the crap bag, which she refused to throw away.

His worries didn’t seem to have a bearing on Leyla’s everyday life; she lived gallantly. After the new school semester started, she began teaching the children as a new primary school teacher. She was sometimes careless and couldn’t avoid making a mistake, but she quickly overcame them.

School seemed to have gotten pretty interesting for her lately. Bill, who had been worried if she could do well in teaching the child, could now relax. But he was keenly aware of Leyla’s pain and sadness that she was hiding in the depths of her heart.

She was a child who could hardly throw away the worn bag because of her attachment to it. He knew what Kyle meant to her better than anybody else. It was hard for her to mend her wounds from losing Kyle. He was her closest friend, before he became an innocent lover so fast. She was much too frail to be able to heal herself.

‘It’s not time yet.’

After a long thought, Bill shoved Kyle’s letter back into his pocket.

Even after moving to Ratz, Kyle sent a letter to Leyla once a week. Bill had explicitly asked to deliver the letter to only him. The postman had understood his intentions, and willingly complied with his request.



Bill knew he was cruel, and his cowardice didn’t represent an adult’s attitude. But, his need to protect Leyla trumped his regret and guilt over that boy.

“Uncle!”

Leyla waved at him, and Bill came to her.

They sat next to each other on the porch and shared an apple while enjoying the cool weather as the forest was resplendent in the colors of autumn.

“Oh, I forgot. I have something to say to the butler. Uncle, would you please relay my message to him?”

“Butler? Do you mean, Mr.Hessen?”

“Yes. Because of school work.”

Leyla wiped the juice drop on her fingers with the handkerchief she took out from her apron.

“I’d like to ask the Duke if the children can have an autumn picnic in the Arvis forest.”

“Ah that’s right, you must tell Hessen first, since you cannot directly approach the Duke. Sure. I’ll ask instead of you.”

“I’m a bit worried if it’s a discourteous request.”

“Discourteous? Don’t worry; the Duke is notoriously generous with such things, and I’m sure he’ll gladly allow it. Besides, Duke Herhardt is a sponsor of the school.”

“Sponsor?” Leyla’s eyes grew three sizes. “Duke Herhardt is the sponsor of my school?” A look of shock crossed her face.

Bill nodded, “Did you not know that yet? Duke Herhardt funds virtually almost all schools in this district.”

“I see….”

Leyla muttered a little. She clamped her eyes shut, wanting to block off the Duke’s face from her thoughts.

Duke Herhardt’s name followed her wherever she went in Carlsbar, and Leyla was bound to accept that unavoidable reality.

The King of Carlsbar.

That was the moniker bestowed to Duke Herhardt by the citizens of this city. An imperial nobility on a par with the emperor’s family in terms of wealth and power. He served both as a symbol and a source of pride for Carlsbar society.

“Why? Is there a problem with the Duke? Did his haughty fiancee bother you again?”

Layla shook her head, taken aback by Bill’s question. “No. How could that be?”

Once again, the Duke’s face, his stare, and their suffocating moments sequentially seared into her memory, robbing her of her speech.

“Let’s have a cup of tea, uncle.”

Leyla stood up and fled to the kitchen before Bill could answer. She poured the tea into the cup and placed the cake from Mrs. Mona on the serving plate after slicing it.


The daytime was winding down, and the night was creeping into the house. But Leyla hesitated to switch on the light as if she wanted to conceal her wariness in the dark.



There was no need to rush.

Matthias’ opinion of Leyla Lewellin was as follows. He had a burning urge to have her, but he didn’t want to jump the gun.

“Oh, Miss Lewellin is over there.”

Mark Evers giggled when he spotted Leyla marching down the Platanus road with her students. After Leyla established herself as a decent grownup and schoolteacher, Arvis residents started addressing her as ‘Miss Lewellin.’

The driver chipped in. “Today must be their picnic day.”

His grandmother granted the children from the local school to have an autumn picnic in Arvis forest. His mother gave a cool nod to the idea as well. In essence, such consent came under the hostess’s purview, which explained why Matthias raised no objections and respected their decision.

The excited students surrounding her reminded Matthias of the first time Leyla came to Arvis. She was still a child at heart who loved roaming the forest, who knew she could act so maturely in front of her students.

A smile crept on Matthias’ lips as he gazed from the car window. In the following moments, his car passed by Leyla and the children. But her afterimage clung onto his thoughts for quite some time after that.

These days, toying around with Leyla Lewellin had been his favorite pastime.

The more severe he bullied her, the more vivid her reactions became. Her emotions didn’t stray from embarrassment, anger, shame, and fear, but he savored every change in her emotions. Watching her flinch, get enraged, and speak back to him was much more entertaining than seeing her docile face with a polite smile.

Last weekend, they bump into each other in the mansion’s glasshouse. She was helping her uncle in tidying up the flowerbed when she saw him. The color quickly drained from her face. Leyla dropped her garden basket, and the soil-stained tubers were strewn over the paving stone. Bill Remmer, a few feet away, was busy tending to another flowerbed and didn’t seem to notice the fuss.

He calmly approached and stood in front of her. When he stomped on the tubers with his shoes, Leyla raised her head in a fit of fury. She looked nervous if anybody saw them, but her eyes were filled with an uncontrollable hatred.


Matthias chuckled, remembering how the people regarded Leyla Lewellin as a kind and gentle lady who never spoke ill of anybody. However, it didn’t stop him from being satisfied. As he had never learned to share his things with others, he was elated when Leyla acted sharp-tempered just to him.

The majestic birds living in the Arvis’ heavenly greenhouse made a loud chirp. Leyla quickly scooped up the tubers as if she didn’t want him to touch them, and then stood up.

As she bowed and was about to run, he tripped over her leg. The basket in her hands toppled, and the tubers were scattered again on the paving stones. Leyla stumbled, but he had already hugged her waist to save her from falling.

Matthias recalled how frightened Leyla was and how she quickly covered her mouth to prevent a scream. Even though the flowering season had withered away, he could still taste the faint scent of roses wafting from her skin.

After letting her go, he took a step back and pointed to the falling tubers with his gaze. Leyla scowled, loathing visible in her eyes, but she had no option but to follow with his demand.

Gnashing her teeth, she knelt to collect the tubers. When he kicked some tubers with the tip of his shoe towards her, a blush of heat bloomed on her cheeks.

Its crimson color beautified her skin tone perfectly.

Matthias wondered how beautiful it would be if he could paint her whole body with that hue. A lovely shade of red. The color of him.

“What’s my afternoon schedule?”

Matthias queried when their car moved closer to the city center.

“Today’s last schedule is to attend the board of directors meeting.”

Matthias gave a satisfied nod and checked his wristwatch. He’d be able to return home earlier this afternoon.

After getting out of the car, he took a moment to admire the cloudless high blue sky. The late-afternoon sun bathed the buildings in its warm light and the wind kept everything crisp.

The weather was perfect to enjoy autumn picnic.


Chapter 45




Princess Teacher







“…I-Is that person our teacher’s father?”

Stuttered, the little boy blinked his eyes nervously.

“Lies! He’s not like our teacher at all!”

A little girl—smaller than the boy whimpered and other children who huddled behind Leyla, reacted identically: their eyes opened wide with fear as soon as Bill Remmer appeared in front of them.

Bill was quite blasé at their not-so-extraordinary reaction. He disliked rowdy children, but Leyla had especially begged him to spare his time to guide the children who came for a picnic in the Arvis’ forest for a day. But he already felt that this wasn’t an easy job.

“Kids, Uncle Bill is a good person.”

Leyla smiled as she comforted her students. The timid little girl from a while ago again burst into tears after Bill showed his toothy grin.

“Fuck! I don’t do anything…”

“Uncle!”

Leyla quickly hushed up Bill’s violent cursing and knelt in front of the sobbing child. Unable to smile or frown, Bill could only stare at the tiny creatures with a quizzical face.



“Uncle Bill is a very nice man and he will take us around the forest today.”

The sniffling child in her arms stopped weeping, and Leyla continued her praiseworthy explanation.

“We’re going to study flowers and trees in the forest with Uncle Bill. Won’t it be fun?”

The children seemed to disagree with their teacher’s words, but they grudgingly nodded in tandem.

‘What a bunch of whiny!’

Bill scratched his head and began to lead the way. Leyla and the children were quick to follow his suit.

“Come to think of it, I think you were around the same age as those children when I first met you.”

Bill’s stiff lips softened when a flashback of memory flooded his thoughts.

“Uh, Uncle. These kids are all under the age of ten.” countered Leyla, with a frown on her face. “I was 11 years old at the time, about to become 12.”

Bill was joking when he said that, but Leyla took it seriously and she retorted by telling her age like the way she did the first time she came to Arvis.

“He.. he.. he..”

Bill chuckled, remembering that day. Leyla, his little girl who had always disliked being labelled ‘small’, now had grown up into a beautiful lady.



It was a little past 1 o’clock when Matthias returned to the Estate.

The car made its way through the mansion and headed to the riverfront annex. The driver and his aide were baffled at first by his surprising order, but soon understood when they recalled that it was a picnic day for the rural school children. This kind of charity event was primarily the duty of the hostess, but there was no reason to exclude the Duke from participating.



A gleam of bright sunlight bounced off the tree and caught the shrubs in its beams as the car drove through the forest to the riverside. The splendour of the forest coloured with reds and oranges and the pristine river sparkling with luminous water scales became a natural fence that encircled both sides of the road.

Arvis was a place that offered picturesque vistas all year round, but the period with the most splendid beauty by far was the autumn season.

Matthias stared at the scenic view which passed like a movie scene with an odd feeling.

Arvis, as he knew it, was either a verdant summer or a placid snowy winter. In the spring of his twelfth year, he inherited the title of Duke after the death of his father. And the next summer, he enrolled at a school in the capital. From then on, he spent the spring and autumn in Ratz and the summer and winter in Carlsbar, leading a life divided between the two cities.

“Duke, it’s been a while since you spent the autumn at Carlsbar, hasn’t it?”

The driver who was watching Matthias as he gazed out the window, carefully asked.

“Yes, that’s true.”

Matthias nodded with an autumnal smile as he recalled his eleven-year-old autumn memory. A very long time had passed, but his life seemed scarcely different between then, and now.

He was reared as the family’s heir from his birth and was groomed to succeed his father as the Duke of Herhardt. It was a life mapped out in advance; only his turn had come sooner than planned. And the same circle would apply to Herhardt’s future heir, whom he and Claudine would have. As was his life, which paralleled his father’s.

Matthias drew his gaze from the car window where the unfamiliar autumn landscape was unfolding. The car shortly came to a stop at the annex’s pier. When the driver opened the backseat door, he was greeted by the children’s laughter and chit-chat.

After getting out of the car, Matthias looked in the direction of the sound. The little children he had seen this morning were merrily strolling along the riverbank. The gardener was following them, and….. Leyla.

Her radiant smile resembled the fall sunshine.

They met each other’s eyes the moment she turned her head away from the children. She was dressed in a wide lace collared top and a maple-red skirt. Her teacher outfit looked great, but everything else about her was clunky.

Matthias buttoned up his suit and walked into the autumn sun.

“Oh. Is that Duke Herhardt?”

Mrs. Grever asked, taken aback while staring at Matthias approaching them. She was a mother of two and the upper class’s homeroom teacher.

“Oh my god, this is my first time seeing him this close! He’s even more handsome in person than the picture in the newspaper!”

She muttered in a lively tone, not giving Leyla a chance to answer.

Mrs. Grever’s jovial reaction made Leyla realize Duke Herhardt’s notable reputation. The citizens admired and respected him, whose face was often featured in publications. But in her eyes, Matthias Von Herhardt was nothing more than a psychopath.

“By the way, Miss Lewellin….”

Mrs. Grever was about to speak when Matthias stood in front of them.

“Hello, Duke.”

Bill, who was busy bickering with the children, hurriedly approached them and greeted him which also made Mrs. Grever join in. Still soured by his jerk behaviour last weekend, Leyla belatedly bowed her head.

‘Damn it! I should have thrown those tubers at him!”

She walked home from the greenhouse that day with terrible feelings. Even if she could rewind time, she wouldn’t dare to commit such impudence~ That’s what she had to tell herself to quell her frustration

“Would you like to introduce this person to me, Miss Lewellin?”

Matthias asked her nicely as Leyla had lifted her head. His gentlemanly regal and courteous manners astounded her. He seemed to be a totally different person.

‘Others’ impressions of Duke Herhardt will always be like this.’

That insight amazed her.

“Le… Leyla?”

The confused Bill patted her on the back.

“Hmm? Ah… Yes, Duke.”

Leyla apace came to her senses and took a perfect stance, clasping her hands beneath her navel. She decided not to lose her temper because she failed to throw the tubers at him. She set out to prove to the Duke that she had polished herself into a decent adult, no longer like a forest child he could just pester around at whim.

Leyla introduced Mrs. Grever to him in a professional manner. She also patiently explained to the wondering children who Duke of Herhardt was. Leyla decided to go along with her children’s adoration of him, even if she couldn’t agree with most of what they said. If she had to tell the truth about what a terrible person he was, she would have to use offensive words that no child should ever hear.

“Thank you so much for allowing us to have an autumn picnic, Duke.”

Leyla stood confidently before him, with her shoulders straightened and chin slightly up, proud of her performance.

“Thanks to you, the children are having a great time.”

She also gave a soft emphasis on the term ‘children’ to underline her position as a teacher.

“Really?”

Matthias’ lips rose slightly as she spoke.

“The one who is having a good time seems to be Miss Lewellin.”

“… Pardon?”

“….”

Matthias stayed quiet at her question. He did little more than snicker at her boggling expression and greeted Mrs. Grever and the kids’ goodbye with his gentlemanly persona that was able to mask his twisted personality.

Matthias, his aide, and the driver then reversed and left the scene. Leyla stood silently watching their backs as they approached the riverfront annex. She did lose her understanding of his words until Mrs. Grever gave her the answer.

“Um… Miss Lewellin….”

“Yes!”

“Your head…”

“Hmm?”

A little coy, Mrs. Grever pointed over her head.

“Head? What’s wrong with my head….”

Leyla’s bewildered face creased in a tick as she felt the soft touch of flowers and grass leaves on her head.

Flower crown!

There was a flower crown adorning her head. Monica, her youngest and closest student, had put the wildflower wreath she’d fashioned as Uncle Bill had taught her.

Mrs. Grever felt awful for not telling her. “I was about to tell you, but Duke Herhardt suddenly came.”

Leyla was stone-faced. She was unable to speak and just blinked.

‘So I pretended to act like an adult while wearing this.’

A rush of shame overtook her. She almost yelled out the curse words Uncle Bill often used if it weren’t for the children.

“It’s okay, teacher.”

Monica, the child who gave Leyla the flower crown, cheered her on lovingly.

“You look pretty! Like a princess.”

The other children agreed with Monica and nodded their heads together.

Ha.. Ha.. Ha


Leyla seemed to know too well why Uncle Bill was laughing so wildly. If one could die of shame, she was willing to fall deeply asleep on this beautiful autumn day.

“There’s nothing to be ashamed of.” Bill delightedly patted her back. “It was just a little embarrassing, but it’s not like you committed a crime or anything like that.”

At his words that weren’t comforting at all, Leyla’s cheeks bloomed crimson as a ripened apple. Then, out of the blue, an even more shockingly bad ordeal befell her.

“Mr. Remmer! Miss Lewellin!”

Mark Evers, who had left with the Duke earlier, returned with a sprightly smile.

“The Duke has invited the picnicking children to his annex. He wants to have tea with everyone. Of course, together with the two teachers and you too, Mr. Remmer.”

“Woaaaaaaaa!”

The frenzied child’s cheering could be heard echoing through the forest. Mrs. Grever’s jaw hung open, and Bill didn’t seem to dislike the Duke’s invitation.

In everyone’s thrills, Leyla looked blankly up into the sky, grabbing the flower that crowned her head.

She knew shame couldn’t kill a person, but she prayed at least it could knock her out.

Leyla earnestly begged, yet her mind was as clear as the dazzling blue of an autumn’s sky.


Chapter 46







The Moment Our Eyes Met







The chatty, and loud children who had been laughing until their ears hurt became surprisingly calm at the moment they entered the annex. Their eyes twinkled with delight as they looked around the house but couldn’t dare to make jokes and fool around like before.

Leyla had to appease the frightened Monica first, so she was the last to enter the annex, and the servants welcomed the Duke’s young guest with the same servility they gave to the VIP guests.

“This way, please.”

One of the servants promptly escorted the waiting children from the guest lounge to the living room. Inside, Matthias was sitting there with his back against the window overlooking the river—he had been waiting for them to arrive.

Leyla held her breath as she walked into the place riddled with horrible, embarrassing, and humiliating memories.

“Thank you so much for your kindness in allowing us to visit Arvis, Duke.”

Mrs. Grever was effusive in her thanks, and her vivacity put Leyla at ease. She hoped her-teacher-friend would take the role as the Duke’s converser, so she could sit quietly like the room’s furniture and leave the place when the pleasantries were over.

“Rather, I should be thankful to all of you for accepting my sudden invitation.”

Matthias welcomed them as he rose from his seat. The window’s backlight cast a shadow over his face, but it amplified the sense of his presence.

“Teacher… it hurts.”



Monica’s whispers startled Leyla, who was staring blankly at his silhouette.

“My hand hurts.”


Monica moaned in pain. Leyla’s eyes widened as she realized she was gripping the child’s hand too tightly.

“Ah, sorry. I’m so sorry, Monica.”

She massaged Monica’s wrist in a panic, and at the time, the door flew open to the balcony facing the riverside.

The scent of fresh water was wafting from the opened door. Leyla swiveled to face the view. A sumptuous tea table which was set up in the sun-drenched terrace and the white tablecloth that gently swayed along with the wind, captured her eyes in a blink.

“Let’s go.”

Matthias’ gaze flew from Leyla to Mrs. Grever. The teacher accepted his escort by lightly placing her hand on his arm with her blushing cheeks.

The astonished children who had never had a tea-time of this kind, happily followed the Duke with a zealous expression on their face. Leyla walked with Monica in tow and was the last to head to the balcony.

“Woah, Teacher! I feel like I’m becoming a princess!”

As she walked onto the balcony, Monica rolled her eyes, and her innocent face glowed with adoration. Leyla couldn’t debate the child’s praises, as the vibrantly colored assortment of bites that was served on the balcony’s table looked quite appetizing. It was amazing to think about how promptly they had everything ready.

She caught sight of the bouquet of Baby breath flowers, and red asters gracing the table’s centrepiece. There were teacups and exquisite silverware on the table, much too many for the rural schoolchildren. And the scenic beauty of Schulter River beyond the railing was the perfect setting for their afternoon meals.

A beam of sunlight hit her slender glasses frame and shattered like shrapnel. Matthias’s eyes wandered throughout those shards of light…

The jewel-blue flowing river….The daughter of the sky—Bright white sun…

And….The sea of trees, beneath a garland of scarlets and golds.



In the autumn moment of Arvis, where all the beautiful colors of nature were at their most vivid,

Their eyes met….




Monica was delighted over the moon. She roistered endlessly at how pretty the annex was, of how handsome the duke was, and the tasty cake she had eaten. That child couldn’t stop herself from extolling everything.

“Woaaa!”

This time, that child was hooked on by the scoop of ice cream. Her eyes sparkled at the ice cream dish, and she hurriedly reached out her hand to Leyla sitting beside her.

Leyla gave a surprised look, and Monica whispered,

“Teacher, it tastes like clouds.”

Leyla blinked a few times before catching on to what the child was trying to say. With a smile, she took a napkin and gently wiped Monica’s lips to clean the ice cream smudge on her lips.

Monica had just started school this year. She was physically smaller than her peers, a scaredy-cat, and still a shy girl. Her introverted nature made it difficult for her to socialize with other children. She used to cry, wanting to go back home every day. And for the first few weeks, Leyla had an uphill struggle to cope with that child.

But now, she was Leyla’s best disciple among her classmates. After learning that Monica’s mother died from an illness last spring, Leyla had a deeper understanding of the child’s heart.

“Teacher, you should try it too.”

“No, Monica. Teacher is fine.”

Leyla scrupled for a moment. But she maturely refused. Albeit, there was no law prohibiting adults from eating ice cream, she didn’t want to seem childish in front of the Duke by eating the ice cream that was prepared for the children only.

Leyla took another sip of the half-cold tea as she eavesdropped on the ongoing table talk. Mrs. Grever was leading the conversation with a bubbly attitude, just as she wished.

Meanwhile, ridding her mind of its load, Leyla threw a glance at Matthias, who sat at the head chair. He was listening attentively to Mrs. Grever. His brief replies and smile presented impeccable courtesy. Strangely enough, by displaying such a perfect turn, the other people could sense his dominance and classiness in the relationship. All of his gestures were haughty but graceful at the same time.

Like a researcher, she observed Matthias intently when Monica suddenly stood up and approached her with a bowl of ice cream.

“Teacher… teacher! This ice cream is so delicious. Please try it?”


When her tiny hand was tugging her sleeve, Leyla flinched and pulled back. Monica dropped the ice cream bowl and it splattered all over her skirt. The loud fuss drew the attention of everyone seated at the table to her.

“I-I’m sorry teacher!”

Monica blanched when the bowl fell to the hardwood floor, covering her teacher’s skirt with ice cream.

Tears slowly crept out of her eyes.

“Don’t cry, teacher is fine.”

Leyla smiled and quickly wiped the ice cream with the napkin to soothe the child. Meanwhile, the maids reached them quickly and rushed to wipe the wet floor.

Leyla was flustered after taking a look at her sticky hands and stained skirt. Seeing that, Matthias gestured at the maid standing close to her and she hurriedly ushered Leyla into the powder room.

Monica was about to burst into tears when Leyla left the terrace, but luckily Bill Remmer calmed her down. At the same time, Mark Evers discreetly approached.

“Duke, Count Klein wants to have a call with you.”



The more she rubbed it, the larger and more stubborn the ice cream stain became on her skirt.

Leyla gave up and just washed her hands and face. By luck, she was wearing a dark-colored kilt, which helped a lot in hiding the stain.

She carefully turned off the sink’s gold faucet and checked her reflection in the mirror. Her cheeks were blushing red from a fruitless effort to remove ice cream stains off her skirt.

She tidied her droopy hair and took a breath before leaving the powder room. It wasn’t long before she tensed up again, a heavy feeling in her stomach as she saw the Duke leaning against the hallway wall leading to the living room. Matthias looked at her, smiling when she gasped.

‘Damn.’

A frown appeared on her face, and she looked around. There was no one else here, and her mind whirled, alarmed of what could happen next.

‘Don’t tell me he’s been waiting for me….’

After several minutes had passed, he remained standing there, nonchalantly staring at her. A sneer sneaked out the corner of his lips, a satirical grin that those who lauded him as a faultless aristocrat would never know. And every time he cracked a smile like that, Leyla knew something bad was going to happen to her.


Ominous hunch overwhelmed her. She gulped, her shaking hands clenched, waiting for him to get out of the way. But Leyla decided not to waste time that would cause an unnecessary misunderstanding.

Without letting go of her guard, she took a watchful stride forward. Matthias, still leaning against the wall, kept his eyes intact on her. And once she got closer, he blatantly stood in the middle of the corridor.

Seeing her flinch in fear and step back from him, Matthias’ chuckle grew louder.

After a short phone call from Count Klein, without a particular reason, he went in the opposite direction instead of going back to the balcony. He simply had the urge to wait for her since she hadn’t yet returned. Just in case something interesting happened to her. Exactly just like right now.

Leyla approached him with a straight face, as if marching to a battlefield. She intended to avoid him, but the hallway was incapacious.

As she walked right next to him, Matthias slightly stuck out his leg. Leyla reflexively backed off.

‘Dodged it!’

But her joy soon turned into shame when he just pretended to move to change his posture. She now looked like an idiot-jumping rabbit in front of the upright and elegant Duke.

Matthias snickered and took a spin around as if nothing had happened. Alone in the hall, Leyla stayed still until he entered the living room and was no longer in her sight.

A liar—She would undoubtedly be labelled as such if she told everyone about Duke Herhardt’s absurd personality.

‘No.’

Leyla tossed aside the thought and walked into the living room. Upon reaching the balcony, she saw him acting normal, like a model gentleman. He had a warm conversation with Mrs. Grever, and a smile never left his face.

“Oh, welcome back, Miss Lewellin!”

Mrs. Grever was pleased when she came back.

“Let’s go boating!”

“Boating?”

“The Duke said he’d lend our kids his yacht. Isn’t it wonderful to have a boat ride in that beautiful river?”

“Uhm… But I….”

Leyla shot her uncle a worried gaze, and Bill stepped forward.

“My apologies, Duke, but Leyla is very afraid of water. It’ll be hard for her to get on the boat.”

“Ah. I see.”

Matthias pretended to be saddened by the story, although he had seen her drowning in the same river a year ago.

“Then Ms. Lewellin, you can take a rest here.”

‘He… Why is he showing such consideration now?’

While his unexpected concern perplexed her, the children bolted off the balcony, accompanied by the Duke’s servant.

“Yes, Miss Lewellin. I’ll go, so you can stay here.”

“Yes, don’t worry Leyla. I’ll take care of those little ones.”

Bill smiled and took Monica’s hand from Leyla’s. That child was scared and wanted to weep every time she saw Bill, but she was willing to follow him out of the blue.

“Thank you, Mr. Grever and Uncle Bill too.”

Leyla felt embarrassed but thanked them for their kindness. They were nice people, unlike the enigmatic Duke. Apart from that, she also felt lucky to be able to stay away from the Duke.

However, as she waited, Matthias didn’t get up from his chair.

She gave him a confused look.

Matthias remained in his seat even after everyone had left. She then realized that the Duke canoeing with the village kids would be odder.

Realizing that she had made a grave choice, Leyla leapt from her seat. The two boats carrying the children had already departed the bottom floor’s boat hangar and headed towards the river. The servants were tirelessly rowing while Uncle Bill and Mrs. Grever kept an eye on the children in separate boats.

“Teacher! Teacher! Teacher!”

The children laughed and waved their hand at her, who was standing beyond the railing.

“Teacher, I’ll be back!”

Even the timid Monica grinned with excitement.

She could no longer catch up with the children. She was engrossed in her despair when a voice as cold as a river wind, suddenly broke the silence.

“Sit down.”

Leyla jerked back. Matthias was looking at her with his legs crossed.

“Leyla.”

He smiled, calling her name as if he was humming along to the tune.



Chapter 47




The Duke Laughed







A white pigeon flitted from the other side of the river.

“… Phoebe?”

Leyla gasped in disbelief.

“Phoebe!”

She blurted out its name when the bird grounded on the balcony railing. One of its legs was tied with a red thread. It was unmistakably her carrier bird, Phoebe.

“Why did you fly here?”

She went up to the railing where Phoebe was resting.

Phoebe’s role as a letter-deliverer came to an end with Kyle’s departure. These days, the bird has become her cherished pet. When the Duke went out for upland hunting, she always confined Phoebe in a cage. But, on the other days, she let that pigeon to roam freely around the Arvis forest.

“You can’t come here. Here is… .”

Leyla darted a wary look towards the Duke. They met eyes as his gaze swiveled from the children’s boat to her.

“Phoebe?”

His mention of Phoebe made her flinch.

“So the bird’s name is Phoebe?”

“Do you know Phoebe?”

“Well…” Matthias tilted his head. “Just ask the pigeon.”

“Pardon?”

“Didn’t you claim you understood the bird’s mind.”

“That’s…”

Leyla was tight-lipped, unable to say anything more than a grimace. Matthias felt quite satisfied upon seeing her bite her lips because she couldn’t debate him.

With her back fully turned, Leyla whispered a few more words to her bird as if they could communicate with each other, but Matthias was certain she was mocking him without needing to hear her mutter.

Phoebe began gliding towards the other bank of the river. After the bird was out of her sight, Leyla returned to her chair with a sense of alertness. She looked at Matthias with some trepidation before deciding to speak.

“I’m sorry, Duke.”

She abruptly uttered words out of context.

“I apologize in Phoebe’s stead for recklessly entering your annex and leaving.”

“You’ll apologize in the bird’s stead?”

“Yes.” Leyla gravely replied to his scoff. “I don’t know why it came here, but I’ll train it to make sure that this never happens again. So… so… Duke.”



She began to sweat; her fear was audible.

“Please …..Please don’t shoot Phoebe.”

Only fear remained deep in her eyes as all her bewilderment and curiosity dwindled. Matthias kept mum, his crooked smirk on his lips seeming to fade as he stared into hers.

“….”

“Please…”

As his silence prolonged, her tone was heavily laden with desperation.

“Of course, I know you are Arvis’s owner, but Phoebe….”

Leyla kept pleading though her pride was in pain. She was ready to beg once again but a servant appeared in front of them, pushing her to clamp her trembling lips.

Matthias left the balcony after the servant informed him he got a phone call from the company’s lawyer. Leyla hardly took her eyes off of him through the window. Her mind was imprinted with the horrors of his countless bird-killings. She couldn’t relax unless he promised that he wouldn’t shoot Phoebe.

Matthias returned shortly after.

Leyla no longer avoided his eyes like she used to; instead, she stared at him with persistence.

“Duke, Phoebe… .”

“I’m not interested in your bird.”

Matthias flatly cut off her vexing pleas. She heaved,

“What do you mean?”

“A target that doesn’t run away. It’s boring.”

“Then are you not going to shoot?”

Leyla’s eyes sparkled brighter, revealing hope and optimism. Her piercing gaze put Matthias in exasperation. Ever since Leyla Lewellin set her foot in Arvis, this was the first time they had eye contact that lasted this long.

“What do you think?”

Matthias asked back without averting his gaze.

He had no intention of hunting the carrier bird in the first place, but he was unwilling to give her a straightforward answer. For the first time he saw her like that: willingly clinging to him in order to beg for something.

“I don’t think you will shoot.”

“Why?”

“That’s because.. You’re a gentleman.”

‘Pfft…You only call me a gentleman when you’re at a disadvantage.’

Matthias let out a vexed laugh at her hasty and brash answer. Leyla hurriedly added onto her words in anxiety.

“I don’t think you’re the type of person to hunt boring targets.”

“Really?”

“Yes.” Leyla nodded along with her praise. “You’re titled as the greatest marksman and gentleman in Carlsbar, I’m sure you won’t shoot Phoebe.”

Seeing her squirming as she talked, Matthias’s laughter suddenly cracked up. The servants behind him exchanged conundrum glances, especially Mark Evers, his long-time assistant—he was the most stunned of the others at the balcony.

Not because Duke Herhardt didn’t laugh much. But those in his ‘immediate vicinity’ knew that his courteous laughs were mostly a display of civility towards others. Even as a little boy, if Mark Evers’ memory served him right, the Duke seldom laughed in a pleasant way.

The boats heading downstream now had turned their bows back to the annex. The children’s excited laughter and chatter mingled with his chortle.

Leyla seemed eager for a definite answer, but Matthias continued to stay silent. He did nothing more than spectate her as she repeatedly wetted her lips in a panic. And she spoke up first.

“Uh….. Duke?”

Both her voice and eyes wavered, but not in a fearful way. Matthias did think her rosy cheeks, flushed with anticipation, were very attractive. Her eyes and delicate poise stated she wasn’t trying to miss even the slightest of his facial expressions and body language.

Matthias changed his mind about answering and instead rang the bell. One of the house staff rushed into the living room at his errand and brought out an ashtray and a pack of cigarettes.

“Duke…?”

Leyla urged him on. She needed an answer.

Phoebe was a bird she had been raising from its fledgling age. Beyond everything, that bird was like a symbol of her and Kyle’s beautiful time they had spent together. She didn’t ever want to lose Phoebe, even if those days would never return.

Matthias took out a cigarette from the silver case and lighted it up. The thin layer of smoke slowly floated between their deliberate silence. The white puff played in her face. Matthias didn’t dislike her outlook, who only looked at him and begged him. It would be great if this moment could continue to last forever, he thought, quite pathetically.

‘Well, I should stop here for now.’

As he soon nodded his chin, Leyla’s eyes glistened.

” Phoebe….You’re really not going to shoot Phoebe, are you?”

Her questioning was very persistent.

Matthias turned aside and flickered his cigarette ash. After attentively watching his gesture, Leyla grasped his meaning and retreated without pestering him further.

She hardly believed his promise, but there were other servants on the balcony listening, so she felt positive Matthias would keep the promise he made with a lot of eyes watching him. She didn’t know or care about Matthias von Herhardt, yet she had that feeling of trust in him.

Leyla finally could sigh with relief and glance out of the railing, to the river beyond. The tranquility of the flowing river reflected the shadow of the forest with its autumnal leaves.

Her lips draped in a smile. She had managed to protect Phoebe, as well as her precious memories.

Her smile lit up as her relief grew.

Matthias’s eyes narrowed at her odd expression. ‘What good is it to guarantee the safety of a pigeon?’

He was unable to understand her, yet he couldn’t take his eyes off of her face.

The cigarette he was holding between his long fingers burned slowly. A sense of unidentifiable annoyance and anxiety rose within the smoke. Both satiety and hunger battled each other to overtake him. The uncomfortable and queer feeling he had was as vivid as the vibrant colours of the season, which dyed the entire world. And as vague as the dream of last night when he opened his eyes.

Matthias threw the cigarette in his hand into the ashtray. He was thirsty, perhaps from smoking a cigarette he didn’t enjoy, but instead of taking a glass of water, he took out a new one. The unlit cigarette’s tip loosely wrapped between his fingers slightly shook along with the wind.

Leyla turned her head when she felt his stare on her. A smile still lingered on her beaming face, an emotion that shined more vividly than anger and fear, shame and tears could ever have.

Matthias was pondering about what that emotion was when Leyla ripped away her smile with haste. She avoided his gaze and bowed deeply. She was only looking down at her fingertips, but Matthias felt quite humiliated at her actions.

Humiliation.

Leyla Lewellin had taught him the emotion that he now knew for sure.

‘Look at you now, Leyla’

Matthias unknowingly laughed in vain.

‘Now that you’ve reached your goal, you’re ignoring me again?’

He never knew Leyla Lewellin could act this sly. Her attitude was daft, yet it was also pretty cute. But her abrupt mood swings really displeased him.

Matthias squeezed his unlit cigarette and tossed it again into the ashtray.

After the sunshine-like mirth had disappeared, the terrace was just left in a dark shade.

The gloomy place….he didn’t like it.



The autumn picnic ended when the children were taken to school and safely returned to their homes.

Leyla noticed tiredness had strained over her body the entire day. Her muscles were drained which made her sleepy, but she was happy with her first picnic with the children. Ironically, the person she was most worried about, was the key factor to the success of their autumn picnic, Duke Herhardt.

“For the time being, I think Lady Brandt will be the most envied woman in the world.” Mrs. Grever sighed while walking beside Leyla. “She will have both that handsome gentleman and the whole of Arvis. The world is so unfair at times like this. Do you know when they are getting married?”

“I heard it’s around next summer.”

“It will be a grandiose wedding that will stir the whole empire. Ah. I really envy her.”

Leyla just gave a moderate smile at Mr. Grever’s overblown admiration.

They split ways at a downtown junction. Leyla returned to Arvis after buying an armful of groceries. She was going to cook a delicious dinner for Uncle Bill, who had provided her a great help.

‘I’m going to make lots of my Uncle’s favourite food.’

Impatience drove her steps faster. She started speed walking after entering the road leading to Arvis. But suddenly, her feet froze in the middle of the road when a middle-aged lady came from the opposite side. That woman also simultaneously stopped as she saw Leyla.

That person’s eyes was evocative of Kyle, Mrs. Etman..

Her hands, holding the grocery bag, turned pale.

‘What should I do?’

Leyla stood frozen in front of her eyes regardless of how hard she thought. It felt weird passing by her like a stranger but even weirder to greet her.

After much hesitation, Leyla dipped her head in greeting without uttering a word, and Mrs. Etman accepted it with a silent nod.

But as the stifling moment was about to end, Mrs. Etman opened her mouth.

“Leyla.”

Leyla swiveled in shock.

“It ended up like this, but I really don’t regret it.”

Mrs. Etman sighed as she stood in front of Leyla. Neither hostility nor guilt contained in her eyes—they were as lifeless as a clump of leaves.

“Even if my reputation fell to the ground and my relationship with Kyle turned sour, I still hindered your marriage. That’s all I need.”

“….”

Perhaps, Leyla would feel much better if Mrs. Etman’s tone was hostile.

Each word Mrs. Etman uttered calmly in a tired voice pierced her heart like a shard of glass.

After finishing what she had to say, Mrs. Etman started walking and passed her. The housekeeper, standing at a distance with a flustered face, followed her suit.

Leyla hurried her way after giving a silent salute to the housekeeper, who threw a look of consolation and compassion towards her.

She walked boldly and with a broad stride, then stopped like a toy with a loose spring.

She peered down at her two feet on the ground, stretched her hand, and took a deep breath.

‘Am I really a human?’

A sense of shame entered her thoughts.

Leyla slowly opened her closed eyes and started walking towards the cabin where Uncle Bill was waiting.


Chapter 48




Platanus Road




A white pigeon landed gently on the balcony’s railing.

Folding its wing, the bird naturally approached the feeder and pecked its food deliciously, doused in the golden light of the fading sun that seeped in between its white feathers.

“Phoebe.”

Matthias blurted out its name after seeing that bird perched on his window.

‘Phoebe’—‘What a grand name for such a bird.’

His sneer at that bird-crazed woman flowed softly like a sigh.

Matthias rose from his sofa and opened the balcony door. The river winds, blowing near the sunset, borne the damp and chilly air with them, playing in both up tempo gusts and gentle lulls.

When he went close, the pigeon continued to eat its feed, undisturbed. That docile bird’s personality contrasted sharply with that of its owner.

Softly, the evening came with the sunset while he was leaning against the railing. Matthias closed his eyes so he could hear the wind whispering. Their dulcet tones became a feast for his ears. The gentle rustling sound of the autumn leaves, falling and dancing in the quiet, beautiful forest bloomed like a soothing lullaby.

Everywhere he looked, he could only see Leyla in Arvis’s autumn.

He watched her diligently go to work by pedalling her bike and returning home with a tired face. In her spare time, she volunteered to do the gardener’s work and sometimes scoured the forest with her big basket to collect mushrooms and wild berries.



In his beautiful cage of Arvis, everything he had in this world stayed in its proper place.

That perfect world satisfied him. More than enough to erase the disillusionment he tasted last summer after helping Linda Etman stop Kyle and Leyla’s marriage.

‘Leyla….she should be where she deserved to be.’


As he opened his eyes, Matthias could feel a semblance of satisfaction spreading over his system like a pleasurable intoxication.

The stuffed pigeon soon left the balcony and flitted to the cottage, going back to its owner.

He believed that the bird would come here again tomorrow and the day after. He had no interest in the bird’s feelings, but he knew well how to tame it.

To earn that carrier bird’s heart, he just needed to provide the bird a safe place and let it eat to the fullest.

It was a trick he had honed while serving in the military. Soldiers often used carrier pigeons to deliver messages when communication devices were poor, or there was a risk of information being leaked to the enemy. He was currently using the same method the military bird trainers used to tame Phoebe.

Leyla’s carrier bird, Phoebe, realized there was no use in flying to Kyle Etman’s tightly shut window. A new food source had appeared, and the place was safe, so unhesitatingly, Phoebe would fly to his annex from now on. That bird was quite clever, unlike its foolish and clumsy owner.

Matthias looked at the flying bird and suddenly frowned. His memory slithered back to the autumn picnic day— when her smile faded to nothingness the moment their eyes met.

“But it’s probably a smile you’ve countlessly shown to the doctor’s son.”

The annex shade that shrouded the balcony became darker when his train of thoughts jumped to that conclusion.

Ever since Leyla was a child, never once had she smiled in front of him, nor could she hold back her tears.

So ….he made her cry.

If he couldn’t make her laugh, he would have made her cry.



Whether it was her smile or her tears, he was satisfied with everything about her.

If all he could give her were tears, then he would make her shed them.

He was also willing to break her heart.

‘But what if you could give me something else?’

These days, Matthias often falls into such a reverie. He no longer wanted to see her being scared or angry at him.


He simply wanted her to look only at him. Sometimes humoring him and smiling at him full of overwhelming bliss after he granted her wish.

Now….he knew his desire…

Leyla Lewellin….

He lusted for her…

All of her…

Everything about her….



“You’ve gained weight, Phoebe.”

Leyla tutted as she peered at Phoebe snuggling in her hands. She mistook it for a puff of thick feathers preparing for the winter, but as she got a closer look, it was apparent that Phoebe had gained some weight.

“Is it because it’s fall?”

Cuckoo… Cuckoo…. Cuckoo

Leyla kept questioning Phoebe, but the bird seemed to ignore her.

“Where are you eating now? You don’t even have Kyle now…”

Her last words, she unintentionally said, left her stunned. Tears welled up in her eyes, whenever his name came out.

‘No, it’s fine. Don’t cry.’

Leyla tried to keep her tears from spilling out of her eyes. They had promised to take care of themselves, and she would do her best to keep that promise.

She calmed herself down by taking a deep breath and then released her chubby Phoebe. That bird roamed around the yard for a while before flying to the far side of the forest.

It was an ordinary day.

She diligently finished her morning routine and went to work after seeing off Uncle Bill.

The sound of her winding bicycle chain clicking along the Arvis’ road, splendidly carpeted with autumnal leaves creating a noisy tune.

“Teacher!”

Students who recognized her waved their hands as she entered the road in front of the school.

Leyla dismounted her bike, greeted the children, and walked into the school.

It was an ordinary day, but she felt a bunch of happiness.

The children were much more obedient than usual, and they scored well on their mathematics and spelling tests. The languid warmth of the classroom she loved, the lunchtime chatter with Mrs. Grever she enjoyed, and the cloudless, high, bright blue sky beyond the window.

She smiled.

Leyla steeled her heart and smiled brightly every time she was reminded of Kyle at waking or on her way home from work.

But, as she got closer to Arvis, she could no longer ignore the memories she shared with him as they walked through the streets together.

Loneliness suddenly swallowed her up, taking what was once her inner light and replacing it with a darkness that overshadows each moment.

Layla stopped her bike on the sideroad. She felt helpless.

The myriad of memories gliding above the road snowballed into a deep regret.

They couldn’t live like brother and sister for the rest of their lives, as they weren’t related by blood. Nor could they live as best friends as man and woman. But they never knew their relationship was meant to end in separation from the very beginning.

They never once expected that they would love, get hurt, and become like this in the end…

As her vision began to blur, Leyla squirmed and bit her lip. She encouraged herself, closing her eyes as if she was enchanting a spell.

‘I’ll be fine. I’ll be fine for sure, so please take care of yourself, Kyle.’

Fortunately, she was able to contain her sobs and continue pedalling her bike.

A black car approached from afar and eventually brushed past her.



Matthias made the driver pull over the car at the entrance of Platanus road. After telling his aide to go back first, he was then left alone on the road, just like the day when last summer had begun.

He took a leisurely walk, waiting for the approaching figure. The fallen leaves rustled underneath his shoes.


When the sound of a bicycle running through the road was faintly heard, Matthias naturally slowed down his pace.

He turned around at the same time Leyla stopped her bike at an appropriate distance from him.

The expected scene unfolded before his still eyes; Leyla was in front of him, along with her bicycle.

“Hello, Duke …Herhardt.”

Leyla awkwardly greeted him after glancing around. Her braided, curled hair was half loose and fluttered in the wind. She didn’t seem to have a knack for dressing up as her hair was always tied too neatly or too loosely like today.

Still, he quite liked her clumsy appearance.

Matthias nodded his head in a straight posture, one hand behind his back. Leyla blinked her emerald eyes while holding tight her bike’s handlebars. Whatever she did, she always looked uptight whenever she encountered him.

“Well then…. Excuse me.”

After bowing, Leyla dragged her bicycle past him and kept walking.

“You have to act like a proper lady, Leyla.”

Matthias warned, staring at her back.

Leyla had just hopped on the saddle when she flinched and pulled back the bike she was about to pedal.

“You know that. If you want me to be a gentleman, you need to behave like a lady.”

Matthias slowly approached her, who could neither get off the bike nor step on the pedal. He continued,

“And I need to be a gentleman for your bird to be safe.”

Leyla immediately turned her head. She frowned and stepped off her bike. Matthias smirked as he tilted his head and peered down at her. Her moist eyes looked petrified, but her dainty twisted lips voiced displeasure and defiance.

‘What a cranky woman.’

After a long stare at her, who pathetically trembled at his joke, Matthias walked forward as if nothing had happened. Having no other choice, Leyla dragged her bicycle and followed him from behind with a heavy stride.

Matthias sighed and turned around. “I never asked for you to act as my maid.”


Leyla, who grimly looked down at her toes and followed him like a shadow, suddenly raised her head, taken aback.

“Yes? Ah… .”

Despite her stubbornness, she was smart enough to understand what he meant. She quickly took a couple more steps towards him. Her gloomy expression conveyed her displeasure, but they were still one step apart.

Matthias scoffed as he got his wish and stepped back.

As he began to walk again, Leyla carefully matched his pace. With a bicycle between them, they strolled side by side on the Platanus road.

There were no words spoken between them. The refreshing evening breeze was filled with only the sound of bicycle wheels spinning and falling leaves being tramped.

He was a man who walked very slowly with those long legs of his.

Leyla meekly glanced at him after turning her eyes at the road that seemed to be fading away. He was a languid man, but his pace was especially slow today.

She wasn’t sure whether she was feeling that way because of the awkward situation.

He was a man of similar height as Kyle, but he gave off a bigger, and domineering presence. She reasoned, it might’ve been because of his straight, elegant posture and distinctive eyes. His physical appearance also looked firmer and broader than Kyle.

‘Maybe that’s why he seems so different.’

Leyla made her own findings and deliberately moved her gaze upward. She observed his white, smooth hands, his dark grey suit, his delicately shaped tie, expressionless lips and his… eyes.

His sapphire eyes noticed her gaze and beheld her.

Leyla suddenly was seized with instinctive fear. She meant to bend her head, but her mind wandered elsewhere.

As he thoroughly looked into her eyes as if he was captivated, Matthias opened his lips.


Chapter 49




Like A Wing







“This hairstyle doesn’t suit you.”

Matthias immediately said the moment their eyes met.

His remark startled Layla. Momentarily bewildered, she mused over his words, grasping the mocking nature of it in an instant.

‘This man! Is he trying to pick a fight again?’

“I know. My hair is a little… untidy.”

Leyla said sharply, in response to his unsought criticism.

“A little?”

Matthias scoffed, eyes scrutinizing her from top to bottom. Under his disdainful stare, Leyla squeezed at her bike handles, fighting the urge to run away. Her inability to restrain the strange emotions stirring in her heart as she stood in front of him was already upsetting to her—Leyla refused to look like such an easy target, blushing at just the sight of a man.

“Why don’t you untie your hair?”

“I’d like to, but they said I won’t look like a proper teacher.”

“Who?” He asked, forehead creasing with suspicion.




“The headmistress,” Leyla replied. As his eyes lingered on her, she averted her gaze, cheeks heating up into a rosy red.

“She said that if I look too young, I wouldn’t seem like a teacher with authority.” She continued hesitantly, fearful that the profound silence between them would make things even more awkward. “So the headmistress advised me not to have a ‘student-like’ hairstyle.”

Matthias burst into laughter the moment she stopped speaking, a faint chuckle that sounded like a soothing breeze. Ears burning, she continued to avert her gaze, feeling like a fool.

With a scoff, Matthias looked down at the petite woman standing before him.

“So that windswept, tied-up hair is a symbol of a teacher’s authority…” he drawled, full to the brim with sarcasm. Hurt pride flashed across her face, and he dranked in the coy yet cute expression.

“I’m practising a lot, so I’ll get better at styling my hair soon.” Her quick retort, filled with the same pride he saw, left him momentarily transfixed.

‘This woman never wants to give in even if it kills her, doesn’t she?’

Amused by her persistence, Matthias smirked once more.

“Well then, let’s see.”

“I’m absolutely sure that I can do this. And if my skill doesn’t get any better…I’ll just cut it short.”

“Cut it?”

The beam fell off Matthias’s face at her words. When he saw Leyla nodding, absorbed in thought, his eyes narrowed as if he was witnessing something truly horrible.

“Yes. I’d look a lot more mature, and….”

“Don’t cut it.”

His demand was oddly soft and calm.



Puzzled and annoyed, Leyla shot him a look. “Don’t tell me, I need your permission to grow or cut my hair?” She groused.

“Your hair… it’s beautiful.”

It was a stupefying reply to an irate question that was nearly impossible to believe.

Above all…. It sounded ridiculous.

Doubting her ears, Leyla frowned at him. Matthias looked back at her, calm in the face of her agitation.

“It’s like a wing.”

His voice had taken on the same exact tone he had used to insult and hurt her with merely a single statement in the past, a cold bleakness that reminded her of winter.

Leyla could still recall how calm and unchanged his voice had been, even as he was calling her terrible slurs.


As she stood fuming in anger, her memory flashed back to the day of their first meeting. It had been a hot summer day when she first saw Duke Herhardt at the top of a tree, his voice cold yet eerily tranquil even as he came dangerously close to shooting a child.

His soothing voice had been imprinted in her mind ever since.

Clear as crystal, she remembered jumping down from the tree and running towards Uncle Bill’s cottage, crying out at the existence of such a human being.

‘The- There’s a man in the forest! A tall man!’

Struggling to catch her breath, the words poured out of her mouth, full of admiration in a way that only a child could have.

‘He has black hair, and his eyes are blue. And his voice is as light as a feather.’

At that moment, struggling to explain the texture of the voice that had left her smitten, the only image that came to Little Leyla’s mind was her most precious possession—the soft feathers that belonged to the riverbirds from Schulter River, which she had painstakingly collected during her many walks along its banks. Anything else would have came up short when compared to his voice.

Flustered by his bluntness, Leyla hurriedly avoided his gaze. Cruel and aimed to hurt her, Matthias’s words had made him the person she most feared and disliked— after all, it was the Duke Herhardt whom she knew of.

However, no matter how long she waited, Matthias stayed silent. Not a word or insult flew past his lips.

Instead, he simply walked away, leaving a bewildered Leyla behind. As the autumn leaves fluttered to the ground she fretted, wondering if his odd compliment was but a hallucination, brought on by the autumn leaves falling gently to the ground.

Her hair had cascaded down to her shoulders, strands fluttering in the cold autumn wind. Shaking away her thoughts, Leyla combed a hand through her hair. She flinched as a sudden gust of cold wind blew past her. Losing her grip on the handle, she tried to grab at it—only to crash into the ground with her bicycle in tow.

“Ackhh!”

Her scream blended with the thud of her bicycle colliding with the pavement, a cacophony in a quiet road.

Matthias grimaced as he watched Leyla struggle to stop her own bicycle from crushing her into a pancake against the dusty road, unaware of his lips quirking up into a laughing sneer the longer he watched.

“You trip and fall just like always, it seems.”

Leyla bit her lip in shame at his laughter. Oddly enough, it made her feel relieved.

‘Just laugh, harass me, and leave.’

Full of hope, she waited for him to do just that. As Matthias quietly pulled up her bike and walked towards her bag, which had landed far away from where she had fallen, her hopes began to falter, and it died completely when he brought it to her, kneeling at her side.

“Nnn…no-! No, it’s mine!” Leyla snatched the bag from Matthias in a blind panic when he attempted to pick her scattered belongings. “I-I’ll do it myself.”

Matthias’s brows scrunched together at her blatant hostility.

“I….I’ll do it,” Leyla mumbled. Lowering her eyes, she began to collect her belongings with trembling

hands, even though Matthias had done nothing to frighten her so.

Even though he was agitated by Leyla’s actions and quivering tone, Matthias decided to watch her patiently. Noticing her flushed cheeks and neck, he had an epiphany—it was merely emberrasment and shyness that made her shy back from him, nothing more.

Standing in front of her, Matthias’s looming figure casted a shadow onto Leyla’s dropped items. She appeared very distraught, he observed, gathering even roadside leaves and stones into her bags in her frantic scramble to gather her belongings. Oddly enough, the quirkiness of it all quelled Matthias’s ire.

When she had gathered all of her belongings into her bag, Leyla rushed to her feet. Oblivious to the dust that was all over her clothes and hands, she shot him a look.

“I know it’s rude, but Duke….”

Her eyes drifted between Matthias and the entrance to the mansion located on the opposite side of the road. Perplexed, she wondered what to do next.

“If it’s rude of me to go ahead of you, I’ll wait for you to leave first.”

Her words were bold, as if she no longer wanted to walk with him, but Matthias could see the anxiety in her eyes. She had a nosy attitude, but for once he tolerated it, knowing that he wouldn’t be able to walk alongside her after passing the entrance of the mansion.

“Go on.”

His permission surprised her.

“Me first?” She asked, full of confusion.

Matthias clicked his tongue in lue of an answer. Leyla’s face lit up, and she quickly lowered her head.

“Thank you, Duke.”

Matthias seemed offended with her excessive politeness, as if it was an affront to his very being.

Leyla made her way to the entrance. Before mounting her bicycle she halted in her tracks, turning back to the man with a frown, eyes full of suspicion. It was obvious that Matthias was being oddly kind towards her, but she still didn’t trust him. After a quick glance, she tilted her head and turned her back to him, riding off down the road.

“Should I have made her cry instead?”

Matthias’s regret came too late. Keeping a relatively pleasant expression on his face, he kept walking until something shiny on the ground caught his attention.

It was a pen.

A pen that belonged to a woman who fell and lost her belongings with ease.

Swiftly, Matthias picked it up. As he kept his gaze on the woman in question, his grip on the pen grew tighter. Momentarily, he considered stopping her.

Leyla was close enough that she could hear him if he called, but Matthias stayed silent instead.

He spun the pen with his long fingers as he strolled along the road. Meanwhile, Leyla, who was diligently cycling her bike, soon disappeared from sight beyond the Arvis’s gate.



“That bird came again.”

Smiling, Mark Evers informed the man seated facing away from the window.

Despite the lack of explanation, Matthias understood. He didn’t even bother to look at the window. He didn’t need to, not when it had happened so often that it had become a part of his daily routine.

It was time for ‘Phoebe’s’ visit; a pigeon that was much gentler and smarter than its owner.

Leaning against a chair by the fireplace, Matthias signed the last document required of him for the day, handing it to his aide. After his aide retreated from the room with the paper, he was left to his own devices in the living room.

Capping his fountain pen, Matthias glanced out of the window. Phoebe, as always, was seated on the railing, preoccupied with gulping down its food with gusto.

He looked away from the bird, gaze falling onto the thin pen in his hand. He examined it carefully, noting the pen owner’s name engraved in gold on the cap.

‘Leyla Lewellin.’


The pen appeared to be brand-new. It didn’t look like she had bought it with her own money, so it had likely been a gift from the gardener.

Matthias hoped so. He was sure that Leyla would do everything she could to get it back if it was a gift from Bill Remmer.

‘Would she have noticed by now?’

Matthias stared at the pen with a crooked grin. He uncapped the pen. Acting like a gentleman towards a woman who had praised him didn’t seem like a bad idea. Besides, it was time for the pigeon to pay for its own meal.

Matthias walked up to the balcony, folding a letter containing a single short sentence. Chuckling at the thought of the bird’s owner fleeing on her bicycle, he tied the letter onto the bird’s ankle, which leant its body docily towards him.

After Matthias made sure that the note was secure, he launched Phoebe into the sky.

And the carrier pigeon began to fly eagerly towards the gardener’s cottage.



Once the sun, gleaming like copper, settled behind the horizon, night came, along with Phoebe’s return.

Leyla was sitting and staring mindlessly at the empty desk when the sound of pecking on the window startled her. Turning her head, she called the bird in chidingly.

“Phoebe!”

Leyla hurriedly wrapped the shawl over her shoulders, standing from her chair. The chilly wind blew into the room as she threw open the window.

“Are you hungry? Wait a minute… huh?”

Her eyes widened with astonishment at the sight of the letter tied to Phoebe’s leg. She rubbed at her eyes, sure that she was seeing things, but the letter remained present on the bird’s leg.

“…Kyle?”

Without thinking, His name slipped from her lips, even though she knew it wasn’t him.

‘No, Kyle has already left. There’s no way anyone else would tie a letter to Phoebe’s feet.’

Leyla stared blankly at Phoebe. Hands trembling, she opened the letter. As she skimmed through the short sentence written in the letter, her countenance quickly changed from curiosity to dismay.

She gasped. The letter slipped from her fingers as she took an instinctive step back, fluttering gently onto the floor beneath the window.


Staring at the letter, eyes blinking rapidly, Leyla took a step back, then another until her back slammed against the closet, bringing her to her senses.

“I-It can’t be!”

Leyla mumbled shakily under her breath as she rummaged hastily through her bag. The pen she was searching for was nowhere to be found. Even more baffling were the stones and leaves inside her bag instead—she hadn’t the slightest idea how they had gotten inside her bag.

Leyla frowned and staggered back to the window, letter held in a hand that was now pale and wan like moonlight.

‘[Where’s your pen, Leyla?]’

Wrapping her arms around her head, she read the note Phoebe had brought in once more.

She sighed.

‘No way.’

No matter how many times she muttered the words, Leyla knew nothing would change.

Guu… Guuu… Guu…

In the pale white moonlight of an autumn night, Phoebe, the pigeon whom the Duke had fed to the point of rotundness, cooed calmly.


Chapter 50




For My Precious Cousin







Arvis was bustling with the preparations for Herhardt’s dinner party.

As Leyla walked home from school, the roads were swarming with carriages and vehicles. Uncle Bill had been extremely busy these past few days, engrossed in arranging flowers for the mansion’s interior. It was that time of the year when flowers start wilting, so he had to gather some from greenhouses and procure the rest from local flower gardens.

Leyla helped her uncle out by making frequent trips downtown to buy flowers. Her hectic days made her feel lucky; at the very least, she could forget about her missing pen and her unanswered letter from the Duke. But now that her work was done, she had to return to Arvis.

As the entrance to the mansion loomed closer, Leyla slowed her pace.

Fortunately, Duke Herhardt seemed to have brushed the matter aside. Or more likely, he didn’t have a chance to ponder over it. He, too, had been swamped with work lately, and Phoebe, who had been secretly communicating with him, was confined within a cage in the backyard.

“I can’t believe it.”

She had uttered these very words at least a hundred times since Phoebe brought in the Duke’s letter.

“How did he come up with the idea of taming Phoebe and using it as his carrier bird?”

She hadn’t lived a long life, nor was she acquainted with many people. However, within her lifetime, Duke Matthias von Herhardt was by far the most strange and yet enigmatic man Leyla Lewellin had ever come across.

“Why does he keep taking other people’s things? Is he a kleptomaniac?” Leyla kicked an innocent stone on the path as she grumbled.

She didn’t want to meet the duke, even though she needed to get her pen back. She didn’t really know why she was determined to avoid him even more now, but Leyla felt like she had to.


Just as Leyla was about to enter the mansion from a side entrance, a blaring honk startled her. She swivelled to see the Brandt family’s car park right in front of her.

As the back seat window slowly rolled down, Leyla approached the car with stiff steps.

“Leyla, long time no see.”

Sitting inside was the familiar face of Claudine Brandt.

“How have you been?” Claudine beamed, scanning Leyla from head to toe.

Leyla froze for a moment. A familiar sense of guilt, like that of a child who had made a grave mistake, gripped her tight. It was the same emotion she had felt last summer, on the day of Duke Herhardt and the Lady’s engagement ceremony. The memory of her first kiss being stolen by Claudine’s fiancé never failed to make her feel pathetic.

The Duke’s gentle voice, his soft laughter, and the touch of his firm, fervent hands flitted across her mind, but Claudine’s gaze brought her back to the present.

Clasping her frozen hands together, Leyla, as she’d always done, greeted Claudine with a polite bow.

“Hello, Lady Claudine.”



It was a surprise to no one that Herhardt’s dinner party had ended on a perfect note. Always the epitome of grace and elegance, the two hostesses of the party were consistent throughout. In the Berg Empire, the name Herhardt had earned the epithet ‘perfection’. A mishap in Herhardt’s dinner party would merely heighten everyone’s unbridled curiosity.

“Would it be alright if we took a walk in the greenhouse for a while?”

Claudine politely asked Elysee after everyone had moved on to chat in the living room. Standing on the other side of the room were the people Claudine had referred to – her fiancé and her cousin.

“Of course, go ahead.” Elysee von Herhardt readily consented. “You young people do need to spend some time together.”

With her subtle tone, the ladies surrounding Elysee burst into laughter in tandem, as if they were dancing in rhythm.




Claudine exited the living room and Matthias together with Riette followed suit, leaving behind the ladies who began gossiping about the youngsters’ love affairs.


“Oh, Duke Herhardt, Madam Norma granted me permission to expand this greenhouse when I become the Duchess of Arvis,” said Claudine, her radiant voice permeating the tranquil greenhouse in the dark.

“I see.”

Matthias’s lips twitched with a faint smile.

“What do you think?”

“I’ll go along with whatever my Lady wishes.”

Claudine already knew what Matthias would answer, but she still nodded with a pleasant smile. “You can look forward to it. I’m confident that I can truly love this magnificent greenhouse, Arvis’ Heaven.”

Claudine walked along the pathway with a spring in her step. Although she was being escorted by her fiancé, most of her conversations ended up revolving around Riette.

“Master.”

Claudine had just begun talking about what tropical plants to grow in the expanded greenhouse when a servant arrived to see Matthias. Someone had sought him out to discuss business-related matters.

“Come back quickly.” Claudine smiled as she let go of her fiancé’s arm. “I’ll continue my walk with Riette.”

“I always end up as the Duke’s substitute for my dear Lady Brandt.”

Despite his grumbling, Riette willingly lent his arm to Claudine.

After Matthias and his servant departed, Claudine and Riette were the only ones left in the greenhouse, surrounded by the soft lull of the flowing fountain.

They resumed their prior discussion as well as their stroll. Claudine’s visualization of expanding the greenhouse was quite specific; she had already made up her mind about which particular plants to import and how to landscape them.

“It seems like you’ve already become Duchess Herhardt. Your love for Arvis exceeds your love for your fiancé,” Riette surmised as he turned to look at her after listening to her ideas.

Claudine nodded without a hint of shame. “Either way, I’m still showing love for Herhardt.”

“You two really are something.”

Riette’s laugh was one of defeat.

“Matthias is pretty cold, are you okay with that?”

“What do you mean?”


“Duke Herhardt doesn’t love anyone. He never loved you before, doesn’t love you now, and will never love you in the future.”

“Which prestigious nobleman marries for love?”

“Some do! It would surely happen if Lady Brandt would simply become my wife.”

As usual, Riette kept his expression and tone light and casual. Claudine just flashed a smile in response.

“Riette, I’ve been going in and out of Arvis with my mother for ten years.” Claudine turned to look at Riette. “Do you know what that means?”

“It means, for ten years now, the aristocrats of this empire have already fancied you as Duchess Herhardt.”

“Right, Riette, this is why I like you.”

Claudine laughed softly and placed her hand back on Riette’s arm.

Riette calmly escorted his cousin. The subtle tension between them soon disappeared as their casual conversation and laughter flowed back in.

“I also want to raise a peacock after I expand this place.”

Claudine changed the topic while observing the birds in the greenhouse. “Is this the birth of a bird-loving couple?” Riette asked sarcastically. “Riette!”

“The bird is still there, by the way. That pretty little bird who dwells in the Duke’s bedroom.”

“I don’t mind. Duke Herhardt ought to have at least some small pleasures. We should respect his wishes.”

“I hope it stays just at that.”

“It’s not worth your worries. No matter how pretty it is, you can’t bestow the title of Duchess to a bird, Riette.”

“Well, that’s true.” Riette failed to refute. No matter how much Matthias adored the canary, a bird was just a bird. “Do you know how long a canary lives? Does it have a long life?” He asked.

Claudine tilted her head, “I don’t know, but I hope that noisy bird doesn’t live too long.” “Didn’t you just say that we should respect the Duke’s small pleasures?”

“Yes, but if that bird dies, there will be another bird who’ll entertain Duke Herhardt.”


“Claudine, I truly want to give my blessings to you and Matthias.” Riette laughed absent-mindedly as he gazed at Claudine’s face, “You two are such a perfect match.”

Riette felt a brief pang of pity for Matthias’s little bird. The poor bird was bound to hover around the well-matched couple helplessly.

Claudine’s lips lifted to a natural smile. Seeing her cruel, yet beautiful face, Riette blurted out, “Should I become acquainted with that bird for my precious cousin?”

“I didn’t know you had that kind of hobby.”

“She’s not my cup of tea, but she’s still pretty.”

“It won’t be easy.” Claudine giggled as if she were having a lot of fun. “That bird may look pretty, but she has the pride of a princess.”

“Hah. Do I look like the type to easily fail?”

“No… but I’m indeed curious. Will you be able to become friends with that haughty bird?”

Claudine was no longer smiling, her features as cold as the window panes reflecting the moonlight.

“If you succeed, I’d be happy to send you a congratulatory gift.”

“What gift?”

“Isn’t gratitude and love enough?”

Their ostentatious smiles dissipated as the pair’s intense stare-down grew profound.

“Not bad.”

As the door to the greenhouse opened, Riette let out a low sigh and the pair made their way forward.

Matthias had returned.



Neither the carrier bird nor Leyla had returned. Everything was exactly the same as it had been prior to him sending the letter.

Matthias scoffed as he looked up at the sky, where the white pigeon used to flit about. He laughed coldly, bitter and borderline angry.

“You can go back now.”

Matthias declared to the servant waiting in front of his balcony door.

“Then I’ll be waiting in front of the annex when it’s time for departure.”

Mark Evers left a polite greeting and returned with the rest of the staff.

Left to his own devices, Matthias let his mind wander as he looked down at the tranquil river below his balcony. He believed that Leyla had been too preoccupied with assisting the gardener recently. But now… that was no longer the case.

After lifting his cuff to check his watch, Matthias paced up and down his balcony. There was still some time left before his afternoon appointment. Also, it was the weekend, so Leyla Lewellin would probably be in her cabin.

Thus, he deduced a fair conclusion and decided to follow through with his plan without hesitation.

Matthias walked down the riverside and entered a forest path carpeted with fallen leaves.

He was filled with regret.

It flooded through him hot and thick, darker than the colour of autumn leaves.

‘I should’ve hurt her until she cried.’

However, he soon found Leyla Lewellin. She was hanging laundry near the cottage’s fences. She looked very calm and relaxed, enough to make Matthias seem foolish for restlessly waiting around for the past week.

Matthias stood still and watched her with discretion. Leyla continued hanging the clean bedding, her attention entirely focused on her task. She pulled left and right, pulled once again, and then twisted the sheet tight until it was dry enough to hang.

Her proud smile added to Matthias’ bewilderment.

‘Ha… Would you look at that?’

Lately, he’d been thinking about those words often. She was annoyingly cute yet ferocious, and she always amused him with her quirky attitude. Matthias felt frustrated with himself for being so disarmed by her.

Leyla turned around just as Matthias took a step forward. Her body stiffened like a pole as soon as she saw him. So far, he had thought her actions were very adorable, but Matthias now decided to change his outlook.

Leyla swivelled and started running. When she disappeared beyond the yard, Matthias realized that she was running away from him.

“That woman…”

The sight of her running away as if she had seen a ghost made Matthias scoff. It was amusing to watch and more amusing to think that she believed she could dare run away from him.

He withheld his sentiments for now. After he stopped laughing, Matthias began to chase her.

Leyla ran out of the yard and towards the harvesting fields on the opposite end of the Schulter river. Matthias’ strides grew longer, and the gap between the pair narrowed. Leyla looked back in fear, and then… she stumbled.

She finally got caught under a willow tree near the river. Leyla struggled against him, but Matthias had grasped onto her shoulders tight and caged her between the tree trunk and his body. His hands were blazing as he aggressively grabbed her matted hair.

When he looked down, Matthias was greeted by the sight of a tearful Leyla.

He smiled.

“Where are you going, Leyla?”
















Chapter 51




Are You A Crow?







‘Insane.’

Leyla belatedly recalled a stark realisation about him.

‘Yes. Duke Herhardt is insane.’

“Ouchhh!”

“You must answer me when I ask you a question.”


Leyla’s breathing was ragged as Matthias smirked and tugged at her hair. Unlike the time he chased and slammed her against the tree trunk, his touch was gentle. However, the shame and apprehension of being dragged by the hair muddled her mind and prevented her from noticing his loosened grip.

“Leyla.”

His voice sounded huskier.

Leyla tried to step back, but the tree trunk blocked her escape. Although they had both run for quite a while, Matthias’ breathing had already stabilized. Meanwhile, Leyla kept panting erratically. As her chest heaved up and down, the sensation of his towering, firm body grew apparent, further adding to her shame.

“Why…”

Leyla shoved his shoulder roughly, her voice shaking.



“Why are you doing this to me?”

Realizing that her two arms’ strength alone won’t be enough to push him away, she twisted her body with all her might.

Matthias pressed his chest closer against hers, amused by her futile attempts. He looked pleased to see Leyla’s helplessness at the state of their intertwined bodies.

“Don’t question. Answer me.”

He looked into her glare, eager and waiting.

“Answer me, Leyla.”

Matthias fiddled with a strand of Leyla’s golden hair, slowly wrapping it around his finger. The soft texture of her locks somehow alleviated the displeasure that had consumed him over the past week. It even managed to water down his irritation from Leyla’s lack of response.

“Don’t you think it’s unladylike to not answer?”

“….”

“Leyla.”

“….”

“Leyla Lewellin.”


Matthias’ grip on her hair gradually gained strength. Overcome with a foreboding feeling, Leyla finally opened her lips in a bout of anger.

“I don’t know what you’re talking about!”

“Didn’t my letter arrive?”



“I don’t know.”

“Leyla, you better think carefully before you speak.” Matthias’ lips spread to a wide grin seeing Leyla’s eyes tremble with fear. “What do you think I’ll do with a useless carrier bird that can’t even deliver a letter properly?”

“You- you promised!” yelled Leyla, “You promised not to shoot Phoebe!”

“Did I?”

“Duke!”

“I can’t seem to understand what you’re talking about.”

Matthias grew more mischievous with the woman who stumbled over her clumsy lies, failing to hide her nervousness. Leyla glared at him briefly before lowering her trembling eyelids.

“…Sorry.”

“For what?”

“You already know.”

“For ignoring my letter, running away, or lying?”

Leyla flinched as he pointed out each of her mistakes. She looked particularly lovely when she was docile, and Matthias regretted not being able to see her downcast, glassy eyes.

“I’m sorry…”

“That’s enough apologizing.”

Matthias raised her chin. His touch was careful. It had the tenderness of someone handling something delicate. Yet, Leyla shivered at his mere touch. He didn’t mind her reaction though; he was already content with her looking at him.

“I guess that pen means nothing to you since you’re acting like it doesn’t exist.”

“No, it’s precious to me! But…”

As Leyla turned to look away, Matthias captured her dainty chin again, turning her gaze back to him.

“But?”

He didn’t want the conversation to be avoided any further. Leyla finally admitted defeat, with her face and hair firmly locked within his grasp. She let out a sigh of resignation.

“I really don’t understand you.”

Leyla’s serene, emerald eyes held Matthias’ gaze. Reflected in her beautiful eyes that resembled the lush greens of eternal summer was his shadow.

“Why do you keep stealing my things?”

Matthias’ eyebrows shot up upon hearing her chastising tone, like that of a teacher disciplining a naughty student. Her retort was so ridiculous that it brought a grin to his lips. Besides Leyla Lewellin, no one in the whole empire would dare accuse Duke Herhardt of being a petty thief.

“Are you a crow?!” She snapped. Her gaze travelled from his jet-black hair to his piercing blue eyes.

“A crow?”

Her unexpected question made Matthias frown, but Leyla didn’t seem the least bit phased.

“You’re the one who’s always stealing my… I mean, you’re the one who did wrong. Why should I be the one who has to go seek you out and beg for my things every single time? It’s not fair.”

Leyla’s disgruntled voice was a pitch higher than her regular tone. Somehow, it was clearer and more pleasing to the ears, so Matthias willingly listened.

“That’s why you stayed put this time?” Matthias’ lips twitched at Leyla’s frustration.

His unruffled features left her speechless. Leyla had finally mustered up the courage to protest, but the Duke had dismissed her with a simple smirk.

‘What in the world…’

He made her feel foolish.

“Leyla.”

Right when Leyla was about to speak, Matthias had called out her name. His obtrusive voice dampened her resolve. It was a strange feeling that she couldn’t really describe. Hence, she promptly opened her eyes and mulled over a possible reply.

“Leyla.”

Matthias murmured, his voice a low hum.


When she turned her head to the side, Leyla’s ear pressed against Matthias’ chest. She could hear the faint beating of his heart.

She gasped, placing her pale, stiff hands on top of his chest, horrified at the possibility of him feeling her thumping heart. Leyla pushed his shoulders once again, even though she knew her efforts were for nought.

When Matthias finally took a step back, Leyla let out a long-held breath.

Despite being of timid nature, Leyla Lewellin was gentle, smart, and at times, daring. She was difficult to comprehend but very entertaining to watch.

“Now, please return my pen.”

Matthias burst into laughter at Leyla’s abrupt request.

‘She never disappoints me.’

“It’s gone.”

Matthias eagerly answered.

“I threw it away.”

“What?”

“I didn’t think you would look for it.”

“Then why did you come looking for me?”

“Leyla, don’t you think I should at least inform you?” Matthias shrugged his shoulders as if she were asking the obvious.

“I’m a gentleman.”

Matthias caressed her hair, still trapped between his fingers.

“I’m Carlsbar’s best gentleman, acknowledged by Ms. Lewellin herself.”

As he loosened his grip, Leyla’s hair fell on her shoulders like golden waves. She gave him a disapproving look while staggering backwards. However, as soon as she’d been released, she let out a yelp of pain.

“Ouch!”

As the last strands of her hair slipped out of his fingers, Matthias suddenly strengthened his grip.

“Am I not?”

He looked elated, even when Leyla’s eyes went misty from the pain on her scalp.

‘Insane’

“I-It’s hurt!” Leyla struggled to release her hair from his fingers. Chuckling, Matthias played with the tips of her hair as if it were nothing but a toy.

‘I can’t believe this deranged psychopath is the head of the great House of Herhardt!’

Just when she was about to start worrying about Arvis’s future, Matthias abruptly let go of her hair, causing Leyla to trip.

Leyla expected to hear his musical laughter at her tumbling figure, but her plummeting vision came to a sudden halt. Before she knew it, Matthias’ familiar features filled her view. Only after feeling his arms encircle her waist did Leyla realize that she was looking up at him while being held against his chest.

‘Should I bite him?’

Leyla felt like a trapped mouse until Matthias casually set her down. His calm, yet sly demeanour caused her to shudder.

She quickly ran to the river’s edge near the tree, while Matthias paused to check his wristwatch.

“I’m taking those words back. You’re definitely not a gentleman. Absolutely not!”

Leyla screamed at the top of her lungs.

“I guess I have a terrible reputation now.”

Her cheeks flushed with rage as he laughed again, and it reflected in her voice when she declared, “I’m serious!”

“Ah, are you?”

“Yes! If you’re a gentleman, then I must be the Queen!”

Leyla was bitter at her past self for showering him with such servile praises.

Matthias flashed a wolfish grin while fixing the lapel of his dishevelled coat – as if to tease her by saying, ‘Is that all you have to say?’

Before he left, Matthias made a theatrical bow, as though he were a servant in the presence of a Queen.

His subtle jibe left Leyla speechless.

Leyla stared at the Duke’s retreating back, dumbstruck. The man who hunted her down and tormented her like a predator had now left after insulting her in the most beautiful manner.



The car was already on standby with its door open when Matthias arrived in front of the annex.

He promptly stepped into the car, his prior annoyance and displeasure having vanished into thin air.

The car gathered speed as it drove along the riverfront road. Inside, Matthias gazed at the Schulter River for a moment before turning to the pile of documents and letters his aide had arranged for him.

His twinkling eyes slowly returned to their usual, calculated gleam. However, his stoic visage broke when he slightly pouted his lips as he retrieved a pen from the pocket of his coat.

‘Leyla Lewellin.’

The golden letters engraved on the pen sparkled in the afternoon sun.

Matthias’ fingertips softly glided over the pen’s glossy surface. Smiling, he opened the pen cap.

The scritch-scratch of pen-against-paper echoed throughout the sunlit car.



“Ms Lewellin, this is for you.”

The mailman had a small parcel left in his hands once all the official letters had been given out.

“For me?”

Leyla hesitated before receiving a parcel at school rather than at her cabin. When she searched for the sender’s identity, she was greeted with a name and an address that she had never seen before.

“Might this be a wrong delivery?”

“Huh? Um- no…”

Leyla dismissed her doubts with a smile. Although she didn’t know who the sender was, the recipient tag on the box clearly mentioned ‘Leyla Lewellin.’

“Thank you.”

Leyla hurried back into the school building after thanking the mailman. As the school’s youngest teacher, she was tasked with the duty of receiving and distributing all the letters and parcels – from the principal’s office to the classrooms.

By the time she completed her tasks, break time was almost over. Leyla took a seat at her classroom desk and started unwrapping the package she had received. She found a long box, free of any note or missive.

Leyla checked the sender’s name and address once again. It was odd – the address mentioned a strange city.

“Oh!”

Upon sliding the lid open, Leyla sat with her mouth agape.

Inside the box was a black pen with exquisite golden etchings.

‘Who on earth would send this and why…’

But then, the memories of the weekend flooded her mind and she let out an inadvertent sigh.

This new pen seemed far too expensive compared to her previous one.

Leyla carefully picked up the new fountain pen. Her name was engraved on the cap, just like her old pen that the Duke had thrown away.

Before she could do anything else though, her students started pouring into the classroom with the sound of the ringing school bell.

Leyla put her new pen back in its box and stowed it deep within her desk drawer. How dearly she wished she could stow away her memories in the same, dark place, too. But alas, Leyla knew that was impossible.

“Let’s get started, everyone!”

Leyla stood before the podium, a jovial smile in place.


Chapter 52




It’s Over Now







It was late afternoon when Riette von Lindman arrived at Herhardt’s mansion, his carriage loaded with luggage for his short stay at Arvis.

“Welcome, Riette.” Elysee von Herhardt greeted him cheerfully, “I wish my sister had come with you.”

“My mother is going on a trip soon.”

“She must be planning a trip to the south for winter.”

“Yes, she detests the cold.” Riette smiled as he conveyed his mother’s regards with a gentle voice. “Where’s Madam Norma?”

“She’s taking a nap at the moment. You may say hello to her later.”

Elysee von Herhardt led Riette to the living room.

As a cousin and a close friend of Matthias, he had wandered in and out of Arvis growing up, and was already considered a part of the family.

The two had tea in the living room, after which Riette went for a stroll in the woodlands of the Herhardt estate. Matthias wouldn’t return until nightfall, and it would take some time for the servants to organise Riette’s belongings. Thus, curiosity got the better of him. Riette decided to set out for a special occasion: to meet the elusive child who lived in the woods, Leyla. In other words, the woman who was wreaking havoc in Matthias and Claudine’s once orderly life.

Riette knew the child, but he had never spared her a single glance. To him, she was just one of many in the bevy of servants who took up residence in Arvis. He sympathised with her plight and thought of her as quite a pretty girl, but that was all. So imagine Riette’s surprise when he discovered that the woman Matthias had taken an interest in was Leyla Lewellin.

Scandalous affairs between aristocrats and their servants were nothing new, but if the aristocrat were to be Duke Herhardt, the story would take on a life of its own. Even if it was just a passing fancy.




‘Duke Herhardt lied.’


As the gardener’s cabin appeared on the horizon, Riette reminisced about that evening last summer when Claudine had abruptly brought up Matthias.

‘He lied in order to separate Leyla from the doctor’s son.’

Claudine had smiled, but Riette saw through her facade when he caught a glimpse of her frightening, icy gaze.

‘The blue-blooded Matthias von Herhardt lied and schemed just to have that pathetic orphan. Can you believe it, Riette?’ Claudine scoffed.

‘What kind of lies did he spew?’ Riette had asked, but Claudine had given no further explanation.

‘I hope he gets her as soon as possible.’

Claudine looked out her window impassively, as if nothing had happened. The long, summer sunset split the skyline beyond Count Brandt’s estate like a blade of gold.

‘He needs to have her in order to dispose of her at the earliest.’

Claudine muttered with a look of boredom sketched on her face, as if she were a spectator of a third-rate, low-class performance.

Riette could peer right into her mind. She didn’t look jealous of Leyla Lewellin. She simply portrayed slight dismay and scorn at her noble fiancé’s lowly inclinations.

Rather, if Claudine had been jealous or distressed, Riette would have asked her to marry him instead of getting tied to a marriage that would’ve made her miserable. However, Claudine was adamant that marrying Matthias would be the only way for her to receive the happiness she so desired.

That day, the two of them had sat down for tea and chatted pleasantly, later enjoying their dinner in the same amicable atmosphere. The following morning, Riette had left the Brandt estate with Claudine standing at the door until his car was out of sight.

‘Why is that memory persisting and becoming a lingering regret?’

A forlorn laugh escaped Riette’s lips just as he arrived in front of the log cabin. A forest trail linked the hedgeless hunting grounds and the small cottage.

Every passing second, the glorious lamp of heaven leisurely dripped gold onto the glittering river. As the sun slowly set beyond the horizon, the lighting inside the house dimmed down. Instead of leaving, though, Riette decided to wait. With his back resting comfortably against the porch railing, he looked up at the deciduous branches.



Riette Lindman harboured feelings for someone who would never be miserable because of love. And he knew well that the woman he loved was the root of his woes.


Yet, Riette enjoyed having a simple and carefree life, so he was willing to embrace his tragic love with ease. He didn’t mind providing Claudine with some fun and helping her through his pranks.

Just when he was about to light a cigarette, Riette suddenly heard footsteps coming from the other side of the forest trail. Sounds of conversation floated down the path.

He shifted his attention to the direction of the distant sounds and took a long drag of his cigarette. He then exhaled a cloud of smoke as he kept waiting. Before long, a bear-like man and a woman half his size appeared before him. They stopped short of the entrance when they noticed Riette.

With a grin pasted on his face, Riette approached the pair. The gardener blurted out a greeting upon recognizing the man and the petite lady next to him bowed her head.

“Hello there, little forest bird girl.”

Riette greeted her calmly, similar to the time he watched her cry as she buried the bird that Matthias had slain.

“Ah. Should I say bird lady now? Or bird teacher?”

Leyla’s eyes glinted in suspicion behind her glasses, her brows furrowing as she processed his nonsense.

Riette’s impression of Leyla Lewellin remained unchanged. She was certainly pretty, but not stunningly so that it would dazzle the men around her. Yet, he seemed to have an inkling of how she managed to tickle the fancy of the doctor’s son and his very own noble cousin.

“Anyway, nice to meet you, Leyla.”



“Be careful of Marquis Lindman.”

It was a severe warning when coming from Bill Remmer, who was glaring at something towards the end of the table. Leyla giggled placing down the pot of freshly cooked stew in the middle of the table.

“This isn’t a laughing matter. Don’t just take it lightly”

“Uncle.”

“I don’t believe that lazy flirt just came out for a walk this far.”

Bill bit the loaf roughly, tearing it into smaller pieces.

“He greeted you and prattled on about pointless things. It’s extremely suspicious so you should be more careful.”

“Yes, yes.”


Leyla readily replied, knowing his nagging would never end if she didn’t comply. At her half-hearted response, Bill was unconvinced.

“Keep my words in mind, Leyla. Not all aristocrats are as decent and dignified as Duke Herhardt.”

“Yes… Huh, what?”

Leyla’s forehead scrunched up in the midst of her inadvertent nodding. Bill’s exaggerated reverence of Duke Herhardt left her speechless; but she could not dissent because except for her, everyone else viewed Duke Herhardt in such light.

Leyla just kept nodding as she hurriedly ate her bread, keeping her opinions to herself. Nevertheless, memories of that indecent, undignified man became more vivid. She started coughing, choking on her bread as she remembered the offensive bows and expensive pens he sent to her in school.

“What’s wrong?”

“Nothing.” Leyla shook her head. “I was hungry, but ate too fast just now.” She took off her glasses, and wiped away the tears that resulted from her violent coughs.

Bill burst out laughing as he watched her. “At moments like this, would you still seem like a child.”

He had a chastising tone, but Bill’s smile said otherwise.

“Eat some more. But carefully this time.”

Bill took a big serving of meat, placing it one by one on Leyla’s plate. Then another. The food piled up higher everytime Bill moved his hands.

“This is too much!”

“Don’t you know? I like children who eat like cows.” Bill, like always, refused to listen to Leyla’s objections.

“I am no longer a child.”

Leyla declared , yet Bill’s only response was adding one more piece of meat onto her plate.



Their balmy evening was spent chatting and laughing at the table. Leyla found it difficult to eat like a cow; but she tried to eat enough, to please her uncle.

Leyla washed the dishes as Bill Remmer mended the squeaky desk chair. Afterwards, the two of them sat on the porch, warm mugs of coffee in hand, and viewed the falling russet leaves . The wind brought on a palpable chill, but Bill and Leyla would continue their day-end conversations for as long as they could until winter arrived.

“Good night, Leyla.”

Bill gave his rudimentary but warm goodbye before entering his room.

“You too, Uncle. Good night.”

Leyla’s lips held a gentle smile, as usual. Her bubbly voice had the essence of a sliver of light flowing through the gap of a curtain.

After returning to her room, Leyla sat on the chair Uncle Bill had fixed for her and corrected her students’ test papers. Later, she read some mystery novels borrowed from the library and replied to letters from friends who had become teachers at other schools.

After finishing the last letter, she suddenly remembered the pen the Duke had given her as she closed the lid of her own worn-out one.

Leyla was silent for a brief moment as she looked blankly into space, before deciding to open the desk drawer. The pen she had reluctantly brought home was still neatly stowed in its box.

‘I knew it.’

Growing up, Leyla had heard many a tongue-click whenever she made a mistake or tried to be more well-behaved than her classmates.

‘As one would expect from a child who grew up without parents.’

The remarks she’d grown used to hearing always carried one of the two emotions: scorn or pity.

Leyla always wondered why she was singled out for blame every time, even though the other children made the same mistakes as her. Nevertheless, as she grew older, Leyla realized that society’s rules didn’t apply equally to all of its members.

So she wanted to do better.

Even if she couldn’t be perfect, she was determined to live a life where she didn’t garner sympathy from others. Every time she faced the world’s harsh standards, Leyla tried her best to stand her ground and fight. She wanted to live a respectable life for Uncle Bill, who had cared, loved, and raised her in all the ways that count.

After she made up her mind, she pulled the pen out of the box without hesitation. Her hand reached for a piece of paper to wrap the package in.

Leyla meticulously packed the parcel and scrawled down the address using an old fountain pen. The receiver was the owner of Arvis, Duke Matthias von Herhardt. As for the sender, she wrote down the stranger’s name and address from whom she had received the pen.


When dawn came, Leyla stuffed the box into her bag and set off for the day’s work. She had to leave the house earlier than usual to make a quick trip to the post office in the nearby hamlet.

After returning the present, Leyla felt like a heavy weight had been lifted off her chest.

Leyla believed it was over now.

She was sure of it.












Chapter 53




The Bird’s Owner







“My heart aches every time I see this, Matthias.”

Riette clicked his tongue as he pulled open the cabinet door. Even though he wasn’t a big drinker, the minibar in Matthias’s room was always stocked with fine liquors.

“It’s not nice to overlook fine liqueurs in this way.”

With a vague grin, Riette took a bottle of alcohol and went back to the front of the table. Matthias’ expression was bland as always—he didn’t give a fig about what his cousin did.

The soulful melody of a piano played from the phonograph, perfectly harmonized with the crackling of the logs burning in the fireplace. Riette filled a glass with the liquor from the bottle, handing it to his cousin. Matthias took the glass gracefully, his movement in sync with the notes filling the room.

Leaning against the couch, Riette observed him as if he were a stranger. Matthias was staring at the rim of his glass, lost in thought as a canary, which now felt like a part of the bedroom, played happily beside him.

‘Your cousin is a demon of a gentleman.’


The reputation of Captain Herhardt, spreading ever wider with each social event held, suddenly rose in Riette’s mind.

Matthias had never spoken about his time serving on the military front—not from modesty, as one might have expected, but from feeling that his accomplishments during that period of time had no meaning. Instead, word of Captain Herhardt’s heroics spread through the lips of other aristocratic officers who had battled beside him during the war.

Riette might not have participated in the war, but the narratives he had heard allowed him to visualize Matthias’s prowess on the battlefield as if he had seen it firsthand. Neither a warmongering idealist like his fellow aristocratic officers, nor someone steeped with the boredom that came from the routine of the military, Matthias’ ethos as a soldier-at-arms was noticeably different from his brethren.

His name was etched in gold ink, illustrating his brilliant achievements during his time in uniform. Yet, Matthias deemed it all of little importance. Every time people gossiped about Matthias’ military prowess, they invariably concluded their stories with an incredulous sigh :



‘…. I don’t understand him.’

Riette knew better than anyone else how that discouraging remark was the most apt description of Matthias von Herhardt.

‘I really don’t understand.’

Each person had sighed once they uttered those words, much like how Riette was sighing at the moment.

‘I don’t understand him.’

He had known Matthias von Herhardt all his life, yet the only conclusion that Riette could draw about him was this— the man resembled a rainbow amalgamation that blended into a murky color with a white finish.

A noble aristocrat. A worthy successor. A good cousin. A man of honour. Every facet of him was prominent, yet nothing was discernible, even when all of the facets were arranged together.

Some praised Duke Herhardt for his self-learnt mastery of self suppression, especially when it came to carrying out his duties, but Riette was skeptical of their analysis. As far as he could tell, there had never been anything to suppress in the first place.

But how would Duke Herhardt act towards Leyla Lewellin?

More than a little tipsy, Riette grinned as Matthias gave him a sidelong glance. The canary was now sitting still on Matthias’s shoulder, something that Riette believed would make Matthias annoyed, but the man looked unfazed instead.

“How long do you plan to be the owner of that bird?”

“For as long as I want to.”

Matthias’s answer was quick and resolute. The bird fluttered up to his shoulder, rubbing its beak against his suspender as he took a sip from the glass he was holding.

“When will that be?”

“Well.”



Placing his glass down delicately, Matthias leant aslant against the armrest. The warm light from the fireplace reflected off the onyx buttons on his cuffs, gleaming a deep black in the light.

“Aren’t you curious? Why I came to Arvis, what I’m planning to do, that kind of thing.”

“No.”

Riette’s visit to Arvis that came out of the blue, and his impromptu weeks-long stay came as no surprise. Yet Matthias’s reply was indifferent, as if he found what he was listening to was nothing more than a pathetic affair.

“Whatever, you jerk.” Riette laughed, downing the last of his drink.

‘Is it lust?’

Riette looked at Matthias contemplatively. He knew well—men had the instinctive desire to own beautiful women. Despite the lack of emotion Matthias externally, that didn’t mean his instinct was gone. It was just a hunch, but Riette felt that it was a reasonable assumption to make with what he knew about his cousin.

But why the orphan? Duke Herhardt was always unsympathetic to women who were more beautiful and noble than the orphan.

The more Riette thought about it, the more it felt like he was in a labyrinth, increasingly confused by its twisting turns. Riette shoved the thought away as Matthias whistled. The bird, which had been bouncing on the table, flew over to Matthias immediately.

Gazing idly at the bird, Riette whistled towards it, tune longer and kitschy. Unfortunately for Riette, the bird showed no sign of coming towards him. It sat on the back of Matthias’s hand, tilting its head up towards Matthias instead.

“What the…. Can a bird recognize its owner?”

Riette scoffed as he recalled the woman who had kept a wary watch on him.


He didn’t view Leyla Lewellin as an elusive woman. No matter how long it took, Riette believed that she would open up to him with time, just like she did to the doctor’s son and Duke Herhardt. Not just that, but Riette knew Matthias von Herhardt would abandon the orphan eventually for the sake of his marriage with Claudine, an end result that Claudine had long hoped for.

“Shall we go hunting on the weekend?” asked Riette, while refilling his glass.

After a moment of thought, Matthias gave a surprising answer.

“Go alone. I’ll have it prepared for you.”

“What?”

Eyes wide, Riette stared at Matthias. For as long as he could remember, Matthias had never turned down a hunting offer.

“No way, are you serious?”

A knock on the door interrupted Riette’s question. The butler, Hessen, stepped inside the room.

“The mail has arrived, master.”

With a parcel and a tray of letters at hand, he moved smoothly towards Matthias.

‘Why does the butler have to come in at this hour for such a trifling notice?’

Riette flashed the butler an annoyed glance. The butler’s lips were pressed flat, a clear signal that Riette had overextended his stay.

“Well then. See you tomorrow, Duke.”

Toasting a goodbye with the glass of alcohol in his hand, Riette left Matthias’s bedroom. After Riette’s steps had faded, Hessen opened his mouth, saying;

“Master, the parcel has returned.”

“Parcel?”

Hessen awkwardly gave a small box to Matthias. The sender’s name and location were unfamiliar.

“Who is this?”

“It’s my relative. I used this name and address to follow your order.”

“My order? Ah.”

Matthias’s mind flashed back to the week before, when he had ordered Hessen to send Leyla Lewellin a good pen. Understanding clicked into place at the memory.

“M.. master…..”

“I understand.” Matthias cut Hessen’s words short. “You may leave.”

He tapped his finger on the box he had taken. Hessen stared like he wanted to say something, but followed the Duke’s orders without further questions.

Matthias rose from his seat once the door had closed. The box was held in his hands, ripped box’s wrapper burned into embers in the hearth.

Inside the opened box was a note and pen, neatly arranged. Slowly, Matthias read the message, taking his time to read the few scrawled words on the scrawled words on the scrap of paper tucked between his fingers.

[Come to think of it, it was my fault for losing my pen.]

[It was my fault that I fell, didn’t properly pack things, and didn’t get it back on time. You don’t have to take responsibility..]

[There’s no reason for me to receive this item, so I’ll return it to you.]

There was no name written on the message, but Matthias knew who it was anyway. Leyla’s note was full of familiar conceit. The more Matthias read, the more slanted his eyebrows went, until eventually he snorted and flashed a grimace, edges of his lips curved up in anger.

As he watched the fire in the fireplace devour the crumpled note, shiny new pen and the parcel box they were originally wrapped in, self content, anger, shame and laughter loomed one after another on Matthias’s face as he watched the shimmering flame.

His expression faded back to neutrality, vanished moments after the vivid emotions mixed into one.

The only thing left of his features was the very picture of calmness and serenity marred only with the shadow of the lamplight growing over it.
